Karl Kautsky 

Are the Jews a Race? 

(1914/1926) 



Written: 1914. 

Published: Jonathan Cape. Printed in the United States in 1926, never gives the identity of the 
translator. 

Transcribed: Ted Crawford for marxists.org, October, 2002. 



Publishers Note 



Are the Jews a Race? now appears for the first time in English. The first German edition 
appeared in 1914, under the title Rasse and Judentum; the second edition, in 1921, already 
included a number of important additions and improvements, particularly the new chapter 
entitled Zionism After the War, for the present English version, the author has revised and 
brought up to date the second German edition, in the light of recent developments in Palestine. 



2 



Contents 

Chapter I Race Theories 3 

Chapter II Races of Animals 7 

Chapter III The Races of Man 18 

Chapter IV Differences and Oppositions Between The Races of Man 27 

Chapter V Physical Characteristics of the Jewish Race 38 

Chapter VI Mental Qualities of the Jewish Race 57 

Chapter VII The Assimilation of the Jews 66 

Chapter VII Anti-Semitism 73 

Chapter IX Zionism Before the War 84 

Chapter X Zionism After the War 90 

Chapter XI Pure Races and Mixed Races 101 

Chapter XI The Last Stages of Judaism 112 



3 



Chapter I 
Race Theories 

"On the Jew's faith I do not look, his race is what I cannot brook" JT[, is the motto of modern 
anti-Semitism, which - contrary to the naive anti-Semitism of earlier periods - is proud of its 
scientific spirit and feels itself free from religious prejudices. Just as religion was once obliged, 
and is still obliged, to cloak or justify all possible varieties of secular partisan interests, so natural 
science must now aid in representing aspirations of interests with strictly temporal and spatial 
limitations as natural and eternal necessities. 

This does not mean that religion formerly - and the natural sciences now - were actually created 
for such purposes by interested parties, as is sometimes maintained with regard to religion. Both 
grow from entirely different roots. But as soon as either has become a force dominating the 
thought of men, each social stratum finds itself impelled to make use of this force and to justify 
its interests on the basis of this force. When, at the end of the Eleventh Century, the nations of 
western and central Europe had been relieved of the pressure of the Slavs and Arabs to such an 
extent as to enable them to take the offensive and plunder the wealthy Orient, they inaugurated 
their predatory campaigns - the Crusades - with the battle-cry: Dieu le veult! And when, a few 
centuries later, after the Turks had again pushed back the Christians in the Mediterranean, and 
the rising capitalism of western Europe was crying for colonial booty and finding ready tools for 
its adventurous expeditions to new continents in the declining knighthood and the expropriated 
peasants, these continents were visited with fire and sword, plunder and serfdom, in order to 
bring the light of true religion to the heathen for the greater glory of God. And the class struggles 
in Europe itself, which were then disintegrating feudalism and ushering in capitalism, were 
conducted as late as in the Seventeenth Century by the various parties with constant invocations 
of the Bible and the Fathers of the Church. 

Since then religion has lost its power. As industrial capitalism advances, the religious mode of 
thought is replaced by the scientific mode of thought. Religion still maintains itself for a period, 
by force of habit, as a conservative power, but the motive springs of the ensuing social evolution 
cease to make use of religious modes of thought and arguments. The advances of the new, 
capitalist mode of production are closely connected with the advances in the natural sciences. 
Each serves as a powerful stimulus to the other. The bourgeois intelligentsia now demand that all 
social aspirations be in accord with natural science, i.e., with the recognized laws of nature; each 
social interest must find its justification in its compatibility with the laws of nature. In this 
connection, however, human society sometimes still fails to be regarded as a specific portion of 
nature, having its own laws, just as organic nature has its own laws as distinguished from those 
of inorganic nature. The inadequacy of this point of view easily becomes apparent, producing a 
reaction in favour of isolating human society, or man himself, as a social, ethical creature, from 
the natural laws of causality. 

The bourgeois philosophy of our times moves between these two extremes. 

Once Darwinism had completed its victorious procession through the natural sciences, it was 
regarded as up-to-date to apply it without further ado to social conditions also. There are no 
sudden leaps in nature, but only imperceptible transformations, therefore natural science forbids 



4 



revolution as a violation of natural laws. The struggle for existence is represented as an eternal 
process, wherefor it is contrary to nature to construct a society without competition, etc. 

In the last few decades it is particularly the conception of race that enjoys precedence as an 
explanation, or rather justification, of social institutions and aspirations. 

A colonial policy is represented by the theoreticians of race as a natural necessity, as a 
consequence of the fact that nature creates master races and slave races. Only the former have 
creative ability; the others are devoid of independence, cannot exist without foreign guidance, 
cannot evolve to a higher stage, but are doomed to serve the master races. 

But the law of natural necessity with which these race theoreticians operate also affords 
additional pleasant inferences for certain bourgeois cliques of our time. Even within the master 
races there are differences of race, the blond race being the most magnificent of all. These blond 
(Nordic) gentlemen proclaim themselves to be the cleverest, noblest and mightiest of men, whom 
all others must serve. International politics must be based on this conception, from which also 
results the necessity for the existence of exploiters and exploited. 

Viewed from this standpoint, the French Revolution assumes a very peculiar function. Mr. 
Bornhak, Professor of Public Law at the University of Berlin, begins with the fact that the area of 
present-day France, formerly inhabited by Celts, and later conquered by the Romans, finally 
succumbed during the migration of nations to Teutonic tribes, who there created a new 
government authority, controlled by them with the aid of the Catholic Church. This state appears 
to Bornhak as the exclusive achievement of the Teutonic barbarians: "The Celts are politically 
one of the most incapable races that have ever existed." The Teutons, on the other hand, are "a 
truly state-organising race of creative endowment". It is they who made France a power, until 
their Celtic subjects exterminated the master race in the great revolution, "with barbarous 
cruelty". 

"The Romanised Celtic race becomes the entire population. But this result simultaneously, owing 
to the political incapacity of the Celtic race, sealed the fate of the French nation." [2] 

The same conception of the French Revolution as a rebellion of inferior Celts against the noble 
blond race had previously been advocated by Driesmans, who maintained that this revolution had 
been "made by lawyers and journalists", professions of "unquestioned Celtic origin". [31 That is 
the way our race theoreticians understand the writing of history. 

Their political economy is not any sounder. The anthropologist Ammon in 1893 published a 
work on natural selection among humans (Die nattirliche Auslese beim Menschen), in which 
he finds, on the basis of material collected in Baden, that the class distinction between capitalists 
and proletarians is based on the existence of two races within the population, a blond, 
dolichocephalic, Teutonic race, and a black, brachycephalic, "Mongolian" race. The latter are 
declared deficient in independence and mental endowment, differing in these respects from the 
Teutons: "Like all Aryans, the Teutons are born to rule other peoples. Wherever they appear, 
they are the ruling and socially preferred classes, they are a people of fierce courage and 
indomitable energy, of devotion and fidelity, of pride and truthfulness, a shining race of 



5 



demigods, the like of whom the world has seen but once before, in the Greeks, and will probably 
never see again." 

Ammon investigates the story of the evolution of these demigods on the basis of material 
collected in the little province of Baden, where they live in the country as peasants together with 
the Mongolian roundheads, and emigrate to the cities like the latter. In the cities, owing to their 
demigod nature, they soon rise to splendid eminence, being transfigured into city employees, 
brewers, grain dealers, and other god-like forms, while the black-haired Asiatics from the 
Schwarzwald are relegated to the well deserved, contemptible servitude of wage-labour. 

About the same time, even antedating Ammon, other theoreticians of race came forward with the 
statement that it was not the blond Teutons but the black-haired Asiatics who were more and 
more gaining control of capital in the cities, subjugating the Teutons and gradually displacing 
them even as intellectuals, physicians, lawyers, journalists. But the victors in this case were not 
lauded as demigods, but denounced as a dangerous riff-raff, who must be driven out or at least 
disfranchised, in the interest of the lordly Teutons. This race of swarthy undesirables is that of 
the Jews. The race argument is used more in support of anti-Semitism than in any other social 
movement of our times, having now completely displaced the religious argument in western 
Europe. 

The anti-Semitism inherited from the Feudal Era had long seemed to be about to disappear, 
having dwindled to the same extent, and under the influence of the same capitalist evolution, as 
the power of religion, and being regarded as one of the prejudices of backward persons. 

But about a generation ago it began to come up again, becoming modernised, and while it may 
not be a political factor in modern countries, it is nevertheless everywhere a social factor. We 
shall learn subsequently the causes of this condition, as well as why we shall not be able to 
dispose of this anti-Semitism so quickly, but also - of course - why anti-Semitism cannot count 
on a victory. 

Let us first consider only the racial argument of anti-Semitism, an argument which is not used by 
anti-Semitism alone, but also by other domestic and international movements. 

Characteristically enough, there is rising within Judaism, as a reaction against anti-Semitism, a 
similar tendency to accept and utilize the theory of race. It is a natural application of the 
principle: If this theory permits Christian- Teutonic patriots to declare themselves demigods, why 
should Zionist patriots not use it in order to stamp the people chosen by God as a chosen race of 
nature, a noble race that must be carefully guarded from any deterioration and contamination by 
foreign elements? A considerable literature has been produced within the past decade dealing 
with questions of this order. Already in 1904, these arguments were well summarised and 
evaluated in Friedrich Hertz's book on modern theories of race, [41 of which a second revised 
and much enlarged edition was printed under another title in 1915. [5J Among the latest books 
on this subject, one of the best is that of Dr. Maurice Fishberg: The Jews: A Study of Race and 
Environment, London and New York 1911, 678pp. [6J. 



6 



Fishberg uses not only material collected by other anthropologists, but also much new data 
obtained by him by measuring more than four thousand Jews from four continents, and digesting 
this material in a most conscientious and scholarly manner. It was to the many suggestions given 
me by this book that I owe the idea of writing the present little work. 

In this connection, I might mention that I am again placed in the same embarrassing position that 
was mine when I wrote my book Increase and Evolution in Nature and Society, and to which I 
referred on pages vii and 17 of that work JT[: namely, I am obliged, although I am a layman in 
this field, to discuss questions connected with the natural science of biology. Here also there is a 
border region, one of the many points at which biology and sociology meet, and which, strictly 
speaking, would require the writer to be a master in both fields. But the present state of 
knowledge makes this impossible for any living man. No one who enters such a field - and they 
are much entered - can be required to have a mastery of more than one of the sciences in 
question, together with so much knowledge of the other as to know the general state of the 
science. His own science must always be such a man's point of departure; it is his task to show 
the agreement between the conclusions of his own science and those of the border science, which 
is by no means a simple matter - let us say - far a sociologist, who finds the specialists in natural 
science in such great disagreement in questions of race, as, for instance, on the fundamental 
problem of heredity. The sociologist may, therefore, consider himself justified in making his 
selection among the conflicting theories of the natural scientist, though he be a layman, and to 
favour such theory as may be compatible with the firm basis he has gained in sociology. 



Footnotes 

h Was der Jude glaubt, ist einerlei, In der Rasse liegt die Schweinerei. 

2. C. Bornhak: Der Einfluss der Rasse aufdie Staatsbildung, Archiv fur Rassen and 
Gesellschaftsbiologie, March 1904, pp.254 et seq. 

3. Quoted by Hertz: Moderns Rassentheorien, p. 10. 

4. Hertz: Moderne Rassentheorien, Vienna, 1904. 

5. Rasse und Kultur, Leipzig. 

Kautsky uses the German translation of L. Hepner: Die Rassenmerkmale der Juden, Eine 
Einfuhrung in ihre Anthropologie, Miinchen 1913, 300pp. Our references are to the pages of 
the English edition, except where the German translation, which involved some changes, is 
specifically mentioned. - Translator. 

7. Vermehrung und Entwicklung in Natur und Gesellschaft, Stuttgart, 1908. 



7 



Chapter II 
Races of Animals 

a. Domestic Animals 

SOME of the most remarkable peculiarities of our theoreticians of race, who call themselves 
"anthropo-sociologists", is the fact that they leave us all the more in the dark as to the true nature 
of the concept of race, the more they have occasion to manipulate with this concept in the 
explanation of social phenomena. A man's being, action, performance, are due in their opinion 
simply to his race; they have been inherited from his ancestors and are transmitted with the 
certainty of natural law to his descendants. Race is the modern Fate, as inscrutable and 
immutable as the latter. 

It seems self-evident to the anthropo-sociological theoreticians of race that those groups 
designated as human races should be understood in the same way as we understand races of 
animals. They seem to be not troubled for a moment by any question as to whether the life 
conditions of man do not alter the concept of race as applied to man. They do not even take up 
the question of which type of animal race is represented by the human races. 

As a matter of fact, the races of animals are not all of the same type, but may be divided into two 
different groups: the races of domestic animals, and the races of animals in the wild state. 

Zoologists and botanists distinguish these groups with great care. As a rule, they apply the word 
"race" only to the former, while the latter are termed "varieties" or "species". The theoreticians 
of race, the anthropo-sociologists, however, indiscriminately apply observations and laws valid 
for both the races of domestic animals as well as for the varieties of wild animals, to the human 
races. This alone must give rise to dreadful confusion, altogether aside from the fact that human 
beings are neither domestic animals nor animals in the wild condition, but a tribe living under 
quite peculiar conditions, conditions which do not resemble those of any other animals. 

Before taking up the problem of race, we must therefore first attain clarity as to the distinction 
between the "race" of the domestic animal and the "variety" of the wild animal. We speak here 
only of animals, since only they are of importance to our problem, which concerns the human 
races, but the following remarks apply just as well to plants as to animals. 

A phenomenon is best understood when its origin is known. In the case of the races of domestic 
animals, it is not difficult to ascertain this origin, for the process is being accomplished daily 
before our eyes. The breeding of new races is constantly going on. On the other hand, the 
formation of varieties in nature cannot be observed; it must be inferred as an hypothesis. 

If we regard the organisms in nature, we shall find that none of them serves a purpose lying 
outside of itself, but that each is an end in itself. Its individual organs must serve for the 
preservation of the whole, and must therefore be adequate for - or at least compatible with - self- 
preservation. An organism constituted otherwise cannot continue to exist, and certainly not to 
multiply. 



8 



But in the case of the animal organism, not only its own organs are important, but also those of 
other organisms with which it comes in contact, which oppose it, or on which it lives. Only man, 
however, has advanced to the point of altering in such manner the organs of the organisms from 
which or by which he lives, as to make them more subservient to his purposes. This is one of the 
means by which he has advanced beyond his primitive condition. 

His first step in this process is to cause animals (also plants) which he would otherwise be 
obliged to seek out and capture with more or less difficulty, to live and multiply in his proximity. 
His first object in this is probably merely to diminish the difficulties of seeking, perhaps also of 
overcoming, the organisms on which he lives. But once the latter have been accustomed to live 
together with man as tame companions, man is also impelled to attempt to adapt the organs of 
the domestic animal, or of the cultivated plant, to his own purposes, for which nature did not 
intend them. 

This is best attained by adequately altering their conditions of life, by increasing their supply of 
food, perhaps by fertilizing or battening, decreasing their expenditure of strength in the life 
process, for instance, by sparing them the necessity of looking for fodder, of fleeing from 
enemies, of losing heat in the winter cold, etc. But, ultimately, man comes to the point of altering 
these organisms by making use of his observation that each individual has the tendency to 
transmit his qualities to his posterity. Much as all the individuals of the same species may 
resemble each other, they are never completely identical. Slight variations are always present, 
and these may easily be transmitted. 

Most domestic animals finally become so amenable to man's guidance that he is enabled to mate 
them, or prevent them from reproducing, as he likes. Once he has advanced to this point, he will, 
of course, prefer to permit those specimens to reproduce that are most suitable for his purposes, 
that furnish most milk, meat, or fat, or yield the finest wool, or lay most eggs, have most traction 
power or swiftness, etc. If those of their posterity continue to reproduce, who present these 
qualities in the most emphatic form, these qualities will gradually be reinforced to such an 
extent, and the bodies of the animals will alter so greatly, as to be perceptibly different from 
those of their ancestors, thus producing a new species from the old species, with permanent, 
repeatedly transmittable characteristics, provided the breeding-animals are always mated only 
with their like. 

This selection is at first predominantly an unconscious one. The best specimens are reproduced 
because they are most prized. Without any intention of securing a new race, this final outcome of 
the process has not been apparent from the outset. But the art of breeding is perfected more and 
more, becomes more and mare conscious, and finally actually sets out to create specific races 
with specific race traits. At times, new variations may sporadically appear in isolated specimens. 
If these are of advantage to man, he will attempt to reproduce them. Thus, in 1791, a ram with 
short, crooked legs and a long back, which was thus prevented from jumping over hedges, gave 
rise to a new race in America, that of the Ancona sheep. Likewise in France in 1828, a hornless 
ram with uncommonly soft, long wool, led to the creation of a new race, the Mauchamp sheep. 
As a rule, however, the creation of a new race is not such a simple matter, but proceeds by means 
of a slow, gradual reinforcement of traits, often discernible in the first generation only to the 



9 



trained eye of experienced breeders, and not attaining practical significance until they have been 
reinforced to a sufficient extent in the course of generations. 

The uninterrupted selection of breeding-animals, continued for generations according to the same 
plan, creates a new race which is maintained by the fact that only such specimens are reproduced 
as present this race trait in the most emphatic form, that a mating with individuals of other races 
is strictly avoided, and all specimens of the specific race which present a variation that deviates 
from the desired race trait are of course excluded from further breeding. 

The necessary condition for the formation of such new races is, of course, that the animals 
reproduce in the tame state and that their mating be under man's control. The elephant, as a rule, 
reproduces only in the wild state and has created no new races. 

On the other hand, the domestic cat leaves nothing to be desired in the way of prolificness, yet 
the cat has preserved much of its original freedom in spite of man. Its love-life is carried on not 
in the stable but on the roofs, and therefore, according to Darwin, it does not furnish any 
different races within the same country. fJJ 

However, the formation of new races under otherwise identical circumstances will be the easier, 
the greater the certainty to mate specific individuals, and the more swiftly the generations 
succeed each other. This is the reason for the great increase of races of rabbits and pigeons; here 
the breeding of such races has become a sport. 



b. Wild Animals 

Let us now examine the case of the formation of varieties of animals in the wild condition, which 
should - it would appear - have been examined before we took up the races of domestic animals, 
for the wild varieties, of course, arose earlier and constitute the fundamental trunk from which 
the races of domestic animals have branched off. But in a study of the history of the theory of the 
evolution of races, the origin of the organisms controlled by man is the proper point of departure, 
for it was the observations made in artificial selection that led Darwin to construct his hypothesis 
of natural selection. 

Darwin assumed that the formation of varieties and species proceeds in the natural condition, as 
in the case of domestic animals and cultivated plants, by a selection of the best, most adapted, 
specimens for reproduction, and excluding from reproduction those less fitted, with the sole 
difference that the selection, in the natural condition, is not conducted by man, in accordance 
with his purposes, but by the struggle for existence, which is a consequence of overpopulation, of 
the circumstance that more individuals of each species are produced than can continue to exist. A 
constant merciless struggle is going on among them, in which the weakest, least fit, succumb, 
while the strongest, most fit, maintain themselves and reproduce. Serious objections were raised 
to this view at the very outset. If the struggle for existence is a continuous, progressive selection 
of the best specimens, the transformation of species must be going on continuously, and at a 



10 



rather rapid rate. In the case of certain domestic animals and garden plants a specific new race 
may be produced in the course of a few years. 

In nature, on the other hand, observation shows us that species remain apparently unchanged for 
long periods. They may change in geological periods, but remain unchanged for many thousands 
of years within a geological period. In historical times, the great mass of wild animal species has 
remained entirely the same. As depicted on the ancient Egyptian and Assyrian monuments, they 
look exactly like their prototypes of today. We are told this difficulty may be eliminated by 
assuming that evolution proceeds with tremendous slowness, by a gradual accumulation of 
imperceptible alterations. But the slower this evolution, the more imperceptible the alterations 
contributed to progress by each generation, the more insurmountable becomes another difficulty 
in the theory of selection: it becomes more and more impossible to assume that each alteration 
bestows upon the individual producing it a preponderance over other individuals not supplied 
with it. In artificial selection, the selection is made by men who already have in mind the new 
type that is to be bred, grasping its practical advantages and appreciating - through eyes that 
have been sharpened by this prophecy - the significance of hardly perceptible alterations, which 
are important not in themselves, but merely as points of departure in a long chain of 
development, the new type being realised only at its termination. The theory of evolution 
attempts to dispense altogether with providence in the formation of natural species. Without the 
aid of far-sighted selection, however, imperceptible alterations cannot become the cause for the 
survival and reproduction of the individuals supplied with them. Reference to artificial selection 
is here of no value at all. 

In addition, we have a third difficulty: Darwin called his theory of natural selection an 
explanation of the origin of species. If correct, this theory would merely afford an explanation of 
the evolution of more highly organised individuals from those less, highly organised. Its whole 
emphasis is laid on the solution of the problem of evolution. But, in order to explain the origin of 
species, we must also explain the similarity between individuals, which leads to generalising 
them as a specific species. Whence this similarity? 

In the case of artificial selection, the cause of the similarity between individuals is in their 
common descent from the same ancestors. The ancestral tree is here of great importance. But it is 
impossible, in this case, to maintain a "pure race" without constant intervention on the part of the 
breeder, who must carefully guard his race animals against mating with others, and who must 
eliminate from their posterity all those individuals that present alterations deviating from the 
pure racial type. 

In nature this breeder is lacking. Unless the alterations are of such variety as to doom the 
individual to early destruction, they will not prevent it from mating with other differently 
constituted individuals, and thus from reproducing. A constant mingling of individuals with the 
most varied changes will take place. 

A breeder producing anew race, furthermore, is concerned only with a specific one-sided 
peculiarity, which he aims to perpetuate. His selection is made solely with this object in view. 
But in nature, it is not merely a single quality which affords advantage to the individuals 
possessing it; the most varied qualities may be of value. Let us assume the theory of selection to 



11 



be correct to the extent that evolution takes place by reason of the fact that individuals with 
advantageous alterations maintain and reproduce themselves more easily than others. Even here, 
the most varied alterations are possible, as we may see from the case of the hare. Some hares will 
be benefited by longer legs, others by greater endurance, a third variety by better protective 
mimicry (perhaps they are white in winter and brown in summer), a fourth group by reason of 
enhanced productiveness, others again through increased power of resistance to climatic 
influences (perhaps they have a thick pelt in winter, a light one in summer) ; finer differences in 
the sense organs, sharper eyes, better hearing, finer sense of smell, as well as differences in 
intelligence, in swiftness and correctness of the judgments based on sensual impressions, will be 
of advantage. One individual may present one set of advantages, another may have other 
advantages. 

If only such individuals should continue to mate as have coincident traits, they might emphasise 
these traits and thus create a new race. But since there are many such traits, a single species 
within the same region would not give rise to a single new species but to many such. Thus, as 
contrasted with wild rabbits, tame rabbits may be divided into many races. 

But a mating limited to individuals of the same peculiarities is impossible in the wild state. The 
character of the mates there depends entirely on accident, on the mating of certain individuals at 
the moment of the mating season. There is not always sexual selection; mating is often 
promiscuous. Where there is such selection, it is limited to one sex. The victorious stag will have 
relations with all the does of his herd, regardless of their properties. And the selection - if 
present at all - is carried out among a small number only. 

In the wild state, therefore, the most varied deviations will be transmitted within a certain 
species. These deviations continue to mingle again. It is impossible to see how natural selection 
can here produce new important species with coincident traits. If a constant progressive 
evolution takes place owing to the survival of the fittest, with new properties and by means of 
their transmission, this evolution must lead to a disintegration of existing species into a confused 
mass of varying individuals, all similarity among which will progressively disappear. The theory 
of the origin of species becomes a theory of their dissolution, and it remains impossible to grasp 
how species based on the similarity of numerous individuals should ever arise. But, as a matter 
of fact, we find in nature many more individuals having coincident traits than we do among 
domestic animals. We have already pointed out how great is the number of races of tame rabbits, 
as compared with the uniformity found among wild rabbits and field hares. 

And the number of species of wild animals is not increasing, while almost each new year 
supplies us with a new race in the case of many domestic animals 

"But geology shows us, that from an early part of the tertiary period the number of species of 
shells, and that from the middle part of this same period the number of mammals, has not greatly 
or at all increased." [2_L 

In the introduction to his fine book on the distribution of the animal world, Kobelt says: "I have 
not been able to convince myself that a sole, uniform transformation of the animal kingdom is 
taking place over long periods, as a strict interpretation of Darwinism would require ... 



12 



Beginning with the middle Pliocene period (the geological period immediately preceding the 
origin of man - K.), we cannot prove with any degree of certainty the new origin of any species." 
[31 

Whence then the great similarity between so many individuals in the wild state? 

We cannot explain this similarity by considering only the individual and the evolution of the 
individual. We are here dealing with a mass phenomenon, which may be explained only by 
means of a factor lying outside of the individuals, above them, influencing them all in the same 
manner. It is not hard to discover this factor if we consider the varieties of animals in the natural 
state. Among races of domestic animals, the individual ancestors, the ancestral tree, is of 
importance. But the varieties of wild animals are "geographical races". This is true even for the 
domestic cat, which resists artificial breeding; it is all the more true of animals in the 
unrestrained, natural state. 

Thus, among lions, we may distinguish the varieties of the Barbary lion, the Senegal lion, the 
Cape lion, the Persian lion, the Guzerat lion. Among elephants, we distinguish between the 
Indian and the African. Rhinoceroses are divided into several varieties: the Indian rhinoceros, 
"whose area of distribution seems limited to the Indian peninsula"; the Varana rhinoceros, "as far 
as our knowledge goes, is found only in Java". "The half-armored rhinoceros is found only in 
Sumatra (Cerator hinus sumatrensis)." "The area of distribution of the double-horned rhinoceros 
{Atelodus bicornis and Atelodus simus) now extends over all of Central Africa." "The hornless 
rhinoceros is said now to be limited to the southern half of Africa." [4[ 

Similarly in the case of the hare: "All of central Europe and a small portion of western Asia is 
the home of the Continental hare. In the south, it is the Mediterranean hare, a deviating species 
of small size and reddish color; in the high mountains, it is the Alpine hare, in the far north, the 
snow hare ... The African hares differ from ours by their smaller size and also by their 
uncommonly long ears." [51 

In other words, it is the geographical differences which produce the differences between varieties 
in the natural state: differences in climate, configuration of the soil, the nature of the nutrition 
and the mode of obtaining it, the species of enemies, etc. On the other hand, it is the uniformity 
of the conditions of life within a certain region which produces the similarity between the 
individuals of the species concerned. This similarity is more powerful than the differences, the 
variations of the individuals. The latter tend to be dissimilar, to diverge. The conditions of life in 
nature, in a certain region, are the same, however, for all, operate in the same way, and oppose 
the tendency. 

If we thus consider the conditions of life, the milieu, as the decisive factor in the moulding of 
varieties and species in the natural state, we are eliminating the difficulties that would arise if we 
should proceed - in our explanation of natural varieties - from the experiences obtained in the 
breeding of the races of domestic animals. 

We are now enabled to understand not only the similarity of the individuals of the same species 
within a certain region, but also the constancy, the tendency to immutability, of species in 



13 



historical times, as well as their alterations in geological periods. As long as the milieu remains 
the same, the species will not change. But the milieu doe not permanently remain the same. The 
earth changes, alters its position in the firmament. Passing through space, together with the entire 
solar system, it may at times encounter colder regions, at other times warmer ones, in what we 
call the universe. Nor is its position always the same with regard to the sun; its axis oscillates, 
and many portions of the earth's surface may thus obtain a more polar climate than formerly, 
while others obtain a more equatorial climate. 

Far more certain than these changes are those arising from the gradually growing coldness of the 
earth, its gradual shrinking. Continents and oceans are formed, some of the latter deep, others 
shallow; flat lands and mountains, marine currents and trade winds, nothing permanent, 
everything changing, but changing only in endless periods. For thousands of years the same 
condition will prevail in a certain region; then it will gradually change; moisture yields to 
drought, warmth to cold, low plains are lifted up, twisted into mountain chains, or subside and 
furnish sea bottoms. When such changes ensue, the organisms of the region cannot remain the 
same. Some are destroyed, some are driven out, forced to migrate, some adapt themselves to the 
new conditions, which they may do in many ways, for which Lamarck and Darwin, as well as 
their disciples, have gathered very interesting illustrations. But once the organisms of the region 
are adapted to the new condition of affairs, we no longer find any cause for further changes of 
their condition, and they will remain in their new forms until new changes in their life conditions 
are introduced. 

This is not a new view. Darwin himself, in the historical sketch introducing his book on the 
origin of species, points out that Isidore Geoffroy Saint-Hilaire had stated it to be his opinion (in 
1550) of the traits of species, "that they are permanent for each species so long as it reproduces 
itself within the same conditions, but that they change when the external conditions of life 
change". 

Darwin fully recognised the effect of the altered conditions of life as well as of the use or non- 
use of organs. But he underestimated their importance, since he was completely dominated by 
the observations made in artificial selection, and by the assumption of a constant struggle for 
existence under the pressure of over-population. This latter view he owed to Malthus; it is still 
considered a cast-iron law of natural science. 

But if we examine the struggle for existence, we shall find that overpopulation-in other words, 
the struggle between individuals of the same species for fodder-plays but a small role, is only an 
exceptional phenomenon. 

A few concrete examples will help us. Hares, as is well known, are very fruitful. The female hare 
gives birth to a number of young as early as the month of March; very few of these survive; how 
many, depends chiefly on the weather. Snow, freezing weather, will destroy almost all of them. 
Sunshine, warm breezes, will enable many to live. It is clear that in these cases the selection 
among the young hares is but little concerned with the number struggling for existence. The 
struggle here amounts to a struggle against the external conditions of life, not against numerous 
competitors of the same species. 



14 



Or, let us consider antelopes in an African steppe. Sometimes there is drought for many weeks; 
springs run dry, pools of water evaporate, many antelopes die of thirst. Only those remain alive 
which can bear thirst longest, or whose organs are so delicate as to enable them to sense the 
presence of water at great distances, better than the other antelopes. The struggle for existence 
here certainly produces an extensive selection, but it is a struggle against the external conditions 
of life, and has nothing to do with the number of antelopes. The quantity of water did not become 
insufficient because it was drunk by too many antelopes. 

Another enemy of the antelopes is the lion. But the lion's strength and cruelty do not depend 
upon the number of antelopes. There may even ensue a struggle between two lions for a single 
antelope, if there are not many antelopes, the stronger lion being victorious. But even this is of 
rare occurrence. 

Far from being the general and constant cause of the struggle for existence, the great fruitfulness 
of certain organisms is rather a weapon enabling them to maintain themselves in this struggle, in 
which they would otherwise succumb. The struggle for existence, as a rule, is not a struggle 
between members of the same species when it has become too numerous, but a struggle of the 
individual or a group of individuals of the same species against the external conditions of life, 
which include not only the inorganic surroundings, but also the organic surroundings. Changes in 
these conditions of life also involve changes in the mode of the struggle for existence, in the 
method of using the organs; old organs or forms of organs become dispensable, new organs, or 
new forms of old organs, become necessary. If the species succeeds in evolving in the struggle 
with the new conditions, and thus becoming a new species, it will maintain itself; otherwise it 
will be destroyed. We may judge from remains found in the bowels of the earth how many such 
species have been destroyed in the earth's history. 

The theory of overpopulation proves nothing, therefore, against the assumption that the final 
cause for the formation of new species is in the changes of the conditions of life. Another view 
must still be mentioned: the view that acquired characteristics cannot be inherited. 

Modern physiologists distinguish between the body cells and the reproductive cells, the "body 
plasm" and the "germ plasm". The germ plasm, according to their view, is immutable, being 
transmitted again and again. But, according to Weismann, it is immutable even to the extent that 
it is not influenced by the qualities acquired by the body of the individual during his life. The 
individual cannot, therefore, transmit these acquisitions. Thus the formation of new, 
transmittable traits of species by the influence of new conditions of life on the body, is 
precluded. But this view was emphatically opposed, from its first appearance, particularly by 
Darwinists. Darwin, himself, assumed the heredity of acquired characteristics, as did also 
Herbert Spencer. Recent experiments show, on the one hand, that external influences do produce 
changes which are transmitted, and, on the other hand, that the germ plasm is by no means 
absolutely independent of the body plasm. This question is excellently treated by Tschulok in his 
little book on evolution; the following experiment is particularly interesting: 

"Two races of hens were treated, one pure black, the other pure white. The races were pure, i.e., 
it was known definitely for each individual that its parents, grandparents and great-grandparents 
had all presented the same characteristics as the individual itself; in other words, that no mixture 



15 



had taken place. When such a white hen was crossed with a white cock, their posterity were 
white exclusively. Similarly, mating a black hen with a black cock produced only black 
posterity. 

"Now the following experiment was made: 

"The ovary of a white hen was removed and implanted in the body of a black hen; the black 
hen's ovary was also implanted in the white hen. The operation was performed so neatly that the 
animals remained alive and were capable, after the wounds had healed, of producing posterity by 
the normal methods. The white hen with the black ovary was now fructified by a black cock. We 
should here expect the posterity to be black, for the ova in the ovary of the white hen came from 
a black hen, and the male semen was likewise obtained from a black cock. However, the 
chickens were colored black and white. Similarly, the black hen, with an ovary taken from a 
white hen, was fructified by a white cock. The posterity included not only pure white chickens, 
but also chickens with black spots." [6] 

This result is the more astonishing in that it was attained by powerful mechanical interference, 
not by a gradual, organic alteration. The ovary in the body of the black hen had already attained 
full development when it was implanted in the white hen's body, and yet the influence of the 
new body cells on the transferred germ cells was so strong as to enable the new body fully to 
impress its type upon the ovary. It might be assumed that the influence of changed somatic traits 
on the germ plasm must be still stronger in cases where the body suffers changes by reason of the 
influence of altered conditions, before its germ cells attain full maturity, with the result that the 
process of maturing goes on completely under the influence of the new properties. 

We, therefore, see no reason that would oblige us to assume that acquired characteristics cannot 
be transmitted. The manner in which heredity works is, however, still completely hidden. Nor 
may we assume that all acquired characteristics are inherited. Lesions and mutilations, for 
instance, are hardly transmitted. Weismann cut off the tails of many generations of mice, without 
ever obtaining a tailless mouse. Many an apparent case of heredity may also be explained by the 
fact that the posterity live under the same conditions as their ancestors, and therefore acquire and 
present the same characteristics, without necessarily inheriting them. 

There are many degrees among the inherited characteristics. Some are more persistent than 
others. There are inherited characteristics which the individual may easily lose if it enters a 
milieu deviating from that producing these qualities. Other traits, on the other hand, are 
stubbornly retained for many generations, even with the greatest variations in the conditions of 
life. Relatively, as compared with those traits that change easily, inherited traits of the latter kind 
may be considered immutable. But if they were acquired owing to the influence of special 
conditions of life, it would be impossible to understand why they should not be capable of 
changing under the influence of altered conditions of life. 

Many scientists distinguish between race traits proper, in man, which are said to be absolutely 
unchanging, such as the color of the eyes, the hair, the skin, the shape of the skull; and secondary 
or fluctuating properties, such as bodily stature, bone structure, muscular system, fatty tissue, etc. 



16 



No doubt there is a difference between race traits of these two kinds. But perhaps this difference 
should be ascribed solely to the fact that the conditions bringing about the fluctuating properties 
are more susceptible and more swiftly susceptible to change than those causing the apparently 
immutable race traits. The former may change so quickly as to enable us to observe their 
influence without difficulty. The other conditions we do not even know, perhaps for the reason 
that they do not change perceptibly within the period of our observations. But we cannot say of 
any race trait that it is absolutely unchanging; such a trait would be the sole unchanging 
phenomenon in this changing world. 

On this point, Fishberg says: 

"Recent investigations have led to a modification or even complete abandonment of the theory of 
the constancy and persistence of race traits. For a long time, some anthropologists have 
maintained that the external environment, particularly the nutrition, the social and geographical 
surroundings, have a powerful influence on the modification of some traits, such as musculature, 
stature, etc. Many even go so far as to say that these agencies may alter pigmentation and head- 
form. Ridgeway, going further, assumes that the duration of human types in a certain region, and 
over long periods, is an expression not of the influence of heredity, but of environment, and that, 
on the other hand, modifications of the human form found in the Mediterranean region, and in 
central and northwest Africa, may be traced back to differences of climate, soil and national 
products. 

"This theory of the decisive influence of environment on the alteration or modification of basic 
somatic traits may easily be applied to some of the race traits ... In some regions it has been 
found that the soil has a powerful influence on the stature of the inhabitants; for instance, the 
great height of persons inhabiting the State of Kentucky is very probably to be explained by the 
presence of hard water in this region. Similarly (according to Rose), the stature of the population 
in Gotha, Germany, has been undergoing changes since the introduction of hard water. 
Observations have also been made on the influence of environment on the head-form - a trait 
that has hitherto been considered immutable under all circumstances ... 

"Professor Franz Boas, of New York, recently arrived at the conclusion, based on his 
investigations, that the absolute persistence of human types is an untenable theory. His 
investigations of the physical characteristics of immigrants have revealed an extremely 
interesting condition; he finds that the children of immigrants are of higher stature and better 
bodily development than their parents born in Europe. He has also discovered a very remarkable 
alteration in the head-form of children born in America after their parents had landed. Even a 
child born abroad, and not more than one year old on its arrival in America, will retain the 
foreign head-form. But a child born in America, though only a few months after the parents have 
landed, has the American head-form." f71 

Other investigators before Boas had found that the whites in the United States acquire more and 
more Indian traits in the course of a few generations, thus becoming "Indianized". 

But it would be premature to infer from these facts that the American milieu will ultimately 
make Indians of the whites. 



17 



Even among animals, the milieu is only one of the circumstances determining somatic forms and 
physical these conditions will strength. Other things being equal, produce both; but these 
conditions also include the organism on which the milieu is working. The same milieu will not 
necessarily influence different organisms in the same way, but may have different effects on 
each. If various races are transplanted from the milieus producing them, into a new environment, 
they will all be changed by this environment, but not necessarily all in the same way. 

The American conditions may have a different effect on a white man than on a Mongolian or on 
a Negro. 

Other factors enter also, however, which make the race problem in the case of man much more 
complicated even than among animals. 



Footnotes 

L Charles Darwin, The Variation of Animals and Plants under Domestication, London 1876, 
vol.i, pp.46, 46; vol.ii, pp.220, 222. 

2. Charles Darwin, The Origin of Species, Harvard Classics Edition, Chap.iv, p. 140. 

3. Die Verbreitung der Tierwelt, Leipzig, 1902. 

4. Brehm: Tierleben. 

5. Ibid. 

6. Tschulok, Entwicklungstheorie, Stuttgart, J.H.W. Dietz 1912. 

7. Fishberg, German edition, pp. et seq. 



18 



Chapter III 

The Races of Man 

We have found that the races of animals in the natural condition, and the races of domestic 
animals, are two very different things. It would, therefore, be erroneous to apply to one of these 
groups observations made in the case of the other. 

The pure race of domestic animals may always be traced back to a specific parent couple. A 
specific race (variety) of wild animals may be traced to a certain region. The naive view of 
primitive peoples derived each species of wild animals from a specific parent couple as they also 
derived each nation from such a couple. When the Deluge was impending,, Noah, in order to 
preserve the animal creation, took of each species "a male and his female" into the Ark, later 
liberating them again. We are not told how the carnivorous animals kept alive when only two 
specimens of each variety of herbivorous animals were available. 

Primitive though this view may be, it still prevails to a great extent even in present-day thinking. 
In the case of related varieties and species, we still speak of a "common blood", a common 
descent. 

Darwin says: 

"All the individuals of the same species, and all the species of the same genus, or even higher 
group, must have descended from common parents; and therefore, in however distant and 
isolated parts of the world they are now found, they must, in the course of successive 
generations, have passed from some one part to the others." JT[ 

This common descent from a single parent couple, which may be observed in races produced 
artificially, is extremely improbable in the case of natural species. 

We know nothing of the origin of life, but we must assume that, like all other phenomena, this 
origin is subject to the law that like causes under like circumstances will always produce like 
effects. As soon as the conditions and causes of organic life were present on earth, it is not 
probable that an isolated speck of albumen took shape, with living functions, multiplying its 
number by growth and fission, thus becoming the parent of all existing organisms, but we must 
assume that primitive organisms, however we may conceive their shape - were formed in all 
places in which the conditions for their existence were given - and that they immediately 
expanded and peopled their entire "nutrition area". They began to multiply as soon as suitable 
areas were available, and they began to assume varying forms as these areas, and with them the 
conditions of life, became more manifold. Each new higher species therefore must have been 
present in numerous specimens from its very beginning. 

And we must make this assumption even in the case of the highest forms. We have no evidence 
that humanity is descended from a single couple of ape-men. It is more probable that the 
evolution proceeded on the basis of an entire species of ape-like animals, which had become 
subject to conditions bringing about their development into humans. Common racial traits among 
animals in the natural condition do not therefore by any means point to a common origin - not to 



19 



the remotest degree - in a single parent couple, and therefore not to blood relationship. But it 
may be assumed that a great number of them are more or less closely related. The number of 
blood relations within a variety will probably be the greater, the longer this variety has been in 
existence and the smaller the territory now inhabited by it. 

The varieties of an animal species in the natural state within a certain region are extremely 
limited; therefore, there is only one such variety in a specific region, and this variety does not 
change as long as the conditions of the region remain the same. The races of a species of 
domestic animals within a certain region may, on the other hand, be quite numerous. They are 
being constantly transformed, become constantly more numerous, and become more and more 
different from the primitive race from which they take their origin. 

This condition is brought about by the fact that man is able to provide an artificial environment 
for the animal races shaped by him, thus abolishing in great measure the effects of the natural 
environment. In the case of animals in the natural state, the organism is adapted to its life 
conditions: in the case of domestic conditions, the life conditions are adapted to the organism 
which man is breeding in accordance with his needs. High-breed domestic animals could 
probably no longer exist without the aid of man. 

This new kind of adaptation - not of the organism to its environment, but of the environment to 
the organism - conducted by man for his domestic animals, he, of course, applies in the highest 
degree when dealing with himself. It is this process which causes man to cease to be a wild 
animal, but it does not make him a domestic animal. 

In the accommodation of its life conditions to the organism, the domestic animal is purely 
passive; this adaptation is undertaken by man for the animal. Man is the active element in the 
process. But the animal ceases to be an end in itself. Its organism becomes subservient to the 
purposes of man. But, like the animal in the wild state, man knows no higher end than himself; 
he alters his milieu to suit himself. 

To be sure, the purpose served by man may not be exclusively his own personality. Even among 
animals in the natural state there are social animals, among whom the individual cannot exist for 
itself alone, or at least it cannot exist fully for itself alone; each is obliged to cooperate with 
others; its welfare depends on the welfare of the social group to which it belongs. Society is 
higher than the individual; its purposes are higher than those of the individual. 

Even in the animal world, the dependence of the individual on the group to which it belongs is 
carried to a high stage. It is probably not an accident that precisely those animal species were 
best fitted to become domestic animals which were able to subordinate their individuality to an 
outer compulsion. In the case of man, the social cohesion, owing to language and economy, is 
much closer than in most animals - perhaps excepting bees and ants. The individual's 
dependence on society increases. But great as may be the occasional contradiction between the 
interests of the totality and those of the individual, in the case of man, the social interests are 
always human interests, and are therefore always directly or indirectly the interests of the 
individual himself. We are here dealing with a primitive, simple society, and are therefore 
disregarding class differences. 



20 



Removal from the natural state usually has not the same effect on man as on the other animals. 
This removal is man's own work, the product of his knowledge of the conditions of life, of his 
mental superiority over the rest of organic nature. It is the outcome of his ability to strengthen 
and variegate his organs of sensual perception and motion by means of artificial organs, and 
thereby to surmount the obstacles in surrounding nature to a greater extent than he could in the 
natural condition, i.e., aided by his bodily organs alone. Each new advance in this field, each 
victory over a natural barrier, makes man face a new difficulty, new problems, but also provides 
him with new, hitherto unknown means and knowledge for their solution. The natural 
environment to which the organisms of wild animals are adapted do not change in historical 
times, i.e., as measured in human records. The artificial environment adapted by man to his own 
organism, has been changing considerably in historical times. Doubtless nature also is in 
constant flux, but the rate of change is imperceptible, as measured by the advances in the 
evolution of technology and social forms among men. The natural environment of wild animals 
may therefore be considered unchanging as compared with the constantly changing artificial 
environment of man. 

This environment is adapted to the needs of the human organism. But it also has its effect on this 
organism. It makes no new demands on most of the bodily organs, perhaps even reduces the 
number of its former demands; for example, in the case of the teeth, which may deteriorate as a 
result. But it makes more and more demands on those organs which have created this 
environment, the organs of cognition and judgment, or, in other words, of mental activity in 
general. 

In the natural state, the same situations repeat themselves again and again with very slight 
differences for each animal species, so long as no alterations ensue in the environment. The 
experiences, judgments and actions arising from these situations therefore tend to uniformity, to 
become fixed habits. And, like other acquired characteristics, habits practised for generations and 
turning out to be expedient for the organism, finally become hereditary; they become impulses, 
instincts, which are followed without thought. 

In the case of man, the instinctive life is more and more forced into the background, as the 
natural environment is replaced by an artificial environment and as the changes in the latter 
proceed more and more rapidly, as they introduce more and more new problems, which cannot 
be solved without careful investigation. The organs of mental activity are therefore made to deal 
with more and more varied new tasks, are put to more and more exertion and thus develop more 
and more. The demands made upon the mental organs are of increasing complexity and variety; 
likewise, the manner in which these organs are called upon to act. Simultaneously, the relations 
of men to each other, both between individuals and tribes, become quite varied, with the result 
that the most manifold possibilities arise for mental development. The organs of the human spirit 
become the most valuable, but also the most adaptable of all organs, those subject to the swiftest 
and most powerful transformations. 

We find an opposite evolutionary trend among domestic animals, the development of whose 
organs depends on man. But from most of these animals man asks only more meat, milk, wool, 
eggs, traction power; he rarely asks increased intelligence, never independent judgment. Aside 
from dogs, the progress of breeding, in the case of domestic animals, is accompanied by a 



21 



decrease of intelligence, and even in the case of the dog, it is doubtful whether the "noblest" 
races are also the most intelligent. 

As man's intelligence and technology improve, he becomes more able to offer resistance to the 
influences of the life conditions surrounding him. He may, therefore, when geographical 
conditions change, maintain his hereditary somatic traits, his racial peculiarities, better than in 
the natural condition. This reduces the effect of accommodation in man, and emphasises that of 
heredity. But this applies only to the somatic traits in the narrower sense, not to the organs of 
mental life, which, when enhanced in sensitiveness and variability, at once react to any alteration 
in the life conditions. 

But in the case of man, a change, not only in the artificial conditions of life, but also in those that 
are natural, may easily ensue, while such changes are rare in the natural state. In nature, we have 
usually only slow changes, alterations over geological periods, such as in ice ages, in the rising 
and subsiding of continents, which cause important and permanent migrations of animal species. 
Such processes take place so slowly that the organisms concerned are eliminated almost 
imperceptibly, step by step, thus facilitating their adaptation to the new conditions of 
neighbouring regions. Man, however, acquires means of locomotion enabling him to cover great 
distances with increasing speed, and his technology in the winning of foodstuffs, the 
manufacturing of clothing, the construction of houses, the uses of fuel, illumination, etc., enable 
him to enter regions in which he could not possibly maintain himself in his natural state. 

But with the possibility of undertaking swift and extended journeys, man's desire for such 
journeys is awakened. In the natural state, the fruitfulness of each species of organisms is 
adapted to its life conditions, with a resulting state of equilibrium between the various species. 
My book on increase and evolution takes up this question more in detail. I am here obliged 
merely to suggest this thought, like so many others. 

Man's technology disturbs this condition of equilibrium. His fruitfulness is now subject to 
changing conditions, likewise his mortality. This may sometimes lead to the dying out of certain 
tribes, while at other times it may cause so extensive an increase as to deprive posterity of the 
necessary space in the home country. Later, the attraction of certain regions for strangers also is 
an element, even when such strangers are not driven from their homes by overpopulation. This 
attraction itself depends on the evolution of technology and economy and may be of varying 
nature. River constructions or improvements in navigation may render the shores of rivers or the 
coasts of oceans, formerly desolate and inaccessible, so attractive as to make them a goal for 
poorer tribes. In our own days, the gold resources of Alaska have caused a migration into that 
region. 

The most varied causes and opportunities for migrations arise. The same race may now be found 
living in the most varied regions and climates. These migrations may proceed so swiftly, and be 
so temporary, as to preclude any possibility of the race's adaptation to the new conditions, its 
acquisition of new hereditary traits. But even when a migration leads to permanent settlement in 
a new region, the artificial environment created by man in that region will be so powerful as to 
enable it to resist the influence of the natural environment over periods that may be of relatively 
considerable duration. 



22 



We know nothing of man in the natural state. Even the most primitive men we know have a 
certain technology. We do not know whether man in the natural state inhabited only a specific 
region of uniform character, or several regions with varying character, whether he then 
constituted a single geographical race or several such. At any rate, his race character must have 
been entirely dependent on nature. 

Technical and economic progress then creates two different tendencies. Increased impulses and 
opportunities for migrations induce many races gradually to spread over the most varied regions; 
the varying natural conditions of the new environments have an influence in the direction of 
substituting changed race traits for old race traits, of substituting for the old race, or placing by 
its side - if not all of the race has emigrated - a group of new races. The alteration in race traits 
takes place either directly, through the influence of natural factors: heat, cold, drought, moisture, 
light, darkness, etc.; or, indirectly, through the struggle against these factors, through the use of 
certain organs, disuse of others. Depending on the development of technology and of the social 
conditions, this struggle may assume different forms, and in the same region may therefore 
produce various race types among varying modes of production. If a steppe becomes inhabited 
by fugitive nomads, it will produce different traits in these nomads from those produced in a later 
population with a sufficiently developed technology to enable it to transform the steppe into 
fruitful farm land by means of irrigation, and therefore cultivating this land as a permanent 
peasantry. 

Therefore, the advances in technology and the migrations increase the number of race differences 
and create new geographical races. On the other hand, however, technology, beyond a certain 
level, may retard the formation of such races. The higher the evolution of human technology, the 
more independent becomes the race of the nature of the environment. The race may maintain its 
character in the most varied regions, even such as have no similarity with the region in which the 
race originated. Thus, we find Europeans, Chinese, Negroes, in the most varied parts of the 
world, living under the most different climates. 

But no matter how highly developed its technology, no race can permanently and completely 
escape from the influence of the environment. It may most easily escape from the organic 
environment, the flora and fauna, which may be changed rather easily by human intervention. On 
the other hand, the influence of telluric factors - altitude above sea level, configuration of the 
soil, quantity of sunlight, heat, cold-can never be entirely eliminated. 

But even here our remarks refer only to somatic race traits proper. Even the most temporary 
change in the location of a race, producing no alteration in the physical appearance, may, by 
opening up new regions, with new conditions, produce new impressions, new problems, may not 
be without effect on the mental life, and therefore also on its organs, whose quality, like that of 
any organ, depends on the degree and nature of their use. The more diligently the race applies 
itself to resist the influence of the new milieu, the more its somatic race traits are thus retained, 
the more will its organs of mental life be exerted in a new manner and consequently be subject to 
change under the influence of the new environment. 

The possibility that a race may pass beyond the geographical boundaries set up by nature, that 
therefore the human races may cease to be geographical races, like the varieties of animals in the 



23 



natural state, often leads - and has led more and more of late - to the presence of a number of 
races in the same region, living together more or less amicably. There results a new possibility 
which is very exceptional in the natural state, namely, that of race mixture, which may at times 
lead to the creation of new races, but very often merely disintegrates the old races, for which it 
substitutes a conglomeration of the most varied ingredients. This process of race mixture has 
been going on for tens of thousands, perhaps hundreds of thousands, of years: 

"The present presents millions of cases of this, as did also the past, and there is no such thing as 
an unmixed race on this small planet with its easy communications ... On this earth, all the races 
gradually merge into each other, and each race is composed of various subdivisions." [2] 

The further a race is removed from its original habitations and its original conditions, the greater 
its migrations, the richer its history, the more developed its commerce; in other words, the higher 
its status, the more will be the opportunities it has had for race mixture, the less will it retain of 
its original "race"; the more has it ceased to be a "pure" race, and the more varied will be the 
race elements of other provenience which it has absorbed. Unless the rather permanent influence 
of uniform natural conditions in a certain region has opposed this manifold character and tended 
to create a new homogeneous geographical race, cross -breedings and atavism in such a 
population will produce the greatest variety of somatic, and particularly, of mental, traits, the 
latter being far more variable than the former. The higher the technical and social stages of 
evolution, therefore, the smaller will be the influence of the natural conditions. 

But social progress produces not only a tendency to dissolve the old traditional forms, but also 
gives rise to factors tending to create new types within a population. This is brought about by the 
division of labour, which is but rarely found in the animal kingdom - again excepting bees and 
ants - but which attains considerable proportions in human society and becomes one of the most 
important bases of its progress. 

The division into callings sometimes becomes a division into classes, ruling and ruled classes, 
exploiting and exploited. The division of labour finally leads to a division of society into workers 
and non-workers. Such divisions result in the formation of groups within a people, each of which 
makes use of its natural organs differently, or makes use of different organs, and in their living 
each under different conditions, in a different environment. Under these circumstances, each of 
these groups acquires its special properties; sometimes somatic traits, but chiefly mental traits, 
for the economic and social divisions create more differences in mental aptitudes than of 
occupation in those that are physical in the narrower sense. 

We have already observed that the same race, by scattering over various regions, with different 
modes of production, may suffer changes. We now find that the same race, within the same 
region, may present such divisions, owing to economic influences. On the other hand, similarity 
of occupation may impress the same trait upon members of different races and tend to eliminate 
such differences as may have been present. 

Ratzel, for instance, observes: "In many cases, when we speak of 'race', it would be better to 
speak of 'class'. Throughout all peoples, somatic differences accompany the division into castes, 
which division is the more emphatic, the further removed the races are from culture and freedom 



24 



... The distribution of skin pigment most frequently accompanies differences of castes, for 
obvious reasons ... We cannot trace the precise scale of colour dividing the upper and lower 
classes upon one and the same island. Cook and Forster state that the former are lighter in colour, 
also taller and more refined in bearing. G. Forster, in his exaggerated manner, imagines that 
these nobles are so far ahead of the ordinary man as to appear an entirely different type of 
human. Yet, he expressly emphasises the relation between a lighter skin and delicate features 
with a more comfortable, inactive mode of life. But he found in the mind and character of these 
individuals a certain refinement, if not a certain nobility. The nobles, being both chieftains and 
priests, were also the will-power and the intelligentsia of Polynesia, with a monopoly of 
knowledge and of philosophy based on knowledge." [3J Such is Ratzel's view of this question. 

Different classes may assume the character of different races. On the other hand, the meeting of 
many races, each developing an occupation of its own, may lead to their taking up various 
callings or social positions within the same community; race becomes class. Particularly frequent 
is the case of a poor but warlike nomadic race attacking a prosperous, peaceful peasant 
population and subjecting it, the former race then assuming the function of a warrior nobility 
with a monopoly of national defence. This nobility will develop exclusively warlike properties, 
despise productive labour, and the workers will become poor, badly nourished, defenceless, and 
unmilitant, which qualities may, in some cases, develop to the point of cowardice. 

When race traits coincide with vocational traits, they are further sharpened and intensified by the 
division of labour. 

On the other hand, the intensification of a property acquired in vocational life or class life into a 
race trait may be encouraged by the fact that the members of a class or of a calling are forced to 
marry only within their own group. This may be in part a consequence of the arrogance of the 
upper class, which despises the other classes, but it may also result from reasons of selection: the 
ruling class wishes to preserve undiminished its predominant qualities, by which it has obtained 
power, and therefore seeks to avoid any mingling with other groups, lacking in such qualities. 
The heredity of the traits of the dominant class must be rendered safe. On the other hand, groups 
that have been depressed to the lowest level are prohibited from mingling with, the rest of the 
population, in order that the latter may not be contaminated with the defects of these outcasts. 

As in the case of domestic animals it is also sought to conserve predominant traits among the 
classes by maintaining the race "pure". But man is not a domestic animal, and purity of race 
encounters many difficulties in the human existence. 

It is not sufficient, in the case of domestic animals, that the stud-animals be preserved from 
breeding with foreign species. Even among these race animals, it is always the best specimens 
that are chosen and used as reproducing animals. The others, less excellent, are often destroyed 
and always excluded from reproduction. 

But no class among humans may proceed so harshly toward its own members, no matter how far 
superior the class interest may appear in its eyes to that of the individual. A class often arrogates 
to itself, or bestows upon the child's father, the right to decide whether the child is to be brought 
up or killed. The Christian order of Teutonic Knights were freed from the necessity of making 



25 



this choice by their opportunity to put into a monastery weak or unwarlike boys, and thus prevent 
them from producing legitimate offspring. But these methods of selection were not always 
applied in accordance with considerations of breeding only, often being crossed by other 
considerations. A father desiring an heir, and not having obtained one that was healthy, probably 
did not kill his weak child, but brought him up, and instead of condemning him to celibacy may 
even have married him off. 

In order to preserve the race pure as a class, it is necessary to have complete control of the sexual 
life of woman - not of man. The man's illegitimate offspring do not become members of the 
ruling class, but adultery on the part of the legitimate wife, unless discovered, impairs the purity 
of the race. The freer woman is, the easier it will be for her to commit adultery. Lack of freedom 
for the woman, when it goes so far as to shut her up in a harem, like a cow in a stable, is always 
associated with polygamy, but since the number of women everywhere is about equal to that of 
men, it implies that women not belonging to the ruling class may be elevated to the status of 
wife. Furthermore, even the woman in the harem is by no means a cow in a stable and 
completely deprived of her freedom of action. Even such a woman may find opportunities for 
adultery, as was already observed by the Sultan Scheherban, who said there was only one means 
of assuring oneself of a woman's fidelity: killing her after the first embrace. 

If, in spite of all these obstacles, the purity of a race is maintained intact, further misfortune 
threatens from inbreeding. Inbreeding may remain harmless for long periods, when only healthy 
individuals are chosen for reproduction. The exploiting class, which has consolidated its power 
and controls great wealth, is, however, likely to yield to a life of idle enjoyment, with its 
degenerating results. When this is the case, inbreeding still further accentuates decay, and it does 
this the more, the purer the race. 

We thus find that the phenomenon of race is far more complicated in man than in the animal 
world. The sharpness of race demarcation, which is evident in the case of animals, disappears 
more and more among men. In the place of sharply distinct races, unchanged for long periods, 
we find a constant and increasingly rapid process of race disintegration; the formation of new 
races, race mixtures, conditioned by the general process of technical, economic, social evolution, 
arising from this process and closely interlaced with it. It becomes more and more difficult to 
distinguish between inherited properties and those acquired by the individual; races become 
more manifold, also the race traits, more and more varied are the individuals within each human 
group, more and more variable and important become the extremely changeable mental traits, 
instead of the less easily changing somatic traits; these mental traits cannot be completely 
defined by any measurement, and may often be inferred only from the most fugitive 
observations. 

There is probably no more difficult task than that of observing the influence of race, as an 
isolated factor, in any specific phenomenon of human history. The task becomes the more 
difficult and - at least for our present ways and means of investigation - more hopeless, the more 
we advance in history, the more the races mingle, the more varied and powerful become the 
artificial conditions under which they live. 



26 



Our race theoreticians regard that which is perhaps the most complicated problem in human 
history as the simple and self-evident explanation of this history. The concept of race, extremely 
fluctuating even in the case of animal and vegetable organisms, where it is not complicated, is 
regarded by them as a firm basis upon which the entire theory and practice of human society may 
be built up without hesitation. 



Footnotes 

L Charles Darwin, The Origin of Species, New York 1860, p.400. 

2. Ratzel: Anthropogeographie, vol.ii, p. 587. 

3. Ratzel, op. cit., vol.ii, pp.690, 691. 



27 



Chapter IV 

Differences and Oppositions Between The Races of Man 

WHILE the literary and journalistic race theoreticians regard the concept of race in the case of 
man as something self-evident, natural scientists are by no means agreed on the division of 
human races, but are obliged to admit that everything is in a state of flux. Darwin tells us 

"Our naturalist would likewise be much disturbed as soon as he should discern that the 
distinctive traits of man are extremely variable ... We may doubt whether any trait may be 
adduced that is distinctive and constant for a certain race ... The form of the skull varies 
considerably in certain races; likewise every other trait ... The races of man graduate into each 
other, independently, in many cases, as far as we can judge, of their having intercrossed. Man 
has been studied more thoroughly than any other organic being, and yet there is the greatest 
possible diversity amongst capable judges whether he should be classed as a single species or 
race, or as two (Virey), as three (Jacquinot), as four (Rant), five (Blumenbach), six (Buffon), 
seven (Hunter), eight (Agassiz), eleven (Dickering), fifteen (Bory St. Vincent), sixteen 
(Desmoulins), twenty-two (Morton), sixty (Crawfurd), or sixty-three (Burke)." |T1 

These words were written half a century ago, but are just as applicable today. In their 
embarrassment, many anthropologists finally resort to the device of classifying a series of races 
not by their somatic traits, but by language, concerning which Ernst Hackel maintains with a 
straight face that it "is transmitted far more rigidly than the skull forms" [21 

Of course, the only thing inherited is the ability to speak, not the specific language. Language is 
acquired, the earliest and most important teachers being the persons among whom the individual 
grows up when a child, not necessarily the parents in every case. Owing to migrations, to altered 
environment, to contacts with strange peoples, the ancestral language may be forgotten, and a 
foreign language acquired, while the native pigmentation of hair, eyes, skin, the form of the nose, 
etc., are not lost. Any races may, without in any way changing their racial character, change their 
language and, vice versa, the most different races may appear in succession in a certain region, 
each supplanting the other, and each receiving its language from its predecessors. In present-day 
Greece, practically the same Greek language is spoken as two or three thousand years ago, and 
yet, how many races have succeeded each other in that country! On the other hand, the Irish have 
abandoned their Celtic language in the course of the last few centuries, without noticeably 
changing their "race". If language were a race trait, the Negroes of the United States would have 
to be counted as Anglo-Saxons, and many Negroes and Indians of Central and South America as 
Latins. In fact, some Negroes would also have to be classified as Germans. A German scientist 
was much surprised to encounter, in the primeval Brazilian forest, a Negro who spoke Low 
German. His master was a colonist who had immigrated to Brazil from the Waterkant, a part of 
Germany where Low German is spoken. 

As a matter of fact, language is even less an indication of race than skin, hair, or head-form. 
There is no Semitic race, there is no Aryan race. The Aryan race is not a primitive race, but 
merely an "invention of the closeted scholar." [3J 



28 



This does not mean that language may not be of great importance in defining the groups of 
mankind. Language is their means of communication, of social cooperation. When men speak 
the same language, it is easy for them to live and work together. When brought together by the 
material conditions of life and labour, they must seek to make themselves understood by each 
other by means of a common language. Thus, language is in a state of constant and close 
interaction with the compass of this social grouping of men; it becomes one of the most 
important means of uniting and segregating men; and the study of old linguistic survivals may at 
times help us in reconstructing the history of social groupings in periods that afford no other 
evidence on this point. It is no doubt justifiable to divide mankind according to language groups, 
but this division by no means coincides with the division according to race. Originally, while 
each race of man represented a geographical race, a human group inhabiting certain regions for 
many thousands of years, under like conditions, each race may also have developed a type of 
language peculiar to itself, a language dividing off into many dialects. A common language tree 
points in the first place to a former common home, and to the common life conditions of this 
home, and, in very primitive peoples, to membership in the same geographical race. But there is 
probably not a single tribe today that inhabits the primitive seats in which the language now 
spoken by this tribe was formed, without any mixture with other tribes. The more varied its 
wanderings, its mingling with other races, its historical destinies, the more will language and 
race become independent of each other. And, as the means of intercourse grow, as the groups of 
men become larger and larger who are united by their economy in permanent social cooperation, 
the sooner will very different races and race mixtures be embraced in a single linguistic and 
cultural group. On the other hand, this same increase in the means of intercourse, as the members 
of the same race are drawn into the most different regions of the earth, attaching them to the 
most different human communities, must divide many races into a number of linguistically 
different sections, so that many descendants of the same race will understand each other less and 
less, will become mentally less and less connected with each other. 

Language as a race trait is therefore of no value. 

And modern anthropologists are of quite different opinion on the matter of race from those 
"anthropo- sociologists" who term themselves thus because they know as little of anthropology as 
of sociology. Professor Felix von Luschan, of Berlin, presented a very interesting outline of the 
"anthropological view of race" at the First General Racial Congress held in London in 1911. We 
are giving his remarks in some detail, including those in which excellent light is thrown upon the 
pseudo-scientific race conceit of our colonial fanatics of the Rohrbach type. Luschan said, 
among other things 

"Coloured people are often described as savage races, but it is comparatively rare to find any 
attempts to give a proper definition of coloured and savage. 

"A certain order issued by a European governor in Africa once stated what Negroes, Arabs, 
Hindus, Portuguese, Greeks, and other coloured people had to do on meeting a white man, and in 
the German Reichstag one of the successors of Bismarck once spoke of the Samoans as a 
'handful of savages'. Again, many books have been written on the differences between races of 
men, and serious scientists have tried in vain to draw up an exact definition of what really 
constitutes the difference between savage and civilised races. It is very easy to speak of 'Greeks 



29 



and other coloured people'; but some assign the ancient Greeks to the civilised races, and are so 
severe in their division as to exclude from that group the ancient Romans as half-barbarians. 

"The division of mankind into active and passive races is an old one. Since then an attempt was 
made to put 'twilight' races between the 'day' races and the 'night' races, and the Japanese were 
included in this group of Ddmmerungsmenschen, - the Japanese, who are now in the van of 
human civilisation in Asia, and who have, perhaps, saved the mental freedom of Europe at 
Tsushima and on the battlefields of Manchuria. 

"Still weaker and more objectionable is the division as to colour. We now know that colour of 
hair and skin is only the effect of environment, and that we are fair only because our ancestors 
lived for thousands, or probably tens of thousands, of years in sunless and foggy countries. 
Fairness is nothing else but lack of pigment, and our ancestors lost part of their pigment because 
they did not need it. Just as the Proteus sanguineus and certain beetles became blind in caves, 
where their eyes were useless, so we poor fair people have to wear dark glasses and gloves when 
walking on a glacier, and get our skin burned when we expose it unduly to the light of the sun. 

"It is therefore only natural that certain Indian races and the Singhalese are dark; but it would be 
absurd to call them 'savage' on that account, as they have an ancient civilisation, and had a noble 
and refined religion at a time when our own ancestors had a very low standard of life." [41 

With the aid of many examples, Luschan then shows that the alleged inferiority of savages is in 
many cases only an apparent inferiority, the proofs adduced in favour of this inferiority being 
often merely a consequence of the simplicity and impatience of their observers, who inferred the 
absence of intelligence where intelligence was absent only from the observers. Luschan 
continues, in the same paper from which we have already quoted: 

"In former times it was not so much the mental and material culture of foreign races as their 
anatomical qualities, which were taken as the starting point, in showing their inferiority. 
Especially in America, before the Civil War, anthropology (or what they called by that name) 
was engaged in showing that the Negro, with his black skin, his prognathism, his blubber-lips 
and his short and broad nose, was no real human being but a domestic animal. How to treat him 
was the owner's private affair; it was nobody else's business, any more than the treatment of his 
cattle or horses. 

"Even today there are scientists who claim a separate origin for the various human types, and 
who link one palaeolithic race to the Gorilla and another to the Orang. The author of 
Anthropozoon biblicum goes still further and wants us to believe that the dark races are the 
descendants of incestuous intercourse between 'Aryans' and monkeys. But the great majority of 
our modern authorities now claim a monogenetic origin for all of mankind. 

"So the question of the number of human races has quite lost its raison d'etre, and has become a 
subject rather of philosophical speculation than of scientific research. It is of no more importance 
now to know how many human races there are than to know how many angels can dance on the 
point of a needle. Our aim now is to find out how ancient and primitive races developed from 
others, and how races have changed or evolved through migration or interbreeding. 



30 



"We do not yet know where the first man began to develop from earlier stages of zoological 
existence ... We shall probably not be far from the truth if we say that the Palaeolithic man of 
Europe was not, essentially different from the modern Australian. If we are allowed to draw 
conclusions as to the soft parts from the parts of the skeleton, our Palaeolithic ancestor had dark 
skin, dark eyes, and dark, more or less, straight hair. His home was probably in some part of 
Southern Asia; but we find similar types even now among the Toala of Celebes and the Veddas 
of Ceylon. In fact, millions of dark men in India belong to the same stock, and so do all the dark 
tribes of Afghanistan and Beluchistan. 

"So we can trace an early and primitive type of mankind from Gibraltar, Moustier, Spy, 
Neandertal, Kropina, etc., to Ceylon, Celebes, and Australia. This certainly is a wide area, but 
every year is now bringing fresh proofs of this direct continuity of a distinct human type from the 
earliest paloeolithic ages to modern times. 

"The question naturally arises how it is that our Australian brothers have remained for fifty or a 
hundred thousand years, or longer, in such a primitive state of mental and material culture, while 
we Europeans have reached the height of modern civilisation. The answer is not difficult. 
Australia was isolated from the rest of the world through an early geological catastrophe soon 
after the immigration of palaeolithic man. Every impulse and incentive from without ceased, and 
human life began to petrify. 

"It was quite otherwise in Europe and in Western Asia. The thousand advantages of the 
environment, the broken coastlines, the many islands, the navigable rivers, and especially the 
constant passing from Asia to Europe and from Europe to Asia and Africa, the ready exchange of 
inventions and discoveries and acquisitions, the incessant trade and traffic, have made us what 
we are. 

"This primitive but uniform human type began to change chiefly in two directions. To the 
southwest of the line connecting Gibraltar with Australia, man, in some way or other, developed 
curly and woolly hair, and so became what we now call Protonigritian. We find his descendants 
in Melanesia and in Africa. The Pygmies form a very old branch of this protonigritic group ... 

"On the other side of this line, in Northern Asia, primitive man acquired, during many thousands 
of years, straight hair and a shorter or broader skull. The modern Chinese, and the typical, now 
nearly extinct, American Indians, are at the end of this northeastern line of development, while 
the typical Negro represents the southwestern end. 

"We have thus three chief varieties of mankind - the old Indo-European, the African, and the 
East-Asiatic, all branching off from the same primitive stock, diverging from each other for 
thousands, perhaps hundreds of thousands, of years, but all these forming a complete unity, 
intermarrying in all directions without the slightest decrease infertility. 

"From these three varieties came all the different types of modern mankind, generally by local 
isolation. A very interesting example of such mutation is found in the earliest known inhabitants 
of Western Asia. This is the land of those extremely narrow and high-arched noses, we generally 
call Jewish or even Semitic. These remarkable noses, however, do not belong to the Semitic 



31 



invaders, of whom Abraham is the eponymic hero, but to the pre-Semitic population which 
might be called Hittite or Armenoid, as the modern Armenians are their direct descendants. 

"These old Hittites or Armenoids emigrated in very early times to Europe, where the 'Alpine 
Race' descended from them. In the most out-of-the-way valleys of Savoy, Graubiinden, Tyrol, 
and Carinthia, more than half of the population has the head-form and the nose of this second 
immigration from Asia to Europe, and from the mingling of this short-headed 'Alpine Race' with 
the descendants of the long-headed Palaeolithic or Neanderthal or proto- Australian Race, all the 
great modern European races have sprung. 

"While the first varieties of primitive man were certainly formed and fixed by long isolation, 
later variations were caused by migration and colonisation ... 

"In former times ethnologists used to admire the apparent unity in the direction of the human 
mind, and to wonder how it was that in all parts of the earth men had similar ideas and ways. 
Now this Volkergedanken theory is nearly abandoned, and we are forced to admit the real unity 
of mankind. Fair and dark races, long and short-headed, intelligent and primitive, all come from 
one stock. Favourable circumstances and surroundings, especially a good environment, a 
favourable geographical position, trade and traffic, caused one group to advance more quickly 
than another, while some groups have remained in a very primitive state of development, but all 
are adapted to their surroundings, according to the law of the survival of the fittest." 

This mode of thought can hardly be better characterised than in the words of Luschan, and we 
have therefore given them in full. Essentially, this is the attitude of all of modern anthropology; 
of course, the various scientists differ considerably as to matters of detail, but this does not alter 
their essential agreement. 

But we shall not take up this subject here. The important point is that modern anthropology does 
not consider differences of race to be an impassible gulf. The races are in a state of constant flux 
and transition, all are of the same origin in the long run; none of the dominant races may boast 
that its present superiority is based on its blood and is immutable so long as the race preserves its 
purity. We may not maintain that any of the subject races owes its servitude to a natural 
immutable inferiority. The superiority of one group is to be ascribed only to favourable 
circumstances in the environment, the backwardness of the other group to unfavourable 
circumstances. We may say of any race that under the same favourable circumstances it will 
accomplish as much as the highest races - not necessarily, however, at once. The Teutons 
mentioned by Tacitus lived about one hundred and fifty years after those mentioned by Caesar, 
and seem to have remained just as barbarous as the latter. Fully ten centuries were required, after 
the Teutonic migrations, before society again attained the level of the defunct Graeco-Roman 
civilisation, and further centuries have intervened before the attainment of our present level of 
civilisation. It is sometimes carelessly denied that Negroes have any cultural aptitude because in 
the United States, in the sixty years that have elapsed since their liberation, they have not yet so 
far emerged from the state of barbarism in which they had lived before their liberation, as to 
produce a Darwin or a Kant. And yet, the Negroes in the United States are methodically kept in a 
state of the greatest ignorance, having great difficulty even in obtaining such necessary and 
"inalienable" rights as the most rudimentary schooling. 



32 



Only a few years after the liberation of the Negroes, Hackel considered it his privilege to write: 
"The ulotriches (woolly-haired) are incapable of any true inner culture or of a higher mental 
training, even under such favourable (?) conditions of adaptation as have now been offered them 
in the United States of America." [5J 

A fine view for an "evolutionist" to hold! Truly, Hackel has no ground for this view, which is 
being relinquished more and more by anthropologists, except where the demands of a 
"scientific" pretext for a colonial policy revive such prejudices. 

One thing is no doubt true: the leading races of modern civilisation have advanced with such 
immense rapidity in the last few centuries, particularly in their technology, that their lead has 
become more and more extensive, leaving the backward peoples farther and farther behind along 
the path the latter must follow in order to attain the level of the civilised races. But this by no 
means signifies that the backward peoples will and must continue to remain backward. The rapid 
progress of the European nations since the Sixteenth Century was due only to an expansion of 
trade which brought all the races and peoples of the earth into the closest contact with each other. 
The first effect of this process was to destroy the weakest races, for modern society is based on 
brutal hostilities of interests: it destroyed them body and soul. Some were exterminated, forced 
down into the status of domestic animals and doomed to the stupidity of the latter like the present 
condition of the European proletarians. But this tendency did not everywhere have a permanently 
degrading effect. As in the case of all the more energetic strata of the proletariat, there will also 
come a time for the more energetic of the backward races subjugated by capitalism, when their 
degradation will lead them to rebel against this degradation and thus proceed along an upward 
course. This rise can only be accomplished by taking possession of the mental and material 
weapons by which the "master races" have created their dominant position. The handicap of the 
dominant capitalist nations is too great for any one of the oppressed nations to believe that they 
may overcome it by self-devised means. They hasten to follow the lead of the "more civilised" 
and are gradually catching up with them by means of the processes devised and prepared by the 
leading nations themselves. The backward nations are spared the necessity of this labour of 
seeking and trail-blazing, and they may thus accomplish in a few decades that which required 
many centuries on the part of the leading nations. Of course, in order to achieve this, they must 
relinquish their originality, their original native traits, their spiritual independence. 

Man's teeth have suffered owing to the cooking and the artificial dividing of foodstuffs. His 
memory has very probably suffered owing to his use of writing and printing. Similarly, the 
inventive spirit of the backward peoples is probably being much weakened by their acquisition of 
so many superior inventions ready-made, requiring the use of their full mental powers to absorb 
them. The greater half of mankind is transformed from intelligently investigating creatures into 
imitative creatures, into mere pupils of superior teachers. 

But this also is merely a transient stage, from which each people emerges as soon as it has 
attained the level of modern civilisation, after which it begins to partake actively in this 
civilisation. 

The permanent result of this process of development must finally be a mental similarity of the 
human race, on the basis of this civilisation, in which the already very variable and indefinite 



33 



mental race traits will be far more quickly eradicated than bodily traits, in order to be absorbed in 
anew body of traits, within which other, greater, individual differences wilt arise. Types 
disappear, individualities grow. The point of departure in human evolution was probably a 
uniform human race. This race is divided into an increasing number of races, which is now again 
forming a new community of the human race, but a community of a different kind. Ratzel, in his 
Anthropogeographie, has already mentioned this process, which, like his "negation" and his 
"negation of negation", is a dialectic process resembling that expounded by Marx in Capital, 
there ending with the expropriation of the expropriators. Ratzel's words, taken from the book 
above mentioned, are as follows: 

"The similarity of species in present-day mankind is of far different origin than the similarities 
between the various animal and plant species. The latter similarities are caused by a more and 
more emphatic development of specific traits in a certain definite direction, while mankind has 
become more and more a unit - and will become even more so - by the combination of its 
formerly far diverging groups. These two groups of similarities have therefore come into being 
by entirely different paths, the former by segregation, the latter by conjoining and combining. 
Therefore the former are more limited in area, while the latter embrace the entire earth. And 
therefore these similarities are of different character also. The closed system of animal and plant 
species may be contrasted with the varied character of the branches of mankind, which are based 
on a great mass of reduced or attenuated differences which, however,' tend more and more to 
combine, to make mankind a more unified mass. Present-day humanity may be conceived as 
standing, in time, midway between a humanity of the past, with greater internal differences, 
perhaps even differences of species, and a humanity of the future, with much smaller internal 
differences." [6J 

Ratzel is here concerned chiefly with the effects of race mixture. Like most anthropologists, he 
does not pay sufficient attention to the economic factor. But he is well aware of the tendency of 
evolution, and also of the differences between the race development of animals and that of 
historical man. The future belongs not to a separation of races into exploiting and exploited, or - 
as it is sometimes put more euphemistically - into active and passive, into day races and night 
races, but to a dissolving of races in a single human race. The first step in this direction will be a 
mental combination, an economic equality, from which there must result an increasing "toning 
down or attenuation of differences" - even though esthetes may turn up their noses at this 
possibility. 

Of course, Werner Sombart is one of these esthetes. He considers it imperative to maintain the 
race differences existing between men, for: "Who would want to miss the racy Judiths and 
Miriams? To be sure, they must be racy and ready to remain so. We cannot tolerate this black- 
blond mix-up:" [7] 

And since "we" do not desire any diminution of race traits, the historical process will 
respectfully refrain from touching them. In this connection, Sombart had already forgotten in 
1912 what he was still aware of in 1911, namely, "That when I say: this woman is racy (has 
class), this does not mean the same as when I say: this person belongs to the Mongolian race." 
LSI 



34 



Anthropologists and scientific students in general speak of the Mongolian race; but the concept 
of a "racy" woman is born in those learned circles whose chief interest centres about horses and 
women of a certain class, to whom it transfers the jargon of the stable. 

In spite of all these esthetic individuals, the attenuation of the races can hardly be retarded. 
Capitalism is working with all its might in this development and thus preparing a higher form of 
society by this means also. To socialism falls the task of strengthening the oppressed and 
disinherited against the exploitation of capitalism, of leading them to the victory, in other words, 
of making them not only superior in strength to .their exploiters, but also of making them their 
superiors or at least their equals in mental maturity. 

The result of all this conflict and struggle between the capitalists and the proletarians of the 
advanced nations and the rebellious strata of the backward nations, is not only the international 
solidarity of the proletariat of the civilised nations, but - in the last analysis - the international 
unity of the entire human race in thought and knowledge, in investigation and aspirations. 

Finally we shall behold the realisation of the dictum first uttered as an ideal of the thinkers and 
pioneers of the revolutionary bourgeoisie, the dictum adopted ready-made by the revolutionary 
proletariat 

Alle Menschen, gleich geboren, 
Sind ein adliges Geschlecht. 

This aspiration might still have been considered chimerical some years ago. But in the meantime, 
the victories of the Japanese over Russia have revealed to all the world the extent to which Asia 
has been revolutionised by capitalism and by the uprisings of its nations. These nations, of whom 
it was once assumed that their conservative adherence to the traditional forms of life was of their 
very essence - of the marrow of their bones, as it were, a permanent race trait-have now become 
a revolutionary element in world history. 

Not only the victory of the proletariat of the white races, but also the liberation of the "coloured" 
races, is only a question of time. 

But is not this struggle for liberation a race struggle? Is it not a portion of the uninterrupted 
struggle of the races which has been going on from time immemorial and which must continue to 
be waged because the struggle for existence is a natural necessity? 

We have seen that the struggle for existence in the animal world is almost exclusively a struggle 
against surrounding nature, not against individuals of the same species. In nature, this struggle - 
as a rule - is not even a struggle between different varieties of the same species. For these 
varieties are geographical in their origin, each having its special territory, within which it lives in 
a condition of equilibrium, and which it does not leave unless this equilibrium is disturbed, an 
event therefore traceable to geological eras. 

In the case of man the situation changes. Man's technology destroys the equilibrium in nature 
and also the equilibrium in his own ranks. In many regions we now find overpopulation ensuing, 



35 



combined with a struggle for food resources. But this is not a struggle of race against race, but 
rather at first a struggle waged by the horde against a neighbouring horde which seeks to displace 
it, when all sources of food have been cut off. This cannot be called a race struggle, but a 
struggle within the race. The hordes and tribes were far too small to enable us to consider any 
single one of them as an entire race; each was but a portion of the same race. 

If this condition of overpopulation continues, the movement will probably involve all the tribes 
of a certain region, some of whom must immigrate. These may advance so far as to come into 
hostile contact with hordes or tribes of another race, but the struggle with these groups is at 
bottom no different from that within the same race. At most, the foreign appearance of the 
opponent may accentuate the ruthlessness of the struggle and the completeness of the victory. 
But even here the differences in language and culture, making a mutual understanding, difficult, 
are of greater effect than the differences in race traits. 

As civilisation advances, the social groups develop into states and nations; but even these are by 
no means synonymous with races. We have the simultaneous development of the differences 
between classes and of the oppositions between exploiters and exploited. These oppositions are a 
determining element not only in the internal, but also in the external politics of states. The 
exploiters seek to increase the number of those exploited by them, in order to increase the profits 
of exploitation, either by seizures of men, by slavery, or by the conquest of new regions and by 
the subjection of their inhabitants. The cause for war is no longer overpopulation, but 
exploitation: struggles between exploiters and exploited, or between the exploiters among 
themselves for the ownership of an exploited community. 

The deep roots of these struggles are not to be found in the differences of race, but in the social 
conditions. It is possible that the opposing groups of those interested may be of different races, 
but this is by no means the rule, for it is self-evident that the first persons with whom one comes 
in contact either as exploiter or as one exploited are one's own neighbours. It was quite a 
common thing to find Greek and Italian slaves among the ancient Athenians and Romans, while 
Negro slaves were practically unknown. The relation of exploitation, the opposition of interests, 
does not arise from differences of race, which may only serve as a contributing cause for 
rendering the expressions of this opposition more brutal. 

Even in cases where opposing interested groups belong to different races and, differing even in 
their external earmarks, are brought into savage opposition to each other, we never find a race 
unified in its conflict with another. We are always dealing with individual groups, each of which 
may enter into the most varied combinations with other groups either of its own race or of 
another race. Many of the Negro slaves brought by white traders to America had formerly been 
the slaves of other Negroes who had sold them to the whites. 

The struggle between Indians and "palefaces" in North America may appear to have been a race 
struggle. But the whites, after their arrival in America, did not act as representatives of one and 
the same race, cooperating with each other, but as the representatives of different states, fighting 
each other bitterly. In this struggle, each sought and obtained the assistance of Indian tribes. 
During the entire Eighteenth Century, we find whites struggling against whites in America; 
Frenchmen against Englishmen, later American colonials against Englishmen, and Indians 



36 



against Indians. And where we find Indians fighting the whites, they were often acting on the 
instigation of other whites. 

But it is sufficient to consider our own epoch, in which the conception of the race struggle plays 
such an important part, to reveal the emptiness and ridiculousness of this phrase. 

We are told that the "race" of the Teutons is destined by nature for a life-and-death struggle with 
the "race" of the Slavs and the Romance races. It was found necessary to increase the German 
army because the Balkan War had disturbed the equilibrium between Teutons and Slavs and 
Austria was now threatened by the Southern Slavs. But it was not the race of the Teutons that 
had come into hostile contact with the Europeans, but the more or less impure race of landed 
proprietors (agrarians), particularly the Hungarian, Polish and Bohemian junkers, who cared 
mighty little about the Teutonic race! 

But simultaneously the Teutons of Germany, in order to wage the "race" struggle against the 
Latins of France, allied themselves with the Latins of Italy. For a time, our Teutons also aimed to 
obtain the friendship of the Teutonic race in England; then, "blood was thicker than water". But 
later, the English Teutons wickedly sought an entente with Russia, the home of the Slavic race, 
and with the principal Romance race, France, in order to oppose their Teutonic blood-kindred in 
Germany! 

Like the "Aryan" and "Semitic", the Teutonic or the Slavic race, the race struggle itself is an 
invention of the brains of schoolmasters, rejected by serious scholars. 

This was the case even before the World War, which forced the German Government to seek the 
aid of the Turks and of the entire Mohammedan world, while, during the war, France and 
England, and later America, sent coloured regiments against their white enemies. This would 
appear to be a peculiar phase of the race struggle. 

Eduard Meyer once said concerning this struggle: 

"While the differences in somatic structure, and particularly of skin pigment, have always been 
obvious, they have never had any effect on the relations between nations except where these 
sharp distinctions involved not only mere external appearance, but also - and particularly - a 
difference in the cultural aptitude and the mode of thought, as between Europeans and Negroes. 
In this field also, it was reserved for our time to assign an inner significance to the external 
contrast, and many theories, in their far-fetched application, have ascribed to the factor of race a 
significance which it never possessed and which is in direct contradiction with all the 
experiences of history. 

"The popular notion that the hostility to the Jews ('anti-Semitism') is a race hostility, or that it 
has anything to do with race, is completely erroneous; we find this hostility among the closest of 
kin to the Jews, as well as among the Europeans. It is generally known that the importance of 
race is hardly dreamed of in the Orient and that even the aversion for the Negro is found fully 
developed only among the Teutonic (English) tribes." [9] 



37 



There is surely nothing more absurd than the theory of the "natural" hostility between races, but 
unfortunately it is not one of the theories that may be killed by laughing at it. It arises from 
interests that are too strong, it serves too well the purpose of facilitating the demagogic 
exploitation of ancient prejudices and errors on the subject of foreign phenomena, to prevent this 
absurd creature of the overheated pedantic brain to be considered in editorial offices and on the 
parliamentary rostrum, by professional patriots as a recognised science, as a self-evident truth, 
imparting to it ever new accessions of vitality. 



Footnotes 

L Charles Darwin, The Descent of Man, London 1871, vol.ii, pp. 22s, 22s. 

2. Natiirliche Schopfungsgeschichte, 5th ed., p. 602. 

3. Dr. E. Houze, L'Aryen et l'anthropologie, Brussels 1906, p. 33. 

^Anthropological View of Race, reprinted in Papers on Inter-racial Problems, 
Communicated to the First Universal Races Congress, held at the University of London, 
July 26-29, pp.13 et seq. 

5. Ernst Hackel, Natiirliche Schopfungsgeschichte, 5th ed., p. 603. 

6. Vol.ii, p.586. 

7. Die Zukunft der Juden, Leipzig 1912, p.72. 

8. Die Juden und das Wirtschaftsleben, Leipzig 1911, p. 349. 

9. Eduard Meyer, Geschichte des Altertums, I, 1, 3rd ed., 1910, p.77. 



38 



Chapter V 

Physical Characteristics of the Jewish Race 

We have seen that the traits derived from the primitive races of man tend more and more to 
disappear, as the economic evolution progresses. Race mixtures and a constant transformation in 
the economic conditions are ceaselessly at work on the creation of new types, again subject to 
progressive change, in part to new differentiations, in part to new combinations, causing a 
continual weakening of the definiteness and permanence of races, and also bringing about more 
and more variety in individual differentiation. The process of history is not a continuous struggle 
between immutable races, but a process of uninterrupted alteration in the economic environment, 
of constant change in the groups of interests struggling with each other, resulting in a constant 
mutation in the traditional race traits as determined by the original state of nature. Race, meaning 
the races of animals - wild animals as well as domestic animals - becomes more and more vague 
among men, departing further and further from the divisions of men into states and languages, as 
developed in the course of historical evolution. 

It may therefore be assumed in advance, in the case of a group of humans that have marched for 
tens of centuries in the front rank of the process of economic evolution, that have undergone the 
most extensive migrations, economic and political revolutions, that there is no possibility that 
such a race may be a unit or a pure race. 

But we are told this statement does not apply to the Jews. It is claimed, again and again, that the 
Jewish race has maintained itself in all its purity since time immemorial, and this alleged 
permanence of the Jewish racial type has become one of the most frequently utilised bases of the 
views of race theory among the anthropo-sociologists. 

A full century ago, Blumenbach wrote: "It is generally known that the Jewish race has been 
spread for many centuries over all the earth; it has nevertheless maintained its racial traits pure 
and even typical. This remarkable fact has long been receiving the attention of scientists and 
physiologists." 

The well-known anthropologist, Richard Andree, declared 

'Anthropologically considered, the Jews are one of the most interesting subjects. For no other 
race type can be traced back through tens of centuries with the same certainty as the Jews, and no 
other race type presents such permanent forms, no other has so well resisted the influence of time 
and the influence of its environment." fJJ 

This view is widely accepted to this day as an irrefutable and unquestionable fact, a fact which is 
so irrefutable and unquestionable that its advocate forgets to state what are the appallingly 
constant and immutable traits of the Jewish race. The race theorists usually hand over this 
scientific task to the cartoonists of the comic papers. 

These most dependable scholars have found the principal trait of Judaism in its nose. The comic 
papers picture no Jew without the Jewish nose. But what is the state of affairs outside of the 
comic papers? 



39 



Fishberg states 

"The present author has investigated the subject among Jews in New York City and also in the 
various countries east and west of Europe, in North Africa, and Jewish immigrants of various 
countries in Asia. The results of these investigations do not bear out the popular notion that the 
hooked nose is to be considered the 'Jewish' nose, because only a small minority of Jews have 
the privilege of possessing this kind of nose. Among 2,836 adult male Jews in New York City, 
the percentage of noses was as follows: 

Straight, or Greek 57.26% 
Retrousse, or Snub 22.07% 
Aquiline, or Hooked 14.25% 
Flat and Broad 6.42% 

Among 1,284 Jewesses, the percentage of straight noses was even higher, and of aquiline and 
hooked noses even smaller than among the men: 

Straight, or Greek 59.42% 
Retrousse, or Snub 13.86% 
Aquiline, or Hooked 13.70% 
Flat and Broad 14.02% 

But a small portion of the Jews, therefore - thirteen or fourteen per cent - have the Jewish nose! 
121 

Fishberg is not the only investigator who has found this percentage so low. Other scholars 
working in Russia and Austria have arrived at the same result. 

On the other hand, we find that the aquiline nose is by no means possessed by Jews only. It is 
quite common in Western Asia, on the Mediterranean Sea, as well as among American Indians. 
We have already quoted Luschan's observation that the Jewish nose is particularly frequent in 
the Alpine valleys that are cut off from all outside influences, that it is an earmark of the homo 
alpinus, the Alpine man. While but thirteen or fourteen per cent, of the Jews have a Jewish nose 
- as a rule - the conservative Catholic population of Ancient Bavaria |T*1 shows thirty-one per 
cent of Jewish noses. 

A further observation of Fishberg' s is very interesting: the forms of noses found among Jews 
have a tendency to vary with the forms of noses in the environment in which they live. 

"It is noteworthy that Bavarian Jews also have a higher proportion of hooked noses than their co- 
religionists in other countries." 3] 

Wide noses are found more frequently among the Jews of Northern Africa than among those of 
Eastern Europe. But the snub nose, on the other hand, among Jews, is most numerous among 



40 



those living in the midst of a Slavic population, where this type of nose, as is well known, is very 
frequent. 

If we are obliged to relinquish the Jewish nose, we are giving up the most widely recognised race 
trait of the Jews. What other such traits do we still have? Skin pigmentation, eye pigmentation, 
hair pigmentation? These are often mentioned as race traits, but if we are to consider black hair, 
dark eyes, swarthy or sallow skin as particular traits of the Jews, we should have to regard as 
Jews all Europeans that are not blond. 

Furthermore, there are blond and blue-eyed persons among the Jews. Among 4,235 Jews 
examined by Fishberg in New York, the following were the proportions: 

Jews Jewesses 

Brunette Type 52.62% 56.94% 

Blond Type 10.42% 10.27% 

Mixed Types 36.96% 32.79% 



"The brunette type, which is considered characteristic of the Jews from time immemorial, is thus 
reduced to only fifty-two per cent, among the European representatives of the race, while among 
the Jewesses it is not much larger, fifty-seven per cent." [41 

But the blond Jew is not equally numerous everywhere: 

"On the whole, it can be stated that most of the blond Jews are found in countries where the 
general population has a considerable proportion of blonds. This is exemplified by the number of 
blond Jews in England, twenty-five per cent., and in Germany, where over thirty per cent, of 
Jewish children had blond hair. On the other hand, in Italy, where the Christian population is 
distinctly brunette, less than five per cent, of the Jews are blond, while in Algeria, Bokhara, the 
Caucasus, etc., the percentage is even less." [5J 

We have still to consider the skull. The skull is said to be an unchanging race trait. Where the 
race has been preserved in its purity, the skull, according to many anthropologists, will not 
change, while others dispute this condition. This is not the place to attempt the solution of such 
controversies. Assuming that the form of the skull is the decisive factor, by which we mean 
whether the form of the skull, as viewed from above, shows a greater or less ratio between length 
and breadth, what are the results that may be said to have been determined by skull 
measurements? 

"It may, in fact, be stated that there is no single type of head which is found among the Jews of 
all countries in which they live. Indeed nearly all varieties of skulls are met with among Jews of 
today." [61 



41 



The head-forms of the Jews in various countries are quite different from each other. The 
condition is as follows [71: 





Daghestan 
Caucasus 

% 


Jews in 
Europe 

% 


North 
Africa 

% 


Yemen, 
Arabia 

% 


Hyper dolichocephalic (-76) 




2.89 


25.97 


71.80 


Dolichocephalic (76-77) 




7.36 


24.67 


14.10 


OUUtAUiLLiLULCyiltlilL \ fO IV) 


4 7 


u.ji 


1 Q 48 


7 fiQ 


Mesocephalic (80-81) 


6.10 


25.78 


18.00 


2.56 


Subbrachycephalic (82-83) 


17.37 


24.01 


9.09 


3.85 


Brachycephalic (84-86) 


28.94 


15.97 


6.49 




Hyperbrachycephalic (86+) 


47.89 


8.47 


1.30 




Number of Observations 


218 


2,641 


77 


78 



The Jews in the Caucasus are therefore predominantly brachycephalic, while those in Northern 
Africa, and particularly those in Arabia, are predominantly dolichocephalic, and those in Europe 
predominantly of medium types. 

Fishberg therefore rightly observes: 

"As far as head-form is concerned, these three groups of Jews represent three different races as 
clearly as if they were of white, black, and yellow skin." 8} 

Here again, we find the characteristics of the Jews coinciding with those of the nations among 
which they live. The Caucasians among whom they live are brachycephalic. In Arabia, 
Mesopotamia and Northern Africa, the Jews are as distinctly dolichocephalic as the races native 
to are these regions. European Jews, like the rest of the Europeans, are midway between these 
extremes. 

Within Europe itself the cephalic index of Jews and non-Jews striking coincidences within the 
same region. Thus Fishberg found the average cephalic indexes in the following countries to be: 



42 



Country Average Cephalic Index 





OI Jews 


/it ^^T/\T1 lull . 

oi rM on- jews 


/ 1 t Ll 1 1 fl 1/11 /t 

LilltllALlYllLl 


1 .UJ 


81 88 

01.00 


Rumania 


81.82 


82.92 


Hungary 


82.45 


81.40 


Poland 


81.91 


82.13 


Little Russia 


82.45 


82.31 


Galicia 


83.33 


84.40 [91 



In general, we find a great uniformity of head forms among both Jews and non-Jews in Eastern 
Europe; there is but slight divergence; this condition is attributed by the American 
anthropologist, Ripley, to "the perfect monotony and uniformity of environment of the Russian 
people", to the unvarying conditions of nature "from the Carpathian Mountains, east and north". 

LLQ1 

What becomes now of the so-called immutable, sharply-defined race type of the Jews which 
"may be traced with equal certainty through the course of thousands of years"? We cannot even 
find such sharply-defined traits in our own day. 

Being unable to prove the existence of the Jewish race type by those traits which are generally 
regarded as racial indications, the advocates of the presence of a distinct Jewish race are obliged 
to turn from anthropological to physiological traits. The Jew is to be distinguished, they say, not 
by the appearance of his body, but by its posture. 

We are already leaving the ground of comparatively unchanging factors and entering the field of 
very alterable factors. Among Jews the chest measurement is declared to be strikingly small, 
menstruation to appear very early in life, their fruitfulness is said to attain extremely high 
figures, their adaptability to climate to be extremely great. On the whole, these statements appear 
quite true, but do not seem to be "Jewish characteristics" at all, if we take the pains to compare 
the Jews not with the totality of the population among whom they live, but with the classes in 
which Jews are most commonly found. It will then be found that narrow chests are as common 
among non-Jews who are accustomed - because they are merchants or intellectuals - to a 
sedentary mode of life, with little physical exercise, and that menstruation, not only among 
Jewesses, but among all city women, appears earlier than among country girls. 

The faculty of acclimatisation in the tropics is possessed by the Jew in common with the other 
Europeans who visit those climates as merchants, not as soldiers or heavy labourers, and who are 
able to abstain from alcohol. For hard physical exertion and alcohol are the greatest enemy of the 
European in the tropics. We cannot consider the Jew's faculty of acclimatisation as a specific 
Jewish quality unless we assume that alcoholism is one of the immutable race traits of the 
dominant blond race. 



43 



As for their fruitfulness, which has resulted in making the Jews as numerous as the grains of sand 
on the seashore, this property also reveals how great is the dependence of "immutable race traits" 
on social conditions. As in all other urban populations, the Jewish population of cities also 
presents a distinct decline in the birth rate. This fact is well known in the case of Western 
Europe, but is even beginning to be observed in Eastern Europe. In Rumania, the rate of living 
births per thousand inhabitants shows the following changes: 

For the Population For the Jews 
as a Whole Only 

1871-1875 34.2% 46.5% 

1881-1885 41.3% 46.8% 

1901-1905 39.5% 32.6% fill 



The birth rate of the Jews was considerably higher than that of the entire population thirty years 
ago, but is now considerably lower. 

In Western Europe and America the fruitfulness of the Jews is decreasing as rapidly as the 
general fruitfulness of the population of France. In fact, if the present tendency continues, it will 
actually mean the dying out of the Jews, which would be the most original manner of solving 
the, entire Jewish question. 

In Prussia, the excess of births over deaths per thousand of respective population groups was: 



Natural Increase 





Jews 


Christians 


1885 


10.33 


12.29 


1890 


7.64 


12.58 


1895 


6.66 


15.12 


1900 


4.52 


14.57 


1905 


3.34 


12.93 


1908 


3.33 


14.97 [121 



"In certain German cities the birth and death rates of the Jews are almost equal; in Breslau in 
1906-1907, there were registered 507 Jewish births and 694 Jewish deaths. Here they do not 
replenish the earth." T 1 31 



44 



Interesting figures are communicated by Felix Theilhaber in a book entitled Sterile Berlin 14_L, 
which contains far more information than is suggested by the title, being in fact a thorough 
discussion of the entire modern population problem. 

Theilhaber had already issued in 1911 a book bearing the ominous title: The Destruction of the 
German Jews, |T51 In the work above mentioned he communicates a number of new calculations 
based on Berlin conditions, referring to the relative number of Jewish births in that city: 

Births 

Number of Jews Jewish Births per 1000 Jews of 

Child-Bearing Age 



1880 


13,300 


1,497 


112 


1895 


22,678 


1,694 


75 


1900 


24,531 


1,649 


67 


1905 


25,491 


1,630 


64 


1910 


24,000 
approx. 


1,306 


54 



If the Jewish births are to replace the losses by death, there would have to be seventy-eight births 
per 1,000 Jewish women of child-bearing age. But with the present birth rate, 1,000 Jewish 
couples, in other words, "2,000 Jews of child-producing age, have a total offspring of only 1,400 
persons, equivalent to a dying out of one-third their number. If this should continue to be the 
condition, the Jews of Berlin will, after two or three generations - in other words, in 80-120 
years - be almost extinct." T 161 

Of course, we are here ignoring immigration from other regions. At any rate, our figures are 
sufficient to show that the "infinite fruitfulness of the Jews" as an "immutable" race trait is a 
non-existent quantity. 

Physiology having transpired to be as poor a basis as anthropology, pathology is called upon for 
assistance. The race traits which a healthy Jew is incapable of contributing are now sought in the 
Jew suffering from disease. It is maintained that the Jew is more subject to certain diseases than 
the non-Jew, while he is less subject to others than the non-Jew. But here again we are dealing 
only with hasty generalisations. 

Diabetes (sugar), for example, is commonly considered a "Jewish sickness". As a matter of fact, 
many Jews do die of this disease. 

From Auerbach's Analysis of the Demography of the Jews in Budapest, it appears that of the 
487 deaths reported as due to diabetes in 1902-07, 238, or more than one-half, occurred in Jews, 
although they only constituted 22.6 per cent, of the population. The rates were 5.9 deaths due to 
diabetes per 100,000 Catholics and 21.4 per 100,000 Jews. 171 



45 



But comparisons of this kind between Jews and non-Jews are quite misleading, whether they are 
concerned with diseases or with criminality or with school attendance. We know that certain 
diseases are more common in certain vocations and social strata than others. A comparison 
between Jews and non-Jews is legitimate when the non-Jews are compared with Jews of those 
classes to which most of the Jews belong. Proceeding in this manner, we shall observe that 
diabetes is a very common complaint among merchants and intellectuals, including non- Jewish 
merchants and intellectuals. Accordingly, Fishberg determined that diabetes is a specifically 
Jewish disease only in places where the Jews are predominantly in business. In New York, 
German Jews, according to the records of the hospitals, suffer from diabetes three times as 
frequently as non-Jews. The Russian Jews, on the other hand, most of whom are workers, do not 
show a higher percentage of diabetes than that of the population as a whole. Diabetes also is, 
therefore, not a race disease but a class disease. 

On the other hand, it is declared that Jews are not so susceptible to certain diseases as non- Jews; 
such diseases are: cholera, smallpox, tuberculosis, etc. Where this declaration agrees with the 
facts, it may be explained by the social conditions of the Jews, who, in Germany, for instance, 
are members of the wealthier classes, are less addicted to alcohol, and are always more inclined 
to consult a physician at once, while the uneducated masses of the people usually regard 
physicians with mistrust. Even the most orthodox, most superstitious Jew will not seek to oppose 
the epidemic by prayers and sacrifices alone, as is the custom among the Italian and Russian 
masses. 

"As a matter of fact, it is well known to every physician of experience among the Jews that they 
are always ready to take advantage of every new measure to prevent or cure disease. There are 
practically no anti-vaccinationists among them; nor are there any other kind of cranks among 
them to urge them on to resist the attempts on the part of the authorities to vaccinate them. The 
Jewish clergy is always in favour of placing medical matters in the hands of physicians and is not 
in favour of leaving such matters in the hands of Providence." [181 

Shall we consider ignorance among the masses as a race trait of the "Aryans"? For the present, 
we still explain such traits by the social and political conditions in which the nations live. 

It appears that disease as a race trait also is a poor argument. There remains for the advocates of 
Jewish racial purity a single refuge, the last refuge of the race theorists who aim to construct 
races on the basis of the modern nations, namely, language. 

Of course, language as a race trait is particularly unreliable in the case of the Jews, more 
unreliable than in any other human group, since the Jews - with the exception of the Polish and 
Russian Jews - everywhere speak the language of their environment. Unable to use the criterion 
of language in the case of the Jews, the criterion of pronunciation is resorted to. We are told the 
Jew may always be recognised by his pronunciation. In all the languages he speaks, the Jew has 
his Jewish accent. Said the famous African explorer, Gerhart Rohlfs: 

"We know that the Jew in Germany can always be recognised by his discordant accent. The 
same is the case with the Jews in all European countries, also in Northern Africa." 



46 



And Andree says 

"The so-called Jewish accent (mauscheln) is a Jewish race trait, as ineradicable in them as the 
Jewish type itself ... This is very decidedly a race trait, since it is found among the Jews of all 
countries." T 1 91 

Richard Wagner' s reasoning to show that the Jew is incapable of producing good music is based 
on the so-called Jewish pronunciation. After pointing out in his essay, The Jews in Music 201, 
that the physical appearance of the Jew always has for us an "unpleasantly foreign quality we 
involuntarily feel that we desire to have nothing to do with a person who has this appearance", he 
continues 

"Far more important - in fact, of decisive importance - is the nature of the influence of the Jew's 
pronunciation upon us; particularly, this is the essential point of departure in a study of the 
Jewish influence on music. . Particularly repulsive to us is the purely sensual manifestation of the 
Jewish language. Civilisation has not succeeded in surmounting the peculiar stubbornness of the 
Jewish character in the matter of the Semitic mode of pronunciation, in spite of their two 
thousand years of contact with European nations. Our ear feels the absolutely foreign and 
unpleasant sound of a certain hissing, strident, lisping and choking pronunciation in the Jewish 
speech; a distortion and peculiar rearrangement of the words and of phrase constructions, entirely 
foreign to our national language, finally imparts to this pronunciation the character of a confused 
babbling, to listen to which causes our attention to dwell rather on this repulsive manner of the 
Jewish speech, than on the substance it conveys. The exceptional importance of this 
circumstance in explaining the impression made upon us by the musical works of modern Jews 
must be recognised and emphasised from the outset. 

If the quality of his mode of speech makes it almost impossible for a Jew to acquire the ability of 
an artistic expression of his feelings and views through speech, his capacity for manifesting such 
moods and thoughts in song must be even far inferior, etc." 

No doubt a Siegfried speaking with a Jewish accent would be impossible on the stage. Richard 
Wagner's dialect was not a Jewish dialect but that of Saxony. If we should use Wagner's 
arguments, we might say: 

"Civilisation has not succeeded in surmounting the peculiar stubbornness of the Saxon character 
in the matter of the Saxon mode of pronunciation, in spite of their two thousand years of contact 
with European nations." But it is not unreasonable to assume that Direktor Striese in The Rape o 
f the Sabine Women T2 1 1 would hardly do much better in the role of Siegfried than the well- 
known Schmock. \22^ Would it be reasonable to assume that the influence of the Saxons on 
music could not but be disastrous? 

Pronunciation is a most peculiar element in language. Grammar and vocabulary may be fixed in 
writing and taught through books; pronunciation may be but roughly indicated by our limited 
alphabet; it cannot be precisely set down. To learn to pronounce, we must be in personal contact 
with persons who speak the language as natives. Pronunciation is far more tenacious in its 
retention of the influences of the life of the people, of the masses, than are grammar and 



47 



vocabulary, which may be fixed in writing and thus isolated from life. The differences between 
the dialects are chiefly differences of pronunciation. Furthermore, contrary to the condition in the 
case of grammar and vocabulary, which may be learned by purely theoretical means, the 
acquisition of a correct pronunciation requires constant practice of tongue and ear. 

If a child has practised no other pronunciation than that of his home dialect, it will be difficult for 
him to get rid of this dialectic tinge. Very few persons have so fine a hearing and so ready a 
tongue as to be able to acquire the correct pronunciation of a foreign language late in life, or, for 
that matter, of a strange dialect. Even those persons who are complete masters of the foreign 
language, who speak it fluently, will reveal in their pronunciation that they are not speaking their 
mother-tongue. On the other hand, having less occasion to practise their own language when 
abroad, these persons will forget its words and its constructions more easily than its 
pronunciation. I met German workers living in England who had been in that country since their 
childhood, and who were already having difficulty in speaking German at all - in fact, who 
preferred to speak English but whose pronunciation both of German and English revealed the 
part of Germany from which they had come. 

If the Jews have their specific accent always and everywhere - so do the Saxons, so do the 
Swabians. Does this justify us in erecting race traits on this basis? In Saxony everybody speaks 
with a Saxon accent, regardless of his country of origin. On the other hand, the children of Saxon 
parents, if they are raised in Wurttemberg, will not speak the Saxon dialect but the Swabian 
dialect; they will speak Bavarian in Miinchen and Plattdeutsch on the Baltic coast. Pronunciation 
is no more hereditary than vocabulary and grammar, but acquired. It is acquired, however, in a 
somewhat different manner, and the environment of the individual is a more important factor. 

If the Jews have a different pronunciation of the languages of the nations among whom they live 
than these nations themselves, this proves only that the Jews form a separate community in the 
individual nations, thus remaining in close contact with each other; only to the extent that they 
lead such a separate existence will they preserve their peculiar pronunciation. Jews that have not 
been raised in a closed Jewish community but together with non- Jewish people will have as little 
of the Jewish accent as the other people. There is a well-known anecdote of a Jewish boy sent by 
his father into the country in order that he might get rid of the Jewish accent. When his father 
calls for him at the expiration of a year, he finds to his horror that little Baruch has not only not 
relinquished his Jewish pronunciation but has imparted it to the entire village. 

Little Baruch' s infectious influence deserves all our respect, but an anecdote of this type could be 
considered as having scientific value only by a Sombart or by the protagonists of Jewish ritual 
murder. The so-called Jewish accent disappears more quickly even than their narrowness of chest 
when they begin to live in a different social environment. The fact that some persons have sought 
to elevate this condition into a race trait proves only that there are persons who would represent 
the Jews as a separate race at any cost, and who yet are put in the most embarrassing position if 
asked to state what are the permanent and unmistakable traits of this race. 

The Jews of the present day are not a pure race, either geographically or chronologically; even 
the most superficial acquaintance with their history will prove this statement. Judaism arose on 
the soil of Palestine, a border region between two areas, each of which embraces a distinct race, 



48 



probably the result of the peculiarities of the two regions: in Palestine, the foot-hills of 
mountainous Asia Minor (in the widest sense of the word, therefore, including Armenia), whence 
originated the Armenoid type, and the beginnings of the extensive steppes of Arabia, extending 
as far as Mesopotamia. In the latter regions there arose the type commonly designated as the 
Semitic type, but which might perhaps better be ascribed to a certain area and not to a certain 
language group, namely, the Arabian type. Some members of the Armenoid type must be 
counted with the Semitic language family; for example, the Assyrians. \23] 

Both these geographical races must have come in contact, at an early period, as well as 
repeatedly thereafter, and have intermingled at their border points, therefore in Palestine also. 
Primitive Israelitic history is of course still very obscure: the reports in the Bible are absolutely 
unreliable. But there is no doubt among scholars that the population of Palestine must have 
constituted a mixture of races at a very early period, however greatly they may differ in minor 
points. 

But Palestine was a border region in another sense also. The "spheres of influence" - to use a 
modern term - of the first two great states of the historical era, of Babylonia and Egypt, met in 
Palestine. Before the development of navigation on the Mediterranean, the entire commercial 
intercourse between these two empires passed through Palestine, which also afforded passage for 
their military forces, and often even served as their battleground. 

Palestine has, therefore, seen merchants with their slaves and mercenaries, who often came from 
great distances, and belonged to the most varied races. The mercenaries often remained 
garrisoned in the fortresses of Palestine for long periods. Such elements have never failed to 
provide a numerous posterity in any country in which they have been stationed. 

Furthermore, the Israelites were at first by no means averse to conjugal relations with persons of 
other races. Stade informs us on this point: 

"The people of Israel were no more a people of pure blood than any other people on earth: for, in 
addition to Canaanitic, Hebraic, Arabic components, individuals of Aramaic and Egyptian origin 
were also absorbed by them. 

"How slight was the effort they made to be exclusive is apparent from the circumstance that we 
meet with an Ishmaelite in David's family. In addition, the ancient Israelites were distinctly 
surprised by the timidity with which the ancient Egyptians guarded themselves against any 
contact with foreigners. \24] Of course, this does not mean that the Jews did not prize their own 
nationality and the purity of their Israelitic origin. But since such purity was surely quite unusual 
in the oldest period, its absence was not considered a blemish. This makes it easy for us to 
understand that while, according to the most ancient form of the legend, Isaac, the son of 
promise, was to have married a woman of his kindred, it is narrated without apparent surprise 
that other fathers marry foreign women: Judah, a Canaanitic woman; Joseph, an Egyptian 
woman." r251 

While the position of Palestine facilitated the incursion of foreign elements and an intermingling 
with them, it also facilitated the spreading of the inhabitants of the country among their 



49 



neighbours. Being a poor, unproductive country, Palestine was likely to suffer from excess of 
population. It was too small and weak, the superior power of its neighbours too crushing, to 
enable Palestine to dispose of its population by settling it in conquered regions. The territory of 
the Phoenicians cut Palestine off from good seaports and the practice of navigation. Therefore 
the path of colonisation beyond the seas was also closed to the Israelites. Their surplus 
population had no other alternative than to go abroad as merchants (sometimes as mercenaries, 
but these played no important part in history). In this capacity, they travelled further and further 
and founded a number of settlements. In many cities they became so numerous as to conduct not 
only trading operations, but also to employ artisans of their own; the number of their intellectuals 
also increased. 

Constantly crowded and congested in their homeland by the overwhelming strength of their 
neighbours, this little race had no other path of expansion. This path was pursued so 
energetically that the Israelitic population abroad finally became more numerous than the home 
population. The home population repeatedly loses its status as an independent nation, finally 
losing it forever. But before this time had come, the centre of gravity of Judaism had been shifted 
from its original location to a number of cities in Egypt, Syria and Mesopotamia. 

As long as the Israelites had remained in Palestine, the uniform natural environment necessarily 
favored the existence of a tendency in the direction of the production of a uniform geographical 
race, thereby somewhat opposing the differentiation of types resulting from race mixture. But 
their migrations and their distribution to the most different natural environments completely 
abolished this tendency toward a uniform geographical race. But the mixture of races, which was 
already traditional, now went on with redoubled speed. 

The greater number of the Jews now lived outside of their homeland. Strangers among strangers, 
tolerated only, quite often regarded with hostility, they found no support in the little nation 
whose capital was Jerusalem. They could maintain themselves only by observing the most 
intimate unity among them. This unity applied not only to the specific locality, but also to all the 
localities; there was a sort of interlocal solidarity. In the immense region over which they were 
spread, they were never simultaneously persecuted, plundered, exiled, in all their colonies. If 
such events came to pass in one region, the victims, the despoiled and homeless, always found 
active assistance and support in other regions. 

But this unified organisation became less and less national. The Jews had never constituted a 
uniform race; they now ceased to be even a nation. Everything that constitutes the essence of a 
nation had been lost to them; they had lost their common land, even their common language. 

"The Jews living abroad had to speak the foreign tongue, and if several generations had already 
been living abroad, the younger generations finally would be able to speak only the language of 
their native country, forgetting their mother tongue. Greek particularly became very popular 
among them. Already in the Third Century B.C., the sacred writings of the Jews were translated 
into Greek, probably for the reason that but few Alexandrian Jews still understood Hebrew and 
possibly also for purposes of propaganda among the Greeks ... Several centuries before the 
destruction of Jerusalem by the Romans, Hebrew already ceased to be a living tongue." [261 



50 



There remained to the Jews of their existence as a nation practically only their national 
aspiration, their desire to become a nation again, and as no bounds may be set to man's wishes, 
they felt that this nation would be headed by an indomitable saviour, the Messiah. But, as a 
matter of actual fact, the Jews were becoming more and more transformed from a nation into an 
international association. Their bond of union was the remnant of their ancient national life that 
was still maintained, namely, their religion. But precisely the religions, in the form of myth and 
philosophy, were in a state of constant flux in the centuries before and after the birth of Christ, 
particularly in the circles from which the Jews were then exclusively recruited, namely, the 
populations of the cities. The firm and tangible symbol of the Jews' community was not the 
philosophy of religion, but the religious ceremonial; this it was that served the Jews of all the 
regions then involved in world traffic as the bond recognised and recognisable by all. And 
simultaneously as a means of keeping outsiders out. 

We must not infer that the Jews aimed to preserve a rigid exclusiveness toward all new elements. 
On the contrary, with the progress of their loss of a national existence, and their assumption of 
the character of a mere international association for mutual aid, we find a simultaneous increase 
of the desire to swell their ranks by means of propaganda and thus to acquire new forces. 
Conquests of new territory were impossible under the circumstances; propaganda was resorted 
to. 

'"But woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites!' the gospel lays these wards into the 
mouth of Jesus, 'for ye compass sea and land to make one proselyte and, when he is made, ye 
make him twofold more a child of hell than yourselves' ." \27] 

I have treated the causes and effects of this propaganda in full detail in my Foundations of 
Christianity. f281 It would lead us too far afield to go over all this ground again. It is sufficient 
to state here that this propaganda met with great success; and the greater the success, the more 
necessary would it, of course, seem to be to keep aloof from all undependable newcomers. The 
strict observation of the ritual prescriptions now became doubly necessary. In Freemasonry we 
find a similar rich development of ceremonial which, particularly for intelligent persons, 
frequently makes a very stupid impression, and is valuable only because it serves as a means of 
making it difficult for frivolous interlopers to gain admission. Those who subjected themselves 
permanently to the Jewish rite might be depended upon as reliable fellow-members. 

But every stranger was welcome who would recognise this rite - without regard to origin. Jewish 
exclusiveness was not an exclusiveness of race. The Jewish propaganda in all the regions of the 
ancient world was rather calculated to stimulate tremendously the mingling of races within 
Judaism. 

In spite of the great success of this propaganda, it did not take hold of the masses of the pagan 
peoples. These rather displayed an increasing aversion to Judaism, as the latter ceased to 
constitute a nation and became an international league. The more Judaism lost the character of a 
nation, the more did it cease to embrace all the classes of society as then known, now including 
only the urban groups, in many cases only those concerned with commercial and financial 
business. As long as the Jews had been a nation, and a very small nation at that, they had been a 
source of concern to their nearest neighbours - by reason of their aspirations for expansion or for 



51 



maintaining themselves - only in occasional instances. The more they developed into a league of 
members of a specific class, spread throughout the world, the more were they involved in the 
class struggles of the entire world. And this in a two-fold manner. In the first place, they were 
drawn into the struggles of their own class against other classes, and in the second place, they 
were also drawn into conflicts with competitors within their own class, for this class was much 
annoyed by the strength drawn by the Jews from their international dissemination and solidarity. 
These two varieties of class struggle were ultimately combined in a manner that was quite 
uncomfortable for the Jews: competitors in their own commercial class made efforts to turn aside 
the hostility of other classes, particularly to the Jewish members of their class, thus transforming 
struggles against middlemen, tax farmers, usurers, into struggles against the Jews. This distortion 
of conditions was favoured by the fact that the Jews were defenceless foreigners, and also - to 
just as great a degree - by those properties of the Jews by which they sought to maintain 
themselves, since they were defenceless foreigners, by their close union and their international 
solidarity. Elements of the population thus constituted easily become suspicious in the eyes of 
poplar masses with local prejudices. It was just as easy in the Seventeenth and Eighteenth 
Centuries, in England, to instigate a massacre of Catholics for the most trivial causes as it was 
throughout the last two thousand years to inaugurate occasional pogroms against the Jews 
everywhere in Europe. But no one has ever thought of ever designating the English persecutions 
of Catholics as race struggles and the English Catholics as a peculiar, pure race". 

The situation became a desperate one for the Jews when the Government authorities also rose 
against them. Before Caesarism felt itself firm in the saddle, it had considered the Jews to be a 
valuable ally. But as imperial absolutism became solidified, it became more suspicious of all 
independent organisations, including Judaism. And when the Jews of Jerusalem went so far as to 
seek to maintain their independence as opposed to the Romans, by actual warfare, Judaism was 
completely outlawed. [291 

From now on, the propaganda of Judaism was deprived of every foundation; everywhere the 
Jews were forced into the defensive, all accessions from non- Jewish circles were cut off. The 
Jews then became a caste which had to increase by inbreeding, within their own ranks. For the 
first time, the isolation of the Jews became quite marked. 

This condition found its culmination in the ghetto of the feudal era, in the Jewish quarters in 
which the Jewish population of each city was strictly confined. This condition might perhaps 
have succeeded in maintaining the Jews as a pure race if they had been a pure race to begin with. 
But the Jews never were a pure race, and even at the period of their most stringent isolation there 
were two conditions opposing the formation of a uniform race. 

The Jews could not become a geographical race, for their settlements extended over the most 
varied and distant countries. On the other hand, even if the Jews had originally constituted a pure 
race, they could not have maintained their purity, owing to the impossibility of preventing a 
mingling with foreign elements. 

Precisely the period of the most rigid isolation of the Jews is also the period of their greatest 
legal disability, subjecting them to one persecution after another. They were not robbed only of 
their valuables; not only were men slain, but women were violated in great numbers. But the 



52 



posterity of these women were considered as Jews and bred as such. Even though we should 
assume that all Jewish women had always been inaccessible to the seductive arts of their non- 
Jewish neighbours, the fact of the persecutions of the Jews alone would be sufficient to preclude 
the possibility of an immutable "purity" of Jewish blood during the last two thousand years. A 
mixed race from the very outset, the Jews, in the course of their migrations, have come into 
contact with a great succession of new races, and their blood has thus become more and more 
mixed. 

We have already pointed out the significant fact that the Jews of each region present many 
physical traits in common with the non- Jewish population of the same region. This may, perhaps, 
be an effect of like natural conditions on both Jews and non- Jews. But it is just as plausible to 
assume that it may be the result of a sexual contact between Jews and non- Jews. Probably the 
case is the same as in the world of organisms in general: both factors, adaptation and heredity, 
have had considerable to do with the determination of bodily traits. 

But the non- Jews among whom the Jews live are no less a mixed race than the Jews themselves. 
Jewish blood flows in their veins also. It is not only the extra-conjugal relations between - let us 
say - Jewish business men or students and Christian servant girls or waitresses that makes many 
a Christian child an "offspring of the Jews". Perhaps even more Jewish blood was transmitted to 
the body of the Christian population by the conversion of Jews, a process which has been going 
on for centuries. In Spain, for example, in the Fourteenth and Fifteenth Centuries, hundreds of 
thousands of Jews were converted to Christianity. Their posterity infected the Aryan race with 
their blood. There is no Jew today who can say to himself with certainty that he has not a drop of 
non- Jewish blood in his veins, if only for the reason that there never has existed a Jewish race 
either in the sense of a pure breed of domestic animals or in the other sense, that of a 
geographical race. 

But even if we should assume that all those who were following the ritual laws of the Jews two 
thousand years ago constituted a specific race, no Jew of the present day can assert with absolute 
sureness that his ancestors included only elements that had descended from the Jews of that 
period. 

On the other hand, also, there is not a single Christian who can declare with absolute certainty 
that his own antecedents include no Jew among their members. 

No race traits can be mentioned which could be used as a criterion for determining this question. 
The "Jewish countenance", black hair, flashing eyes, and particularly the aquiline nose, heritages 
from one of the many races out of which the Jews were built up, cannot serve as a criterion, no 
matter how outspoken these traits may be considered to be, for they are found also, as we have 
seen, among many non- Jewish races. Furthermore, they are found only among a small fraction of 
the Jews themselves. This characteristic countenance has probably become associated with the 
Jewish type, as in those regions of Northern Europe in which the Jews lived together in rather 
great numbers, namely, east of the Elbe and north of the Carpathians, it is less frequent among 
the non- Jews, and therefore most sharply distinguished from the countenance found in the most 
frequent types, and therefore most striking. 



53 



Yet even in those regions, the "Jewish face" does not of itself determine the Jewish type. 
Particularly striking qualities of dress and coiffure, kaftan and pajes (side curls), pronunciation, 
bodily carriage, play of the features, and gesticulations - all of which are social peculiarities, 
handed down by more or less involuntary imitation of one's environment - must co-operate with 
the hereditary Jewish face in order to make the unmistakable, the "correct" Jewish type apparent. 

The cartoonists of the comic papers are quite justified in depicting Jews as possessing the 
"Jewish countenance". The task of the caricaturist is to exaggerate and emphasize striking and 
unusual traits. But when anthropologists dignify this countenance by making it an earmark of a 
specific Jewish race, they are creating a caricature of their own science. Werner Sombart, of 
course, imagines that Jews may always be detected by their faces: 

"A later age will hardly find it possible to believe that persons existed in our day who were 
incapable of distinguishing the Jew as a member of a specific nation or of a specific race (it does 
not at all matter whether the Jews be called Jews or not) from a Negro or an Eskimo, or a 
Pomeranian, or a Southern Frenchman", 

and this is the more culpable, for: 

"Our eye has been obviously much sharpened, owing to training in the natural sciences, in its 
ability to detect the influence of the blood in man, during the last generation." POl 

This sharp eye has been rendered so acute in the case of Sombart that it is sufficient for him to 
cast a glance at a portrait, even though it be but a wood-cut or a copper engraving, to determine 
at once whether the original was a Jew or not: 

"It is well known that the Governor-General of the Dutch East Indian Company who, though he 
may not be considered as the founder of the Dutch power in Java, nevertheless contributed much 
to the solidification of this power, bore the name of Cohn (Coen). And we can easily convince 
ourselves that he was not the only Jewish governor of the Dutch East Indian possessions, if we 
glance through a set of portraits of these officials." \3l] 

If a man's name is Coen, Sombart, owing to his acute sense of the blood in man, "knows" that 
his name was Cohn, and that he was a Jew. Those who are acquainted with the Dutch colonial 
policy, and who "know" more of Coen than his name, are of course aware that Coen had nothing 
to do with Cohn, and that he was as little a Jew as the other governors whose portraits have been 
examined by our conscientious professor. \32] 

By means of the same profound method, Sombart declares the Scotchman Law as likely to have 
been a Jew, for Law might have been Levy and in "many (!) of his pictures" he looks Jewish! 

Another example of this splendid method is the following, also taken from Sombart: "In order to 
prove the significance of the Jews as financiers in France, it is sufficient to recall the influential 
position occupied by Samuel Bernard during the later portion of the reign of Louis XIV and the 
entire reign of Louis XV." f331 



54 



In other words, to prove the importance of the Jews, "it is sufficient" for Sombart to remind us of 
- a single Jew. This is quite funny, and is made even funnier if this Jew should happen to be not 
a Jew. Sombart' s critic in the Archiv fur Sozialwissenschaft und Sozialpolitik, Julius 
Guttmann, has the following to say on this subject. 

"In so important a country as France, the Jews remained for a long time of very subordinate 
importance as financiers. The only great Jewish financier discovered by Sombart as far down as 
the Eighteenth Century is Samuel Bernard. Bernard, according to the evidence of his baptismal 
certificate, which has been long available, was a Christian by birth, and the only circumstance 
that could be adduced in favour of his Jewish descent would be the fact that his father and 
grandfather had already lived in France as painters." T341 

Houston Stewart Chamberlain seems to be just as skilful in detecting the "influence of the 
blood", for he declares concerning Marx and Engels that they were two "highly gifted Jews, who 
sought to transplant to Europe from Asia many of the best thoughts of their race". f351 

The "scientific" method of the Sombart and Chamberlain school of Jewish studies was already 
anticipated by our friend Schonlank more than twenty years ago in a delightful parody in the 
feuilleton of the Vorwarts - it happened to be an April First number - in which he proved that 
Hammerstein, the well-known editor-in-chief of the Kreuzzeitung, was of Jewish extraction, 
originally bearing the name Chamer Stein. And how about Chamer Laihn - has not this name 
also a Jewish sound, Mr. Chamberlain? 



Translator's note 

VKAltbayern, former designation for the Bavarian provinces of Upper and Lower Bavaria - 
Translator. 



Notes 

h Quoted by Fishberg, p.9. 

2. Fishberg, p. 79. 

3, Fishberg, p. 83. 
4 Fishberg, p. 66. 
5, Fishberg, p. 70. 
6_. Fishberg, p. 49. 



55 



7. These figures (the cephalic index) indicate the width of the skull expressed as a percentage of 
its length. For instance, if the skull length is 200 mm., and its width 160 mm., the cephalic index 
will be 80, and the head-form is termed mesocephalie. 

8. p.33, German ed. 

9. Fishberg, p. 52, 

10. Fishberg, p. 51 

11. Fishberg, German ed., p. 229. 

12. Fishberg, p.69. 

13. Fishberg, German ed., p. 60. 

14. Das sterile Berlin, Berlin 1913. 

15. Der Untergang der deutschen Juden. 

16. Das sterile Berlin, pp. 106-107. 

17. Fishberg, pp.297-298. 

18. Fishberg, p. 128 

19. Fishberg, German ed., p.77. 

20. Das Judentum in der Musik. 

21. Direktor Striese, a character who speaks in the Saxon dialect in the farce, Der Raub der 
Sabinerinnen (1885) by Fry von Schonthan (1849-1913) and Paul von Schonthan (1853-1905). 

22. Schmock is a Jewish journalist in Freytag's (1816-1895) play Die Journalisten, who speaks 
German with exaggerated Jewish mannerisms. 

23. Cf. among others, Eduard Meyer, Geschichte des Altertums, 2nd ed., i, ii, p. 377 et seq. 

24. Compare Genesis xliii, 32, where we read of Joseph and his brothers: "And they set on for 
him by himself, and for them by themselves, and for the Egyptians, which did eat with him by 
themselves: because the Egyptians might not eat bread with the Hebrews; for that is an 
abomination unto the Egyptians." 

25. Stade, Geschichte des Volkes Israel, vol.i, pill. 

26. Karl Kautsky, Foundations of Christianity, New York, 1925, pp.257, 258. 



56 

27. Matthew xxiii, 15; Kautsky, ibid., p.260 

28. Kautsky, ibid., pp.253-264. 

29. Kautsky, ibid., pp.167-171. 

30. Werner Sombart, Die Zukunft der Juden, pp.50, 65 

31. Werner Sombart, Die Juden and das Wirtschaftsleben, pp.30, 31. 

32. Cf. W. v. Ravesteijn, Kapitalismus und Judentum, Die Neue Zeit, vol.xxx, part 2, pp.714, 
715. 

33. Sombart. Die Juden and das Wirtschaftsleben, p. 56. 

34. Archiv fur Sozialwissenchaft und Sozialpolitik, vol.xxxvi, p. 159. 

35. Die Grundlagen des neunzehnten Jahrhunderts, 1899, vol.ii, p. 835. 



57 



Chapter VI 

Mental Qualities of the Jewish Race 

There is not much to be gotten, therefore, out of the bodily traits of the Jewish race. Even the 
racial anti-Semites themselves do not display any very great confidence in the certainty of such 
traits, in spite of all their bombast concerning the profound natural gulf separating the Jewish 
race from the other races. They are very careful not to draw practical inferences from their race 
theories, or to demand - let us say - the political disfranchisement, the prohibition against 
marrying "Aryan" persons, or the elimination from Europe of every man who displays a "Jewish 
countenance". Nor do they recognise every man as an Aryan who fails to possess this 
countenance. They are finally brought to the pass of recognising as the natural "race trait" of the 
Jews only the records of the Bureau of Vital Statistics. 

But of course, the wickedness and disaster involved in the Jewish race is not based upon the 
peculiarity of their bodily traits, but on their mental traits, not on their crooked noses and crooked 
legs, but on their crooked morality. The high intelligence, the close solidarity of the Jews, are not 
virtues but vices. For they make the evil qualities more dangerous, namely, his importunity, his 
destructive, purely negative criticism, and, particularly, his heartless, ruthless desire for gain. In 
order to prove that the Jew is a born criminal, our racial anti-Semites bring no more destructive 
argument to bear than the overwhelming assertion that the Jew is a born capitalist. They claim 
that all the vulgarity of the capitalist mode of thought, which the Teutonic individual has had the 
greatest difficulty in acquiring, has been inherent in the Jewish blood from the beginning of 
history. Long before the slightest trace of capitalism was in existence, the Jew had already been 
impregnated by some miracle with the capitalist mode of thought and feeling, an 
undistinguishable race trait for all times and countries, and in all modes of production. It is 
therefore not surprising that the Jew leaves all his competitors far behind in the game of capitalist 
competition, thus injuring the Christian proletarians beyond repair by causing them to be 
exploited not only by "blond beasts" who had to be artificially trained to this capitalist 
viciousness. 

The thorn in the flesh of these theorists is the mental qualities of the Jews. The fact that these 
qualities include a number that were unpleasant to their Jewish neighbours was an observation 
frequently made long before the days of the racial anti-Semites. But formerly these traits had 
been ascribed to their peculiar social situation, to their oppression, their limitation to a few fixed 
callings. It had formerly been assumed that with the elimination of this exceptional situation, 
these peculiarities also would disappear. Under these circumstances, a criticism of the Jews 
usually developed into a criticism of state and society and into a demand for social and political 
reforms. But it is possible to escape the necessity of making such demands if the mental qualities 
of the Jews are considered to be an inextinguishable race trait. 

"Race alone may often serve only to cloak our ignorance," says Fishberg, "particularly if all the 
conditions of the environment have been ignored." 1} 

No doubt this is often the case. But just as frequently we find "race" resorted to as a means of 
preventing any criticism of society, any effort to secure its further evolution, or even the 



58 



investigation of its nature, the conception of race being used in such instances in order to nullify 
the influence of the milieu - including also the artificial, social milieu - on man. 

We have observed in the preceding chapter that the Jews are a mixed race, but we were 
nevertheless in a position to indicate the traces of the bodily traits of one of the geographical 
races of which this mixture is composed. We can no longer say anything concerning its mental 
traits, for mental traits are so intangible and variable that it is difficult if not impossible to assign 
permanent mental traits with definiteness to a certain race. This impossibility becomes the 
greater in the case of a prehistoric race of which no written documents are preserved. We 
completely lack any material for determining the mental qualities of the races out of which the 
population of Palestine was built up several thousands of years ago. 

But it is very difficult even to outline the characteristics of a nation on the basis of its written 
evidence. It is even very daring to judge a man on the basis of certain of his writings. Many 
individualities express themselves differently in their writings than in their real character. 
Personal observation itself is not sufficient to enable us to grasp the entire inner life of an 
individual; in fact, the individual is in the dark concerning much of his own individuality. He is 
aware of his inner life only where it enters his consciousness, and even his conscious mental life 
is coloured, simplified, idealised, by memory. 

What little information we have concerning the life of earlier races is in the form of certain 
expressions by certain individuals. It is as a rule entirely impossible to determine at this late date 
to what extent these expressions are typical, if only for the class involved, not to mention the 
entire people. 

Such evidences are extremely important as a means of determining the course of events, the 
problems faced by the human beings of the period and people in question, the stage of their 
knowledge and ability, the goals of their aspirations, the natural and artificial environment in 
which they moved. But he who would go beyond these things, he who would infer their entire 
inner life from these materials, will be able as a rule to deliver merely the production of his own 
imagination; this product will be interesting chiefly as a characterisation of the investigator 
rather than of those investigated. Nothing is more difficult than to place oneself inside another's 
skin. 

Even if there existed anywhere a civilised nation corresponding to a pure race, and which had 
preserved its race purity for thousands of years, we should not be able to trace its mental 
idiosyncrasies through these thousands of years with such precision as to be able to state which 
elements must be assigned to heredity and which to the influence of the environment. 

But in the case of a mixed race, the mere attempt to make such a distinction would be ridiculous. 

There is more likelihood of success if we begin, not with the race, not with the environment, not 
with the past, but with the present. In this case, we can at least determine to a certain extent, by 
means of numerous observations, what alterations in the mental character are produced at this 
day by alterations in the environment. Proceeding from this knowledge, we may then with a 
certain definiteness interpret many evidences of former times. For we are then proceeding from 



59 



the known to an explanation of the unknown, while to make the assumption that any mental 
characteristic known to us is a race trait is equivalent to the opposite process of explaining the 
known by means of the unknown. 

The former method, that which begins with the environment, is quite sufficient to explain the 
mental traits observable in the greater number of the Jews of the present day. We need only to 
note the influence of the urban environment on human beings at this day, the alterations in the 
country-dweller when exposed to the influence of city life, and then to recall that the Jews are the 
only race on earth that has constituted a purely urban population for approximately two thousand 
years: we now have an almost perfect explanation of Jewish traits. They are an exaggerated form 
of urban traits in general. I used the urban traits as early as 1890 in order to explain the Jewish 
character: [2] The Jew has become the city dweller par excellence. The uniformity of the 
artificial environment imparted to the Jews everywhere a uniform mental type, in spite of all the 
variations in their natural environment, and all the differences in the inherited race elements. If 
this uniform type should be accepted as a race type, the descendant of the homo alpinus might be 
designated as the homo urbanus. 

Until long after the beginning of the Nineteenth Century, the circumstances under which the 
great masses of the population lived in cities were - regardless of the country or race concerned 
- so destructive that it was impassible for them to maintain their numbers by natural increase 
alone. If there had not been a constant accession of new forces from the country, they would 
have died out repeatedly. A large fraction of the urban population consists everywhere of 
elements derived from the provinces; only an insignificant fraction can point to city ancestors for 
more than a century past. The Jews, however, have accomplished the astounding feat of so 
adapting themselves to urban life as not only to maintain themselves for two thousand years as 
an almost exclusively urban population, but even to increase in numbers under these conditions. 

This may have been in part the operation of an unconscious process of selection, resulting in the 
elimination of all those unsuited to urban life. In the case of the non- Jewish population, this 
process was not necessary, since it was constantly interrupted by the accession of new elements 
from the country districts, who married into the established families, thus bringing about a 
mingling of selected and non- selected elements. 

It is very questionable whether natural selection, in the form of the survival of the fittest, has had 
much influence on evolution. But there is no doubt that it has had an immense influence on the 
shaping and maintaining of species by means of the elimination of those unfit for the given 
environment. 

In addition to this unconscious adaption, there is also a conscious adaptation. We have already 
pointed out that the Jew is far more inclined to consult a physician, and to observe the 
physician's orders conscientiously, than is the non-Jew, and also, that the Jew - at least in the 
ghetto - is far less addicted to alcohol. This difference between Jew non- Jew is at bottom again 
merely a difference between city-dweller and country-dweller. 

Owing to the conditions of his life the latter is far superior to the city-dweller in strength; he is 
rarely ill. In the fullness of his strengths he despises disease. Owing to his love of displaying his 



60 



vigour, and to his fear of appearing to be a weakling, he considers it a disgrace to be sick; 
besides, he is often too ignorant to have confidence in a physician. 

The case with alcohol is similar. Alcohol is far less injurious to the vigorous peasant than to the 
neurasthenic city dweller. And, the better his nervous state, the greater his muscular energy the 
greater will be the quantities of alcohol he can consume without injury. Competitive drinking 
becomes a means of displaying bodily vigour, and he who avoids such tests is considered a 
coward. 

There are no celebrations in the country without extensive intoxication. This condition 
occasionally leads to brawls, to murder and other killings, but otherwise has no injurious effect 
on the healthy peasant. In the city, where there is less opportunity for varied physical movement 
in the open air, and where the work to be accomplished is either more mental or more 
monotonous, and is performed in confined quarters and shops, the need of neutralising the 
feeling of an exhausted nervous condition becomes greater, the desire for alcohol is greater than 
in the country , the opportunities for obtaining alcohol are more numerous but its effect is more 
destructive. This is clearly apparent today, with great masses of the population living and 
working in cities, and with the present comparative, if not absolute cessation in the arrival of new 
elements from the country, as compared with the size of the city population. This condition, as 
well as the progress of a knowledge of physiology, is giving rise to a more and more energetic 
struggle with alcoholism. In this matter, the Jews have a lead of centuries, not in the requirement 
of abstinence, but in their abhorrence of intoxication; not so much because of a scientific 
knowledge, as because of their social position. The nations of the south are less inclined to be 
immoderate than those of the north. The Jews, coming from the south, and now living among 
Teutons and Slavs, being cut off from their environment, were not exposed to the temptations of 
this environment. Further more, the defenceless Jew was always far more exposed to danger than 
the non-Jew, and therefore sobriety was far more necessary to him, An intoxicated Jew who 
would transgress the laws word have brought great misfortune not only upon himself but upon 
the entire Jewry of his home town. This is perhaps the best explanation that can be offered for 
the moderation of the Jews. Although originally serving only to render the position of the Jews 
more secure, and perhaps practised as a habit handed down from their Oriental home, this 
abstinence has necessarily had an extremely favourable hygienic influence. 

Of similar importance is the Jew's respect for learning, particularly for medicine. In the crude 
and ignorant condition which settled down over Europe during the migration of nations, the Jews 
were for a long time one of the few asylums still retaining remnants of ancient civilisation. As a 
result, they preserved a higher respect for science than their environment, and also practised 
science more intensively, except where this tendency was frustrated by the exclusiveness of the 
ghetto. The high level to which the art of healing had been developed among the Greeks was 
maintained in the first place by Jewish physicians, then further developed in the Orient, and 
passed on to the Arabs. Their better medical understanding was handed on to the Jews of the 
north from the Orient and from Spain. 

By reason of a gradual natural selection, as well as owing to a conscious adaptation to their 
conditions of life, the Jews were finally enabled to resist the destructive influences of the city 
environment more successfully than the new arrivals from the provinces. While the non- Jewish 



61 



city population was subject to constant renewal every few generations, the Jews had become a 
purely urban population. 

The peculiarities of their historical position not only limited the Jews to the cities, but to certain 
callings within the cities. 

They had to live as strangers among strangers, which is not so difficult for merchants. At first, 
merchants not only undertake to purchase and sell goods, but also to transport them, and such 
convoys of goods had often to be personally conducted or at least personally supervised. The 
trade in commodities required that the merchants travel and sojourn in foreign countries, and all 
those nations which had a trade in commodities had adapted and accustomed themselves to the 
presence of foreign merchants among them. 

The Jews, who found themselves compelled to leave their homeland, found it easiest to get along 
in foreign countries as merchants. Furthermore, it was those Jews whose mental makeup was 
best adapted to trade who were most likely to venture abroad. 

In their original home the Jews, like any other nation, gave birth to all the classes and vocations 
natural to their social conditions. They displayed as little as any other people the mental 
limitation considered by anthropo-sociologists as the determining characteristic of the various 
races, namely, a turning of their faculties to one calling or to a few callings at most. They 
showed as much aptitude for agriculture as for trade and industry; as much for military service as 
for the art of government; as much for philosophy as for poetry. For the mind of the individual 
human being is far richer in its aptitudes than many a race theoretician can imagine. It is only the 
barriers of a narrow, monotonous life that cause an individual to develop only a few of his 
faculties to their full capacity, and perhaps to hand them on to his progeny in a more pronounced 
form, while other faculties may become stunted through desuetude. 

The Jews outside of Palestine were therefore obliged to turn to trade chiefly. We therefore find 
them a trading nation at an early date. They thus must surely have developed emphatically those 
abilities needed by the merchant, and this great capacity must in the course of many generations 
of such activity within the same families have finally produced hereditary aptitudes and traits. 

However, the Jews did not limit themselves to trade. Wherever possible, they resorted to other 
vocations also, particularly in cities where there were great numbers of Jews. Trade can never 
support more than a small minority, for trade is non-productive. Trade may under certain 
circumstances facilitate production but can never replace it. The Jews could not constitute a large 
fraction of the population of a city except where they were permitted to practise some other 
calling besides that of trade, perhaps a handicraft. On the other hand, where great numbers of 
Jews were living together, artisans and members of the liberal professions, such as physicians, 
who were of Jewish extraction, had better opportunities to maintain themselves as they found 
among their numerous co-religionists a strong support and an adequate market for their products 
and services. In antiquity, wherever the Jews lived together in great numbers, for instance, in 
Alexandria, we find also many artisans among them, in spite of that mysterious race predilection 
which is supposed to have made the commercial spirit an ineradicable characteristic of every Jew 
from the very beginning of history, in other words, long before there was any such thing as trade. 



62 



Being exclusively city-dwellers, they naturally did not favour those callings for which the new 
arrival from the country is best adapted, but those for which city life is the best preparation: such 
callings are those, on the one hand, which require much intelligence and theoretical knowledge, 
and which, on the other hand, do not demand much physical strength. When they turn to 
handicraft, they become, therefore, tailors rather than smiths, while the surplus of the merchant 
families, which cannot be absorbed in commerce, or which does not need to practise commerce, 
turns to purely mental labour. 

Trade not only develops an excellent material foundation for mental labour, by favouring the 
prosperity of the families concerned, but far more by reason of the excellent natural talents 
encouraged by it. In my book, Foundations of Christianity, I already pointed out the 
connection between "trade and philosophy". [3J 1 have shown in that work that industry develops 
rather the abilities required by the reproductive arts, while trade develops rather the capacities for 
mathematical, abstract thought, but also for investigation and mental speculation, the tendency to 
associate with elements known those unknown elements that are necessarily connected with 
them. Furthermore, world commerce expands the horizon beyond that which is customary and 
traditional. 

To be sure, scientific speculation is not to be regarded as identical with commercial speculation. 
But they differ not in the abilities required for them, but in the conditions of their application. 
Occupation with trade, investigation and speculation from an interested standpoint, are a great 
obstacle to disinterested investigation and speculation, in other words, to scientific work, and 
vice versa. 

"Trade develops the necessary ability for scientific purposes, but not its application to scientific 
ends. On the contrary, where trade secures an influence over learning, its effect is entirely in the 
direction of doctoring the results of learning for its own purposes, of which our present-day 
bourgeois learning presents numerous examples. 

"Scientific thought could only be developed in a class that was endowed with all the gifts, 
experience and knowledge involved in trade, but also liberated from the necessity of earning a 
living, and therefore possessing the necessary leisure, opportunity, and pleasure in disinterested 
investigation, in the solution of problems without regard to their immediate, practical and 
personal outcome." 

These conditions were realised in antiquity in some of the Greek commercial cities, but also in a 
number of Jewish settlements, particularly in Alexandria. We have already pointed out the 
importance of the Alexandrian Jewry in the history of medicine. Its importance in the 
development of philosophy is equally considerable. 

Their respect for science and their desire to provide the scholar with an existence free from 
material care distinguished the Jews of the Middle Ages as mentally far superior to their 
barbarous environment. The Church was one of the communities, besides the Jews, which 
maintained alive the remnants of ancient civilisation in the midst of the Christian-Teutonic 
barbarism, and for this the Church has been not a little praised. But little attention has been given 
to the fact that the Church was practising a mental selection of the most dubious kind. In the 



63 



Jewish families marriage and parenthood on the part of the most intelligent were assiduously 
encouraged. [4] The Catholic Church absorbed the mast intelligent elements of the Christian 
families and doomed them to celibacy, forbade them to reproduce. This was equivalent to the 
precise opposite of the Jewish process of selection; the Church was practising a breeding of the 
most stupid, of course only during the period in which it served as the goal of the most intelligent 
men in the nation. [5\ 

Leeky, in his Rise and Influence of the Spirit of Rationalism in Europe, describes in glowing 
words the enthusiasm of the Jews for learning: 

"While those around them were groveling in the darkness of besotted ignorance; while juggling 
miracles and lying relics were the themes on which all Europe was expatiating; while the 
intellect of Christendom, enthralled by countless superstitions, had sunk into a deadly torpor, in 
which all love of enquiry and all search for truth were abandoned, the Jews were still pursuing 
the path of knowledge, amassing learning, and stimulating progress with the same unflinching 
constancy that they manifested in their faith. They were the most skilful physicians, the ablest 
financiers, and among the most profound philosophers; while they were only second to the 
Moors in the cultivation of natural science. They were also the chief interpreters to Western 
Europe of Arab learning. But their most important service, and that with which we are now most 
especially concerned, was in sustaining commercial activity. For centuries they were almost its 
only representatives." [6] 

Such were the circumstances under which the mental character of Judaism developed - and not 
from its "race" - whatever that may mean - but from the historical peculiarity of its social 
evolution. Precisely this historical evolution imparted to the Jews those qualities needed by 
capitalism, those qualities most conducive to success under capitalism. The capitalist mode of 
production is predominantly urban in character; it concentrates the mass of the population in 
cities, makes the provinces economically dependent on the cities. It transforms all of production 
into commodities production, makes all of production dependent on the trade in commodities. It 
abolishes the handicraft routine, and replaces it by the application of science to all fields. 

Therefore that section of the population will make itself most felt within capitalism whose 
faculties have been best adapted to urban life, to trade, to scientific labour: this means the Jews. 

Of course, Sombart explains the capitalist spirit as well as the power of mental abstraction found 
among the Jews not on the basis of their urban life, nor of their commercial activity, but as due to 
the - cattle-breeding practised by the nomads of the desert who were among the ancestors of the 
Jews thousands of years ago! 

"Out of the boundless desert, out of the supervision of flocks, arises capitalism in contrast to the 
old established economic order. The management of herds has no definitely limited domain, no 
clearly defined field of activity, for the field of cattle-breeding is unlimited; its practice may be 
destroyed overnight, or may grow ten-fold in the course of a few years." 

Sombart does not explain how he accomplishes the miracle of causing a herd of cattle to grow 
ten-fold in the course of a few years; and yet such a revelation would be very valuable as an aid 



64 



to overcoming the high price of meat. Furthermore, Sombart appears to regard pasture - in the 
wilderness - as unlimited, as well as the fodder furnished by it, which manifestly must also grow 
ten-fold in the course of a few years. 

This new history of the origin of capitalism continues: 

"Here (in the wilderness) alone, in the cattle-breeding economy - never in the sphere of 
agriculture - could the idea of gain strike root. Here only could economy be adapted naturally to 
an unlimited increase of the number of products." 

In other words, the idea of unlimited increase, in other words, of unlimited fruitfulness, could 
only arise in the most unfruitful wildernesses, never in the most fruitful agricultural countries. 
The sandy desert is the indicated soil for the production of cattle and cattle- fodder in unlimited 
quantities. 

But the desert not only creates the possibility of an unlimited increase of products, but the 
nomadic mode of pasturing pursued in the desert also creates the impulse to increase 
"possessions" beyond all limits, without regard to whether they are needed or not. Karl Marx 
supposed that the boundless proportions attained by the desire for accumulating a hoard, for 
collecting gold and silver, were a result of the production of commodities. But Sombart knows 
better. It was not the production of commodities, but the fact that oxen and cows produce calves, 
that created the boundless impulse-in the desert - of accumulating hoards in cattle, of 
multiplying one's holdings in cattle tenfold in the course of a few years, without asking for a 
moment whether this increased quantity can be put to any use, in other words, for the mere 
pleasure of counting the number of heads of cattle. 

"Here only was it possible for the conception to arise that the abstract quantity of commodities 
and not the quality of utility is the dominant category of economic life. Here, for the first time, 
counting was resorted to in economic life. But the elements of rationalism also penetrated into 
the economic life, owing to nomad habits, which thus (!) become the father of capitalism in 
almost every respect. Again we find an immensely increased illumination for our understanding 
of the close relation between capitalism and Judaism, the latter here appearing as the connecting 
link between the former and nomadism." [7J 

The "immensely increased illumination" which we find here serves only to illuminate the 
boundless fertility of the wilderness of our professor's imagination. 



Footnotes 

L Fishberg, German ed., p. 86. 

Z Die Neue Zeit, Vol. viii, pp.22 et seq. cf. also my article, Das Massaker von Kischeneff una 1 
die Judenfrage, Die Neue Zeit, Vol.xxi, part 2, p. 303. 



65 



! Op. cit, pp.203-208. 

4, Ibid., p.207. 

5. This condition finally attained absurd dimensions among the Jews of Poland. In the section of 
his Geschichte der neueren Philosophie that deals with the Jewish philosopher Maimon (born 
1754, died 1800), Kuno Fischer says: 

"Among the Polish Jews the Talmudists and rabbis enjoyed the greatest prestige. Every family 
regarded it as a matter of pride to have a scholar of this type among its members, and if none of 
its sons was a Talmudist, effort was made to secure a son-in-law to embellish the family with 
such a connection. Young Talmudists were very much in demand as good matches ... Salomon 
Maimon had attained the third (supreme) degree in the Talmudic learning at the age of nine ... He 
was married before attaining the age of eleven. He was a husband in his eleventh year, a father in 
his fourteenth year:" (Section v, pp.120, 121.) 

6^ W.E.H. Lecky, History of the Rise and Influence of the Spirit of Rationalism in Europe, 

New York 1910, vol.ii, p. 103. 

7. Die Juden und das Wirtachaftsleben, pp.426, 426. 



66 



Chapter VII 

The Assimilation of the Jews 

THE mental race traits of the Jews are said to be of such nature as to constitute a profound and 
impassable gulf between them and all other races. On examination, this information resolves 
itself into the fact that the great mass of the Jews has constituted for two thousand years an 
exclusive, hereditary caste of urban merchants, financiers, intellectuals, including some artisans, 
and has developed, by practice and accumulation from generation to generation, more and more 
of the traits peculiar to all these strata, as opposed to the peasant masses of the rest of the 
population. 

The Jews have always been distinguished from the latter since the termination of the existence of 
the Jewish state; they have always seemed strangers to the rest of the population, a condition 
encouraged in the Middle Ages by the fact that each vocation within the city was always 
concentrated in a certain quarter of the city. Within this quarter, if several races were 
represented, each of the races had its specific section. In addition, in the case of the Jews, we also 
have the peculiarity of their religion and their rite, all of which are matters that have nothing to 
do with race traits. But while the Jews may always have appeared foreign, they were not always 
treated as enemies. Whether the Jews were regarded favourably or not depended entirely on the 
needs and conditions of the country in which they lived. The opposition which is frequently 
represented as a natural race hostility was determined by very mutable economic circumstances. 

Wherever there was need of merchants or financiers, or intellectuals in general, and wherever the 
native supply of such elements was insufficient, the Jew was welcome. Such was the case in the 
Christian empires of Western and Northern Europe in. the centuries after the migration of 
nations, in other words, at precisely the period when "Germanism" must have been in evidence 
in its purest form. Cities then developed with the utmost difficulty. The Jews were welcome as a 
means of invigorating the economic life of the cities. 

"At all points where this formation of cities is going on, where an urban community is 
developing out of the former castellum of the Romans, the Jews contributed a decisive element 
by bringing trade within the walls. This is expressed in a truly classic manner in the words in 
which Bishop Rudiger of Speyer opens his Charter to the Jews in the year 1084: 'Desiring to 
make a city out of the village of Speyer, I have admitted the Jews The Bishop not only points 
out that the Jews enjoy the same rights in other cities, such as complete trade privileges, property 
in land, local autonomy, but adds also: T have thought to multiply one thousand times the honour 
of our city by gathering the Jews within its walls'. This Charter was expanded into a general 
privilege by Emperor Henry IV. The Archbishop of Cologne in his Charter of 1252 says: 'We 
believe that it will redound not a little to our prosperity and honour if the Jews who entrust 
themselves to our support and who - hoping for our protection and our favour- submit to our rule 
- may actually enjoy this protection.'" |T1 

The Jews of Cologne obtained not only autonomy within the Jewish quarter but full rights of 
citizenship and admission to parish offices. Thus, G.L. von Maurer quotes a document dating 
from "about 1200", in which a Jew named Egeberth is appointed as Alderman of the Parish of 
Saint Lorenz. [2_[ But von Maurer is obliged to admit that the Jews did not hold this favourable 



67 



position except "for a time". "On the whole, they had greater privileges in the earlier period than 
in the later." [31 

For the Jews in Christendom fared somewhat as the Germans in Bohemia. As long as they were 
needed in order to develop and encourage the growth of cities and in order to invigorate trade, 
they were welcome. When the cities began to develop a class of native financiers, traders, and 
artisans, the imported foreigners, once they had become established, were no longer regarded as 
a welcome assistance, but as an undesirable competition, as "undesirable aliens". The population 
suddenly bethought itself that some difference or other, of religious or other nature - the 
distinctions between races had not yet been invented in those "dark" ages - constituted an 
opposition obliging one to persecute the foreigners. While the Jews had been sought for in 
Western Europe down into the Thirteenth Century, every effort was made from that time on to 
make life unbearable for them, to abridge their rights; they were maltreated, plundered, and 
driven out, if not actually slain. Wherever a wretched existence is still possible for them, their 
activity is restricted in every possible way. They are prevented from engaging in large-scale 
commercial enterprises, are forbidden to own land, to practise a trade. Nothing is left to them but 
the trade of usury and a petty huckstery and colportage. The haggling Jew as a type of the Jewish 
"race" is a product of Christian charity. 

We may mention - merely as a curiosity - the fact that it was during this period of the most 
intense persecutions that the Jews were forbidden to visit disorderly houses. Thus Queen Jeanne 
I issued such a prohibition in 1347 for the City of Avignon. This pious and virtuous potentate 
reserved the privilege of visiting the bordello to Christians. By reason of its enduring into the 
Sixteenth Century, this privilege was transformed into a greater privilege on the part of 
Christians to acquire syphilis. [4J Perhaps as a measure of compensatory justice, Christians were 
forbidden to obtain treatment from Jewish physicians. 

The reader will observe that the health of the Christians was not enhanced by the persecutions of 
the Jews. 

The rise of the modern state at first brought no alleviation to the Jews. To be sure, the state's 
strong police power considerably abridged irregular plundering - the plunderings of its subjects 
now became the monopoly of the state, and were applied, with the aid of its organized power, in 
the form of taxes. 

On the other hand, this same state authority showed itself to be very suspicious toward all 
autonomous bodies. Any independence, any deviation from the mode of thought prescribed by 
the state power was tabooed and often subject to cruel penalties. Thus, the religion of the ruling 
monarch was considered to determine also the religious feeling of all his subjects. Where the 
Jews were weak and not numerous, their religious peculiarities might still be tolerated. Where 
they constituted a power, they were now most brutally maltreated by the state authority, 
frequently driven out of the country, as was the case particularly in Spain and Portugal. 
Hundreds of thousands were banished from the former country in 1492, and hundreds of 
thousands of others converted to Christianity by force. A similar compulsion was carried out in 
Portugal shortly thereafter. 



68 



It was not until industrial capital became strong that the general position became more 
favourable to the Jews. 

Industrial capital arises not only in opposition to feudal landlordism and to guild handicraft and 
financial capital. The latter aim at attaining privileges from the state, while industrial capital 
seeks to maintain free competition within its ranks. The greater the competition among 
merchants and those who hold the power to grant credits, the better will industry flourish. It was 
in the interest of industry to permit Jewish traders and Jewish financiers to compete with 
Christians, to abolish the barriers which kept out the former. This attitude was fully in keeping 
with the general tendency to abolish mediaeval guilds. The ghetto was one of the mediaeval 
corporations. It had to go, in the interest of a speedy evolution of capitalism; though it continued, 
in some cities, into the Modern Era, its fate was sealed. 

But industrial capitalism is distinguished from the artisanry of the Feudal Era not only by reason 
of the fact that it is obliged to break down all the guild barriers, but also because of the fact that it 
substitutes an application of science for the traditional routine. Simultaneously there ensues a 
necessary expansion of the newspaper system. For these reasons, as well as for others, the 
enumeration of which would take us too far afield, the demand for intellectuals of every variety 
increased. But the supply offered by the feudal state was comparatively low. The Church still 
absorbed so many intellectuals as to constitute a serious interference with the demands of 
learning and capital. It became absolutely necessary for the new and rising mode of production to 
liberate the Jewish intelligentsia and to cut off the uninterrupted blood-letting practised by the 
Church, particularly the Catholic Church, with its commandment of celibacy, on the non- Jewish 
intelligentsia. 

In all these efforts, industrial capitalism found itself impeded more and more not only by feudal 
landlordism, by guild handicraft, by the Church, by the privileged strata among the intellectuals, 
by the commercial organisations, by high finance, but also by the power of the state itself, which 
was ruled by these classes, and which was naturally applying the means of its authority in the 
interests of these classes. 

Only by overthrowing this authority could the path be cleared for a most speedy evolution of the 
new mode of production. In this process, industrial capitalism found allies only in the lower 
classes, in the proletariat and in the peasantry, as well as in those strata of the petty bourgeoisie 
and the intelligentsia which were not among the privileged classes and which could advance only 
by means of an elimination of all privileges. Thus modern democracy arose with its 
pronouncement of the equality of all creatures in human form. The natural consequence was an 
effort to emancipate Judaism, and also - on the other hand - an alliance between the energetic, 
aggressive elements of Judaism and revolution. Only through revolution could Judaism be 
liberated. 

The negative, destructive, critical spirit which is said to be a natural trait of the Jewish race is in 
reality the necessary outcome of the social and political situation of Judaism, which excluded it 
from all the advantages of existing society, and made the Jews feel their disadvantages most 
keenly. If this spirit is a race trait, it is among the invariable race traits of every oppressed and 
exploited class during such period of oppression and exploitation. 



69 



The liberation of the Jews was realised in the great French Revolution and in its minor 
successors. It was heralded by an increasing tolerance for the Jews in the mare advanced 
capitalist states, first in Holland, then in England, beginning with the Seventeenth Century, a 
change which brought many Spanish and Portuguese Jewish or pseudo-Christian capitalists to 
those states. Finally, the Jew obtained equal rights with all other citizens. Thereupon he began to 
rise rapidly in capitalistic society, to whose needs he had become so perfectly adapted, in trade, 
in banking, in journalism, in medicine, in jurisprudence. But simultaneously there also began the 
Jew's adaptation to non- Jewish society, his assimilation. 

This process was apparent in his language; the modern Jew no longer speaks with a Jewish 
accent. Then it ensued in his rite: the dietary laws and commandments for the celebration of 
festivals, which once separated the Jew from the non- Jew, constituting such a profound gulf 
between them, now cease to govern the Jew entirely. More and more Jews leave their religious 
community. Zollschan cites an estimate made by Licencie de la Roy, to the effect that more than 
two hundred thousand Jews were baptised in the course of the Nineteenth Century, not including 
conversions to dissenting groups or the baptisms of children of mixed marriages. And this 
tendency to conversions from Judaism is on the increase. In Vienna, the annual number of 
conversions was as follows 

Conversions No of Jews 
from Judaism per Conversion 

1886-1890 330 359 

1896-1900 511 288 

1900 607 240 

1906 643 



After giving these data, together with many others, Zollschan draws the following inference: 

"If we recapitulate all this material, we shall find a considerable increase in the number of Jewish 
baptisms in western countries. Judaism in Austria (not counting Galicia) is losing more than 2 
per 1,000 of its adherents annually; in Germany, at least 1 per 1,000; in Hungary, about 3/4 per 
1,000, to Christianity. On the other hand, the huge Jewish zone in Russia and Galicia is 
maintaining its ground against Christian influences and is suffering only slight abrasions." 5J 

Far greater than the number of Jews who abandon their religious affiliation is the number of 
those who, though they remain in it, nevertheless completely relinquish their religious practice 
and their religious mode of thought. Of course, the same process is simultaneously going on 
among the great majority of the non- Jewish urban population, who also, by force of habit, still 
remain within the field of the traditional religious organisations, without having the slightest 
share in the religious life of these organisations. The religious assimilation of the Jews in 
Western Europe is making rapid progress, not so much because the Jews are accepting the 
Christian faith or the Christians accepting the Jewish faith, as because both parties are 
succumbing to the same unbelief and to the same religious indifferentism. 



70 



This finds its expression also in the number of mixed marriages, which is increasing rapidly. 
Thus, the number of mixed marriages between Jews and non-Jews in Prussia was: 



Average for the Years 







Percentage of 
Purely Jewish Marriages 


1875-1884 




10.1 


1885-1894 




12.4 


1895-1899 




16.9 


1905 




23.6 


1906 




23.3 


1907 




25.6 



In the large cities with a numerous Jewish population, the number of mixed marriages is either 
already very large, or is rapidly increasing. 

The figures for a few of these cities are given below. 

City Average Number of Mixed Marriages 

for the Years Between Jews and Non-Jews 

(Given as a Percentage of 
Purely Jewish Marriages) 



Berlin 


1901-1904 


35.4 




1905 


44.4 


Frankfort on the Main 


1905 


22.5 




1906 


26.0 




1907 


19.6 




1908 


30.7 


Hamburg 


1903-1905 


49.5 


Amsterdam 


1899 


8.1 




1900 


8.8 




1901 


11.3 




1902 


13.6 



1903 



20.1 



71 



The figures for Amsterdam especially show a rapid increase in mixed marriages. 

In Italy, France, England, and the United States, there are no religious statistics. Zollschan sadly 
observes that in these countries, in which the Jews have the fullest freedom, "the process of 
dissolution of the native Jewry is proceeding at full speed" 61 In the Jewish families of Italy 
which belong to the higher social classes he says it has "almost become a rule to marry their 
children only to Christians". 

The figures from Trieste, until recently an Austrian city, but which has always had a 
predominantly Italian population, point in the same direction. In Austria, mixed marriages were 
subject to considerable limitation, being permitted only between Jews and unbelievers. And 
marriages in which both the Jewish and the Christian party were without religious affiliation 
were not considered as mixed marriages. 

In spite of all this, the number of mixed marriages in Trieste, as a percentage of purely Jewish 
marriages, was as follows 

1877-1890 33.3 
1891-1895 38.5 
1900-1903 61.4 

To be sure, this is in the country of "black" Italians. But - oh, horror! - in the land of the noblest 
blonds, the "black-blond mix-up", in spite of all the offence this may give to Sombart's holiest 
emotions, is proceeding most abominably. In Copenhagen, the number of mixed marriages 
between Jews and non-Jews, expressed as a percentage of the purely Jewish marriages, was as 
follows: 

1880-1889 55.8 
1889-1899 68.7 
1900-1905 82.9 

Accordingly, Zollschan declares: 

"It is apparent that the Jewish population of Denmark has not increased in the sixty years from 
1840 to 1901, but has decreased absolutely and even more, relatively. In 1840, 0.3 per cent, of 
the total population was still Jewish; in 1901, only 0.14 per cent. The proportion of Jews had 
therefore decreased by more than one-half. The reason is not only the comparatively small 
number of children, but chiefly the numerous mixed marriages by means of which the Danish 
Jews are being gradually absorbed by the non- Jewish population." JT[ 

The examples of Italy and Denmark go to show how correct were the calculations of those 
champions of Jewish emancipation who expected that it would result in a complete absorption of 



72 



the Jews by the races among which they lived. Zollschan is right; it is only in the ghetto, in a 
condition of compulsory exclusion from their environment, and under political pressure, 
deprived of their rights and surrounded by hostility, that the Jews can maintain themselves 
among other peoples. They will dissolve, unite with their environment and disappear, where the 
Jew is regarded and treated as a free man and as an equal. 

There now remains only one possible source of a new lease of life for Judaism and therefore also 
for the "Jewish peril", namely, the peril that non-Jews will be forced out by Jews in the struggle 
of capitalist competition. This new lease of life for the "Jewish peril" may come from anti- 
Semitism. 



Footnotes 

L Zollschan, Das Rassenproblem, pp.351, 353. 

2. Geschichte der Stadteverfassung, vol.ii, p.232. 

3. Op. cit, p.230. 

4. Lecky, op cit., vol.ii, pp.100, 101, especially the footnotes. 

5. Zollschan, op. cit., p. 475. 

6. Zollschan, op. cit., p. 477. 

7. Zollschan, op. cit., p. 478. 



73 



Chapter VII 
Anti-Semitism 

INDUSTRIAL capitalism, by means of its union with the revolutionary portions of the 
intelligentsia, had put down the elements opposing it. The result was a form of the state 
organisation which favoured an extremely rapid growth of industrial capital but also permitted 
the disadvantages involved in the latter for the petty bourgeoisie and the proletariat to express 
themselves most clearly. Sooner or later each of these two classes turned its back on bourgeois 
democracy or liberalism - the earlier, the lower was the degree of revolutionary energy 
developed by the latter in the period of its rise, and the less profound was therefore its spiritual 
control of the masses of the people, which depended in turn on the stage reached in the general 
economic evolution and therefore by the proletarian movement as a whole. The later the 
introduction of the bourgeois-democratic opposition and revolution, the greater is the internal 
resistance it feels by reason of its fear of the proletariat. As we travel from west to east, from 
England to Russia, we find liberalism entering later and later on the political arena. We find 
liberalism therefore growing weaker and weaker, being less and less capable of maintaining the 
proletarians and petty bourgeois in a state of dependence on itself, and the earlier do both these 
elements cut loose from liberalism, until finally, in Russia, we reach a stage where the 
proletariat, as well as the petty bourgeoisie, has already been separated from liberalism before it 
enters upon the political struggle. 

But the opposition to liberalism; assumes, as is well known, quite a different form among the 
proletariat than among the petty bourgeoisie. Both find their social position in capitalistic society 
intolerable. But, in the case of the proletariat, the achievements of democracy and of capitalist 
economy are the presupposition for its own liberation. The proletariat does not seek to neutralise 
these achievements of democracy, but rather to annex them, to utilize them in its own struggle. 

The petty bourgeoisie would have as much to gain from socialism as the proletariat, but only a 
portion of its members is able to rise, through its political leadership, to the recognition of this 
fact. The conditions of its existence at the present time depend on private property in the means 
of production and on the exploitation of wage-labourers, particularly of the weakest of all wage- 
labourers, particularly women and children. In this process, it encounters the resistance of the 
proletariat, and is made to contrast sharply with the proletariat and its socialist tendencies. 

Considerable portions of the petty bourgeoisie, turning from liberalism, do not seek their 
salvation in advancing beyond liberalism, but rather feel themselves obliged to retrace their 
steps, to become politically and economically reactionary, in which process they find allies in the 
powers that had been surmounted by liberalism. 

Of course, they cannot turn back the wheel of history. No doubt, capitalism is changing. With the 
issues of stock shares and the expansion of the banks, industrial capital is concentrating more and 
more and beginning to coincide with financial capital. The tendencies of the primitive financial 
and trading capital to eliminate competition by private monopoly are again becoming manifest.. 
The political reaction may for a time be encouraged by such measures, but economically 
capitalism is thus being pushed to the extreme. The petty bourgeoisie gains nothing by such 
methods. 



74 



Powerless to combat capitalism as a whole, it has no other recourse than to fight individual, 
partial manifestations of capitalism and thus to join the political reaction, of which it expects, of 
course in vain, an economic reaction also. 

In this situation, it finds a fruitful soil for the reawakening of anti-Semitic tendencies. The battle 
against capital as a whole seems hopeless. But the conflict with Judaism, with Jewish capital, 
which is so unpleasantly felt by many a non- Jewish capitalist, seems to afford better prospects of 
success. 

But not only proletarians and petty bourgeois turn their backs on liberalism, which has not 
fulfilled their expectations, and feel themselves threatened by the rising tide of Judaism. The 
vanguard of liberalism had been composed of intellectuals. As long as they occupied an 
exceptional position, as long as they were an unusual curiosity, their position was favourable; but 
this condition gradually subsided in the course of the Nineteenth Century. An overproduction of 
intellectuals began to make itself felt, for which there were many reasons, not the least among 
which was the decline of the petty bourgeoisie, which is sending its sons - now even its 
daughters - to the university, or, if the means are not available for this, at least to commercial 
and trade schools, in order to enable them to make their way as clerks or as independent mental 
workers, since handicraft and petty trade no longer afford these opportunities. Again we find, in 
the most varied fields, that it is the Jews who advance most quickly. Therefore, among non- 
Jewish intellectuals and clerks also, those who are incapable of accepting socialism, which 
would put an end to all the ills of a competitive society, become quite accessible to anti-Semitic 
influences, which are an expression of their own discontent with life. 

Thus, since the 'seventies of the Nineteenth Century, we again find movements in rather 
extensive sections of the population of Germany, Austria, France, etc., which favour a political 
disfranchisement, and a legal restriction or at least a social boycott of the Jews. Aspirations 
which unite with the anti- Jewish hatred on the part of narrow-minded circles and with the 
contempt for the Jews on the part of feudal arrogance, to both of which they impart renewed 
strength. 

Sombart manages to justify to himself the reduction of the rights of Jews in the army and at the 
universities: 

"The practice in all of Germany at present, in filling the professorships at the universities, as well 
as in admissions to the position of Privatdozent, is practically not to exclude Jews on principle, 
but to place certain restrictions on their admission or election. This may be regrettable in the 
interest of an officially certified science, for it is always equivalent to an injury to the scientific 
performance of a serious institution of learning if of two competitors the more stupid is chosen 
for a certain position. But is it possible to consider scientific interests alone, or even 
predominantly, in filling the positions of professors at a university? Or, putting the question to fit 
our conditions: Would it be a conceivable and tolerable condition to have all the positions of 
Dozent and Professors at the universities filled by Jews - baptised or not baptized - that makes 
no difference? Since the Jews are on the average so much brighter and so much more industrious 
than we, this might be equivalent to completely handing over the positions of university 



75 



instruction to the Jews ... Perhaps the universities will suffer more from such restrictions than the 
Jews themselves ... But in the long run, it is better thus." J_1J 

Well then: learning suffers more from the existing condition of keeping out the Jews, but 
nevertheless it is "in the long run, better thus", for the universities are "after all" not institutions 
in which "the interests of science alone, or even predominantly, may be considered". They are 
not the seat of the high goddess of science, but merely stalls for the needed milch cattle, 
institutions which must provide so and so many posts for so and so many aspirants coming from 
good families. Therefore it would not be right to permit the Jews to take possession of the whole 
business. "But in the long run, it is better thus." 

And how about the army? Here, it really appears that the officers will not tolerate Jews among 
their number and for so "clever a man" as Sombart that is quite sufficient. 

"The traditions followed in the army are, after all, anti-Semitic traditions ... This is a fact that 
may be regretted but which cannot be eliminated because of this regret, a fact with which every 
clever man will have to reckon." [2] 

All persons who take off their hats to any obstacle that would require a greater exertion of energy 
than mere "regretting" apparently seem "clever" to Sombart. 

We should therefore not be astonished to find Sombart formulating his "programme" on the 
Jewish question "briefly" as follows 

"The nations give their (the nations'?) Jewish fellow-citizens full equality of rights, and the Jews 
will surely be intelligent and tactful enough not to demand a full exercise of this equality of 
rights at every point and to the fullest possible extent." 3} 

This "intelligence", which at one and the same time offers to both the Jews and their opponents 
everything they ask, to the former of course only in the protasis, to the latter in the apodosis, is 
really matchless and baffles all attempts to parallel it. 

In spite of all the anti-Semitism, of all the restrictions and disabilities of the Jews, the rise of 
Judaism, together - of course - with its dissolution because of desertions from the faith and 
because of mixed marriages, is still in progress. The data we have already given on this subject 
are all taken from the period of the renaissance of anti-Semitism. 

If, in spite of this fact, the effects of assimilation have been apparently brought to a standstill, 
and Judaism is not losing ground as a distinct racial group, we may ascribe this to the movement 
that has recently been gaining greatly in popularity among the Jews of Eastern Europe. 

We have seen above how the persecutions of the Jews precisely in the days of humanism and 
precisely in the most enlightened sections of Europe made existence almost impossible for the 
Jews, who fled to the East, to Poland, and Turkey. In these barbarous countries they were 
tolerated precisely for the reason that they were barbarous countries which were in need of a city 
population. In their capacity as strangers, being tolerated merely, they must have been 



76 



particularly welcome in the eyes of those in power, who would necessarily regard with disfavour 
a strong urban bourgeoisie, which would have limited their own power. 

In the regions then belonging to Poland and Turkey, in Hungary, Rumania, Poland proper, and 
the western portion of Russia, the Jews gathered from all portions of Europe, particularly from 
Germany. The Spanish Jews, for the most part, sought the southern sections of European Turkey 
(Saloniki). The legal, and for the most part even the economic, situation of the Jews in Turkey, is 
at present still the best in the world. [4] 

Most of the Jews in the world have concentrated in these regions. According to figures given by 
Nawratzki, the number of Jews in the world immediately before the war was between 12,500,000 
and 13,000,000. 5J Trieksch gives a higher estimate [61; he makes their total number 14,500,000 
in 1914. 

Nawratzki assigns 6,000,000 Jews to Russia, 1,000,000 to Galicia and the Bukowina, 900,000 to 
Hungary, 300,000 to Rumania, 200,000 to European Turkey, while Trieksch assigns 7,000,000 
to Russia, 2,300,000 to Austria, 300,000 to Rumania, and 400,000 to Turkey. [7] 

In other words, about 8,500,000-10,000,000 Jews in round numbers were living in the domains 
of former Poland and former Turkey. Those living in Great Britain (250,000-300,000) and 
America (2,300,000-2,500,000) have for the most part migrated into those countries from the 
former regions in comparatively recent days. This would give a figure of from 1 1,000,000 to 
13,000,000 living in Eastern Europe, or coming from Eastern Europe, and of not quite 2,000,000 
Jews of every provenience in the rest of the world. 

They are found most densely settled in the regions of former Poland, where they came directly 
from Germany or by way of Germany, with the result that they have preserved to this day a 
peculiar language distinguishing them from their Slavonic environment, the so-called Yiddish, a 
corrupt German - the only Jewish population in the world that has not assimilated the language 
of its environment. It is in this Russian-Polish Jewish population that the Jew's consciousness, or 
orthodoxy, has been most vigorously and actively maintained. 

Living together in such great numbers, they could not remain a nation of merchants, usurers and 
intellectuals alone. This was made all the less possible by the fact that the country in which they 
lived was not only economically backward when they settled there, but continued to remain so. 
The shifting of trade routes to India, once a landroute over Europe, later a sea-route, 
circumnavigating Africa, the discovery of America, the displacement of the economic centre of 
gravity of Europe to the coast of the Atlantic Ocean, retarded the development not only of Italy, 
but still more that of Poland and Turkey, and thus inaugurated the political decline and 
disintegration of those two countries. Under these circumstances, no strong capitalist industry 
could develop, and the intelligentsia also were cut off from their relations with the mental life of 
the rest of Europe and became entirely subordinate to the servants of the religious rite. The entire 
magnificent mental growth ensuing upon the Italian Renaissance did not exist for them. They 
remained living in the age of scholasticism, in the Jewish scholasticism of the Talmud. This 
species of intellectual ability was required only among the Jews, and the demand for any other 
kind of intelligence on the part of the non- Jewish community was very low. Therefore, a large 



77 



portion of the Polish Jews turned to handicrafts, particularly to tailoring. In the Jewish pale, in 
other words, in that portion of the Russian Empire in which the great mass of the Jews were 
alone permitted to dwell, the Russian Census of 1897, which was the first and last census carried 
out by the Czarist Empire, gives the following occupational figures: 





Jews 


Non-Jews Jews 


Non-Jews 


Total population 


1,428,835 9,854,054 


100 


100 


Employed in Industry 


518,075 


1,132,264 


36 


11.5 


Employed in the Garment Industry 


285,993 


222,764 


16.5 


2.0 


Employed in Commerce 


450,427 


108,499 


31.5 


1.7 


Employed in Grain and Cattle Trade 202,016 


57,485 


14 


0.6 



Employed in Gainful Occupations Per Each 100 

Absolute Number Occupations Percentages Non-Jews in 

the Same Category 
There Were 

14.5 
46 
106 
415 
851 

These figures are those of our own times. 8} In former days, the Jews constituted the great mass 
of the urban, commercial, and, in many cases, even the industrial population in the regions we 
are discussing. 

After the Crimean War, and during the era of liberalism which ensued upon it, a fully developed 
western capitalism suddenly forced its way into those economically backward countries. Its first 
effect was that of immensely increasing the money needs of the state, its indebtedness, but also 
its tax burdens. At a single stroke, the natural economy of the peasant was transformed into a 
commodities economy, which under the given circumstances did not improve the operation of 
his farm, but rather ruined it by reason of a more and more intensified robbing of the soil. An 
increasing proportion of the country population was driven into the cities. As early as in the 
census of 1897, of the 14,300,000 non-Jewish inhabitants of the cities, 7,300,000 had come from 
the peasantry. [9J The influx from city to country has since assumed much greater proportions. 
But in the cities, these persons found no quickly growing industry which might have been able to 
absorb them, nor did the deteriorating peasants offer any adequate market for such an industry. 
Competition grew among artisans and peddlers. The Jews were now oppressed more and more; 
their situation - never very brilliant - now became more and more hopeless. But the non- Jewish 
population also suffered; the frame of production was too small to accommodate all, and the 
mass of the population was too ignorant to seek or find a solution of these difficulties in a 
corresponding expansion of this frame, for the condition of economic backwardness was closely 
connected with the political backwardness, and any effort to alter the state authority was also 
connected with too many dangers. It was far less dangerous, far more convenient and simple to 
turn against that competition which was represented by the defenceless Jews. 



The state authority itself, in its various organs, met these tendencies more than halfway. For it 
felt itself threatened by the results of the economic revolution, even though the latter might for 
the present be engendering political opposition, not in the masses of the people, but only in the 
young men and women at the universities. The growing discontent was unmistakable; the heads 
of the state felt it necessary to ward it off, and the unhappy Jews were obliged to furnish a 
convenient lightning-rod. 



78 



The anti-Semitic tendencies in the upper and lower strata were strengthened by the fact that in 
Russia, more than anywhere else, the Jews had escaped assimilation by reason of their 
concentration in a single region. They differed greatly from the rest of the population, not only - 
as we have already seen - by their rigid adherence to their rite, to the dietary laws, the observing 
of holidays, the peculiarities of their language 101, but also in their headdress. In Russia and the 
adjacent countries, more than anywhere else, the Jew has remained a foreigner among the 
people. Foreignness may be comic in its effect where it reveals only a difference, and is not 
associated with asocial contradiction. But when the latter also is present, it makes the difference 
more striking and tangible, it produces inciting and embittering conditions. 

Thus there arose after a short period of liberalism, and beginning with the 'eighties of the 
Nineteenth Century, a period of a most savage and intensifying anti-Semitism, of increasing 
maltreatments of the Jews by their environment, and of a progressive disfranchisement. After 
1882, the Jews were limited to a pale of settlement embracing only four per cent, of the area of 
the Russian Empire. Only rich merchants, certain intellectuals, and certain master-artisans were 
permitted to settle outside the pale, and within it, they were permitted to live only in the cities. 
All the Jews who had settled in the country districts were forced into the cities beginning with 
1882, and many who had ventured outside of the pale of settlement during the liberal era were 
again forced back into it. 

Among those congested in this area, a terrible period of distress ensued. The pogroms were bad 
enough. Worse were the devilish torments and extortions practised by the Russian authorities; 
worst of all was the material distress. 

In this terrible situation only the bravest are courageous enough to fight for a better lot. Of the 
others, all who have any means of doing so, and any prospect of obtaining employment 
elsewhere, resort to emigration; industrial workers therefore emigrated more than petty 
tradesmen. Particularly marked is the emigration in the overcrowded vocations. According to the 
census of 1897, there were 147,435 Jews employed as tailors in the pale of settlement. From 
1899 to 1910, 15,396 members of this trade emigrated to the United States from the pale of 
settlement each year; in other words, 10.5 per cent, annually. On the other hand, the average for 
shoemakers was only 1960 per year, or 2.7 per cent. The garment industry was predominantly 
still a domestic industry, producing for the local requirements, while in the shoemaking industry 
factory production was rapidly growing, and filled a market over all Russia. |T 11 The Jewish 
immigration to America was more numerous than to any other country. From 1881 to 1912, the 
total Jewish immigration to the United States amounted to 2,258,146 persons; from 1899 to 
1912, to 1,246,260 persons. The total immigration of Jews from 1881 to 1898 was 1,011,886, of 
which 526,122, or more than half, came from Russia. From 1899 to 191 1, the total number of 
Jewish immigrants was 1,165,665, of which 831,001, or three-quarters, came from Russia. 

The Jewish emigration from Russia to the countries of Western Europe was far smaller than the 
above figures. According to Ruppin's figures, the following numbers of Jews emigrated from 
1881 to 1908. 



79 





From Russia 


From Austria 


From Germany 


From Other Countries 


Total 


To England 


150,000 


10,000 


20,000 


10,000 


190,000 


To Germany 


15,000 


25,000 






40,000 


To France 


30,000 


10,000 




10,000 


50,000 


To Belgium 


5,000 






5,000 


10,000 



In the case of Germany and Austria, internal migrations of Jews from east to west were of greater 
importance. 

This was a portion of the general migration so characteristic of capitalism, namely, the migration 
from country to city, from agricultural districts to industrial districts. The process was 
accentuated by the economic conditions of the Polish sections of those countries, which in 
Germany and Austria, as well as in Russia, though not to so great a degree nor in such brutal 
forms as the latter, were making a portion of the agricultural population unnecessary, which 
surplus population flowed in part into the cities and supplanted the Jews or emigrated together 
with the Jews. 

In the Province of Posen (Prussia) there were still 76,757 Jews in 1849, but only 26,512 in 1910! 
The provinces of East Prussia, West Prussia, Pomerania and Posen, together, had still 116,075 
Jews in 1871, and only 62,355 in 1910. This migration was directed chiefly toward Berlin. 
Within the city limits of Berlin and the Province of Brandenburg, the Jewish population grew 
from 47,489 persons in 1871, to 151,356 persons in 1910. 

Similarly, the number of Jews in Vienna increased from 73,222 in 1880 to 175,318 in 1910, an 
increase of 139 per cent., while the total Jewish population of Austria increased only 30 per cent, 
in the same period. In Russian Poland, Warsaw included in 1893 only 13.8 per cent, of the 
Jewish population of Poland (168,677 Jews, of a total Jewish population of 1,224,652), while in 
1909 it included 16.1 per cent. (281,754 persons, of a total Jewish population of 1,747,655) ; in 
1910, the Jewish population of Warsaw amounted to 308,488. The Jewish population of Lodz 
tripled in the same period, increasing from 37,106 to 92,588 persons, r 1 21 

Almost all the Jewish immigrants entering France gathered in Paris; those entering England, in 
London; while the majority of those headed for the United States remained in New York, which 
now counts more than 1,000,000 Jews, r 1 31 

The mere fact of its concentration in a few great metropolises necessarily has brought the Jewish 
population more and more into the foreground. This condition is further accentuated by the fact 
that the immigrant Jews are far more sharply distinct from their new environment and appear 
much more foreign in it than do the Jews who have lived in the same environment for many 
years. 

The new great migratory movement of the Jews is of entirely different type from that of former 
days. Formerly, the Jews emigrated to countries of lower, or at least not higher, culture. Now we 



80 



find backward Jewish masses flowing to countries at a high stage of development, together with 
Irishmen, Southern Italians, Poles and Ruthenians, or Chinese. To be sure, the Polish Jews in 
their homeland are superior in education to their environment, which is one of the causes 
preventing their assimilation with the non- Jewish population. But as compared with Western 
Europeans or Americans, they are on a lower level. 

The Russian census of 1897 recorded among male Jews above the age of 10, 33.4 per cent, of 
illiterates, while among the non- Jewish families of the same age-group, even as many as 63.4 per 
cent, were illiterate! But of course it must be remembered that the total population of Russia 
showed an illiteracy among males above the age of 10 of no less than 61.3 per cent., and among 
females of no less than 83 per cent! Immigrants entering the United States are examined as to 
their ability to read and write. In these tests, the Jews showed better percentages than were 
displayed in the Russian census of 1897. This may be due partly to the fact that the American 
figures I am using are of later date than the Russian (1910, |T41 as compared with 1890, and also 
to the fact that only adults were considered in the American figures; perhaps also because the 
most ignorant would be most likely to remain at home. Furthermore, the American figures 
included all Jewish immigrants, not only those coming from Russia. Nevertheless, the Jews 
appear from these figures to be far beyond other peoples in the matter of literacy as is shown by 
the following table from Hersch's book. |T51 



Illiterates per 1,000 Adult Immigrants 



Scandinavians 


4 


Slovaks 


240 


Scotch 


7 


Jews 


260 


English 


11 


Greeks 


264 


Finns 


13 


Rumanians 


840 


Czechs 


17 


Poles 


354 


Irish 


25 


Croatians and Slovenes 


361 


Dutch 


44 


Russians 


384 


Germans [16] 


52 


Bulgarians and Serbs 


409 


French 


63 


Lithuanians 


489 


North Italians 


112 


Ruthenians 


584 


Magyars 


114 


Southern Italians 


539 


Spaniards 


145 


Portuguese 


682 



Only Eastern and Southern Slavs, Southern Italians and Portuguese show a higher percentage of 
illiteracy than the great majority of the immigrant Jews. This condition is a disgrace not to the 
races involved, but to their governments. The orthodox Jewish elements who flowed from the 
East to the highly developed West were quite backward. The first effect of this condition was to 



81 



retard the process of assimilation on the part of the Jews of the West; a further effect was the 
reviving of anti-Semitism. The latter process was stimulated in two ways; in the first place, by 
the increased competition faced by intellectuals and traders; in the second place, by the more 
emphatically foreign aspect of the Jewish community. But anti-Semitism is no longer what it 
used to be. In former days, it was directed chiefly against capitalist exploitation, of which the 
Jew was considered - in anti-Semitic countries - the most outstanding representative. Now it is 
more and more the proletarian Jew, the poor student, the poor peddler, the worker who works in 
his own house, who incurs the hostility of the anti-Semites. The times are passed when anti- 
Semitism might parade as a variety of socialism "the socialism of the simple citizen of Vienna". 
Today, anti-Semitism is a phase of the struggle against the proletariat, and it is indeed the most 
cowardly and brutal of these phases; it has become "the socialist-baiting of the simple citizen of 
Vienna". 

Meanwhile, a gap has opened up within Judaism itself; the wealthy and cultured Jews of the 
West, who have been almost assimilated, are in many cases unpleasantly affected by the new 
accession of their poor, ignorant "Yiddish" brothers from the East. They very often regard the 
latter with feelings that might be designated as an anti-Semitism within Judaism itself. 

Formerly, one of the most prominent characteristics of the Jews had been the intimate solidarity 
prevailing within their own ranks. The constant persecutions had powerfully supported their 
inner cohesion, and this strong cohesion had become one of the most effective means of resisting 
persecution. Although frequently represented as a Jewish race trait, it is - like the rest of their 
alleged earmarks - only a product of the conditions of their life. 

With every change in these conditions, there comes also a change in the "race trait". The feeling 
of solidarity on the part of the Western Jews has already been weakened considerably, because of 
- or perhaps in spite of - the fact that social anti-Semitism in the West (in Berlin, Paris, London, 
New York, and particularly in Vienna) has temporarily increased. Among Jewish capitalists who 
have risen to occupy dominant positions in the existing order, the feeling of Jewish solidarity is 
but rarely in evidence, and when expressed at all, it takes the form of charity. Such charity - in 
view of their rapidly increasing wealth - may assume large proportions, but it is extended only to 
the mendicant, not to the fighting Jewish proletariat. 

The Jewish solidarity broke down completely even before the war, when it was needed in order 
to support the aggressive section of the Eastern European Jewry. And the most treacherous 
opponent of this stratum in Europe, the Czar, became an ally of the rich Jews of Western Europe, 
being supported by them with all the means at their disposal. 

Haman, Imperial Chancellor of King Ahasuerus, was the original prototype of a pogrom- 
instigator, and was considered by the ancient Jews as the enemy who should be suspended from 
a gallows fifty feet in height. The Czar maltreated the Jewish people far more cruelly than ever 
Haman had done, but the capitalist Jews not only did not desire his ruin, but even supported him 
by means of the loans they granted him, thus repeatedly prolonging his existence. For Mordecai 
had become a poor tailor, and Esther had not risen to the dignity of a queen, but had been 
dragged off to an Argentine bordello. 



82 



It is precisely at the time when the theory of the pure race is set up and the Jews are raised to the 
dignity of being the model of a pure, exclusive race, that they begin to present the profoundest 
cleavages due to class hostilities, which here coincide with a cultural hostility. The contrast 
between capitalist and proletarian Jews imparts to the present migrations of the Jews an entirely 
different character, as well as entirely different effects, than formerly. Kaplun-Kogan has 
excellently characterised the difference in the nature of these migrations, but he has made the 
rather poor inference that the difference is based on their having been formerly bearers of 
economic progress, while now they are bearers of economic retrogression. |T71 

"Economic progress" means the progress of capitalism, and for this there are needed not only 
means of production but also proletarians. The means of production do not become capital until 
they begin to be applied by the proletarians. American capitalism could not have made its 
enormous advances within the last few decades if it had not been for the immense influx of 
proletarian masses from Europe. All the proletarians who set forth from an environment of 
economic obstruction to an environment favorable to progress, and who, in the latter 
environment, place themselves at the disposal of their employers, thus became an element of 
economic progress. At first, they are an unconscious influence in this direction, but later they 
become its conscious agents, for their migration has made them more capable of struggle. And in 
spite of their inevitable great illiteracy as a result of the Czarist barbarism, they were far superior 
in mental swiftness and in theoretical ability in the United States, as a city population, to other 
immigrants who came from the most backward agricultural districts. 

The Jewish workers' movement in the United States is one of the most active pioneers of social 
progress. 



Footnotes 

L Sombart, Die Zukunft der Juden, pp.82, 83. 
Z Ibid., pp. 85, 86. 

3. Ibid., p.87. 

4. W.W. Kaplun-Kogan, Die Wanderbewegungen der Juden, Bonn 1918, p. 46. Valuable 
statistical material map also be found in the essay of I.M. Rubinow, The Economic Condition 
of the Jews in Russia, Bulletin of the Bureau of Labour, Washington, D.C., 1907. Cf. also the 
series of articles, Die okonomische Lage des jiidischen Proletariats in Russland, Die Neue Zeit, 
vol.xxiv, part 1, p. 231 et seq. 

5. C. Nawratzki, Die judische Kolonisation Palastinas, Munchen, 114, pp.xvi, 538. 

6. Palastina und die Juden, Berlin 1919, p.46. 



83 



7. See also the estimates made by Israel Cohen, Jewish Life in Modern Times, London, 1914, 
p. 345 et seq., also the World Almanac for 1926, p. 698. - Translator. 

8. 1 take them from a book of L. Hersch, Le Juif errant d'aujourd'hui, Etude sur Immigration 
des Israelites de l'Europe orientale aux Etats-Unis de l'Amerique, Paris 1913, p. 191. This 
book appeared practically at the same time with the above mentioned book of Kaplun-Kogan, on 
the migrations of the Jews. Both books partly treat the same subject, with the same material, and 
arrive at similar conclusions, thus giving support to each other. Hersch goes more into statistical 
details, while Kaplun-Kogan' s treatment is more comprehensive. I have found both very useful 
in the present study. 

9. Hersch, op. cit, p. 299. 

10. As late as 1897, the Census of that year, showed that 5,054,300 persons of Jewish faith gave 
"Yiddish" as their mother-tongue, while 161,505 gave another language. At the same time, we 
find 8,856 persons of non- Jewish faith setting down Yiddish as their mother-tongue, obviously 
converted Jews - but incompletely converted. Cf. Rubinow, The Economic Condition of the 
Jews in Russia, p. 488. 

11. Hersch, op. cit., p. 240. 

12. Hersch, op. cit., pp.172, 309. 

13. According to the estimate of the American Jewish Year Book (1925-26), there were, in 
1920, 1,643,012 Jews in the City of New York. Of the Jews, the Borough of Manhattan shelters 
667,101; Brooklyn, 604,380; The Bronx, 278,169; Queens, 86,194; Richmond, 17,168. About 29 
per cent, of the New York City population is Jewish, by the above estimate; they comprise 38 per 
cent, of the inhabitants of the Bronx. - Translator. 

14. Hersch, op. cit., p.91. 

15. Jewish immigration to the United States has been greatly reduced, together with most other 
immigration, as a result of recent restrictive legislation. - Translator. 

16. Including also Germans from Austria. 

17. Kaplun-Kogan, op. cit., pp.58, 147. 



84 



Chapter IX 

Zionism Before the War 

The immense transformation in the conditions of Russia has not been without its effect on Jewish 
thought, and it has awakened to life the most varied aspirations among the Russian Jews, many 
forms of the ambition to defend themselves against their enemies, and to emerge from their 
desperate situation. 

In so far as these ambitions are not limited to a mere running away, to mere emigration, they 
consist in the effort to increase the strength of Judaism by means of solidarity: either through 
proletarian solidarity, by a union of the Jewish proletarians with the non- Jewish proletarians, or 
by means of a general Jewish solidarity, by uniting the powers of the Jews of all countries with 
those of the Russian Jews. 

The efforts to make the Jewish proletariat a part of the class struggle of the entire Russian 
proletariat found their feasible expression in the Jewish Workers Union (Arbeiterbund). Jewish 
socialists, proletarians as well as intellectuals, played a prominent part in both the Russian 
revolutions, that of 1905 as well as that of 1917. We shall merely mention this fact in passing, 
for a complete exposition of the circumstances would amount to writing a history of the Russian 
Revolution. 

The culmination of the second tendency mentioned above is Zionism. 

After the first Russian Revolution (1905), a new tendency set in, aiming at a union of Zionism 
and socialism. We need not discuss this movement here, for our general consideration of 
Zionism will also pay some attention to its socialist phase. 

The literary origin of Zionism is in Western Europe, but the real need of Zionism is felt only by 
the Jews of Eastern Europe. 

The proletarian class struggle, with its socialist leadership, finds the wage workers of modern 
large-scale industry most accessible to its needs, and precisely this group of workers is not 
strongly represented among the Jewish proletarians, who furnish a larger contingent to the 
workers in backward forms of industry, working as individual masters, as domestic workers; the 
Jewish immigrants in England and America are engaged chiefly in work done at their own 
homes. JT[ In addition, there are numerous petty traders and forms of life living from hand to 
mouth, on whatever resources may come to hand, Luftmenschen, as Max Nordau calls them, 
persons living on the edge of the Lumpenproletariat. All these elements - other things being 
equal - are more difficult to organise and cannot so easily be drawn into the struggle as the 
workers in large-scale industry, who have been already united and schooled in team action by the 
mechanical process. Furthermore, the revolutionary movement had first brought about 
persecutions of the Jews by reactionary forces in many parts of Eastern Europe. The Jewish 
intelligentsia always played a prominent part among the Russian revolutionary intelligentsia; this 
Jewish intelligentsia therefore drew the fire of the anti-Semitic reaction and because of it the 
entire Jewish community was held responsible, as a race rebellious by nature. For this reason the 



85 



political motives of the counter-revolution associated themselves with its economic motives to 
increase the already considerable sufferings of the Jews. 

As a result of all these circumstances, the slogan of solidarity between the proletarians of all 
nations and faiths became a guiding principle only for a portion of the Jewish proletarians. For 
the slogan of proletarian solidarity the other sections of the Jewish proletariat substituted the 
slogan of a national solidarity of Judaism. 

Those who became tired of the struggle or felt themselves incapable of fighting, but yet had still 
sufficient energy to desire not to be eliminated entirely, sought foreign shores. But were they 
likely to find an improvement in their situation by going abroad? Wherever the Jew - we mean 
the Eastern European Jew, still far from assimilation - may come, he is regarded as a foreigner 
among foreigners. He is nowhere certain even to be tolerated. The reactionary American 
workers, who keep out the Chinese and Japanese, who keep Negro workers out of their 
organisations, are equally opposed to Jewish immigration. The beginnings of such an attitude are 
already apparent. The Jew is secure against oppression only in a state in which he lives not as a 
foreigner, in a state - therefore - of his own nationality. Only in a real Jewish state will the 
emancipation of Judaism be possible. 

This is the guiding thought of Zionism. Even among the circles of Western European Judaism, 
this idea has in recent years been replacing the idea of assimilation, of equality of rights within 
the existing states, which had until recently been dominant among the Jews. Zionism is coming 
more and more in conflict with this thought, for as assimilation progresses, the national Jewry 
loses in strength. It is therefore necessary to segregate Jews as sharply as possible from non- 
Jews. 

Zionism meets anti-Semitism halfway in this effort, as well as in the fact that its goal is the 
removal of all Jews from the existing states. 

The agreement between Zionism and anti-Semitism on these points is so strong, that there have 
even been Zionists who expected much gracious assistance in the realisation of their objects from 
the head of the Orthodox Russian nation, from the fountain-head of anti-Semitism all over the 
world, from the Czar of Russia. 

There is no doubt of the needs that serve as the basis of the Zionist aspirations; in these needs 
lies their strength. But the needs may only serve as an explanation of the aspirations; it may not 
assure their success, which depends on entirely different factors. 

In the civilised world all regions have been preempted; there is no more room for a Jewish state. 
It is only outside of the limits of the civilised world, and only under the tutelage and patronage of 
a non- Jewish national state that a Jewish community is still conceivable. For a time it was hoped 
to found a colony in East Africa under English suzerainty, but finally thoughts have always 
converged on Palestine as the indicated home for a Jewish community. 

But, curiously enough, there had already been a Jewish state in Palestine,, founded by Jews in 
exile, under the protection of a non- Jewish state; and even at that remote period - two thousand 



86 



years ago - this state had not served as a very powerful attraction for the Jews living in the 
Diaspora. Most of the Jews chose to remain in Babylon, Damascus, Alexandria, Rome, and in 
other places of domicile, only a portion of them settling in Jerusalem. Most of them contented 
themselves with an occasional pilgrimage to the Holy City. They found that they prospered 
better when living as strangers among strangers than in the national state. 

Nothing has since been changed in this condition. To be sure, the situation of the Polish, 
Hungarian and Rumanian Jews is desperate, unendurable. But the question is not whether they 
could live better in Palestine than now in Western Europe, but whether the founding of a Jewish 
community in Palestine would afford them better opportunities than revolution in their own 
country. In fact, it is very questionable whether all the Jews now living - though but painfully - 
in Eastern Europe, could find any opportunities for their existence in Palestine at all. 

One of the conditions for the independent existence of a state is that it shall include all the 
classes necessary for its process of production under the present conditions of division of labour. 
This process is based on a constant exchange between city and country; a state is impossible 
without agriculture. But whence is the agriculture of the new Zion to be derived? 

It is, of course, absurd to maintain that the Jewish race is incapable by nature of engaging in 
agriculture. In the days when it was far more possible to speak of the existence of a Jewish race 
than now, namely, in the period preceding the Babylonian Exile, the Jews were predominantly 
agriculturists, as were all the peoples of antiquity. Even in our day efforts to make peasants of 
Jews have occasionally met with success. If such efforts have never been extended and followed 
up, this condition is due not to the fact that the Jews are Jews, but to the fact that they are city- 
dwellers. While the path from country to city is easy to follow, it is difficult to retrace one's steps 
if they are to lead to hard manual toil and not to mere enthusiasm for nature and sport. Let 
anyone point out any large body of "Indo-Germanic" city-dwellers flocking to the country in 
order to earn their living as peasants or farm hands! Needless to say, there are none. In present 
day society earning one's living in the country is associated with conditions that are intolerable 
for the city dweller. There is no doubt that we are emphatically in need of a stemming of the 
present tide from country to city, both for hygienic as well as for economic reasons, but the 
conditions for such a reversal of the process may be found only in a socialist society. Even Herzl 
recognised this situation when he said: "Anyone who would make agriculturists out of Jews is a 
victim of a most peculiar delusion." \7\ 

Herzl indeed recognised the necessity of agriculture for the Jewish State, but in order to find a 
possibility for Jewish agriculture he was obliged to build up an entire Utopia. 

We are well aware, however, that the replacement of the present mode of production by a higher 
mode of production can only emanate from centres in which capitalism has already been 
developed to the highest point. We are no longer living in times when men sought to establish 
socialist colonies in the wilderness. Industrial capitalism is the sine qua non of socialism. 
Whether it be desired to establish the Jewish state on a capitalist or on a socialist basis, the 
capitalist structure of society will be the necessary point of departure and it is here that we 
encounter a second obstacle. 



87 



How will it be possible for a powerful industry to develop in Palestine? There is no large 
domestic market. The rising industry would be obliged to work for the export trade from the very 
beginning. But even in the competitive struggle on the world market, an industry - other things 
being equal - can maintain itself far better if it has at its disposal an extensive internal market 
capable of absorbing large quantities, and furnishing the basis for the industry's demand. If an 
industry is to become capable of meeting competition on the foreign market, without possessing 
a market at home, exceptionally favourable circumstances must be on its side. In Palestine, on 
the contrary, the conditions for the growth of industry have been as unfavourable as possible: the 
soil has thus far revealed no deposits of coal or of raw materials; neither ores, nor textile 
substances, nor wood; it grows but few foodstuffs, with the result that prices of foodstuff's rise at 
once when immigration increases; there are no transportation routes; no navigable rivers, no 
good ports, no highways; and, before the war, there was no railroad line of importance. 

The conditions in Turkey had not turned out to be very favourable for an industrial boom, and 
these conditions were nowhere so wretched as in Palestine. No industry can be founded on 
Biblical reminiscences; and Palestine has hitherto produced nothing in the way of other products. 
Capital, in its hunt for profits - Jewish capital as well as other capital - has therefore always 
avoided the "Holy Land" in spite of the eager rapacity with which it has penetrated into all other 
countries affording any prospect of gain. 

The Zionist state of the future in Palestine had therefore not succeeded before the war in making 
any notable advance. According to Ruppin, 2,000,000 Jews emigrated from 1881 to 1908 from 
Russia, Austria and Rumania, of whom 1,600,000 went to America, almost 300,000 to Western 
Europe, and only 26,000 to Palestine! 

We have already mentioned Nawratzki's work on the colonisation of Palestine, which is a 
painstaking and detailed book and which was evidently written as a labour of love. But the 
critical reader will not be able to form the optimistic expectations which the author draws from 
his material. 

Immense sums have been spent by Jewish philanthropists in order to further the colonisation of 
Palestine. "In the foundation of the Rothschild colonies very large sums have been invested by 
these philanthropists alone; the amount is estimated at about fifty million francs." [31 

The Jewish Colonisation Association was given a capital of 160,000,000 marks by Baron Hirsch 
[4], most of which went to the work of advancing the colonisation of Palestine. In addition, there 
was an uninterrupted flow of money to Palestine from many other collections and donations. 

"An approximate estimate of all the moneys flowing annually into Palestine for the above- 
mentioned purposes would reach the figure of at least 10,000,000 francs." f5J 

What has been accomplished in Palestine in the three decades of colonising activity preceding 
the war, with these enormous money resources? One of the tasks was the founding of a Jewish 
agricultural community. "At the end of the year 1912, and including the settlements of the 
recently arrived Yemenites and the farm workers in the colonies and land groups, there was a 



88 



country population of about 10,000." [6[ As compared with the total Jewish emigration to 
foreign countries, this is a mere drop in the bucket. 

The experiences gathered in the attempts at colonisation led to the following inference: "The 
costs of a farm 'are comparatively high and may fluctuate between 12,000 and 18,000 francs per 
family. The necessary requirements to be met by a family of colonists are a sufficient knowledge 
of farming and enough money to pay for one-eighth or one-fourth of the cost of the farm and, in 
addition, to have enough operating capital left over for the first year's operations'." \7] 

Where such wealthy and experienced Jewish peasants are to come from we are not told. And, 
therefore, this proposition is not one that could lead to the emancipation of the Jewish 
proletarians in Russia. 

But of course, there were also large-scale Jewish agricultural establishments which flourished. 
The Jewish capitalist farmers had found a difficulty, however, in the employment of Jewish 
proletarians from Russia as farm hands: these Russian Jews are more exacting and less easily 
managed than the Arabs, for which reason the Jewish patriots have substituted Arab workers for 
their Jewish workers, as German patriots have frequently substituted Italian and Polish workers 
for their German workers. Since this device, however, conflicts with the purposes of Jewish 
colonisation, and since it is necessary, nevertheless, to exploit Jews as farm hands, recourse was 
had to the introduction of Jews from Yemen (Arabia). These Jews are at as low a cultural level as 
the Arabs among whom they live, are completely cut off from their European co-religionists, and 
have not the slightest connection with the problems of the European Jewry; but they are willing 
and cheap and therefore afford a possibility of solving the question of the Jewish colonisation of 
Palestine. "Within the last ten years, about 6,000 Yemenites have probably emigrated to 
Palestine." [81 

No doubt this was very fortunate for the purposes of the capitalist Jewish colonist, but it 
threatened to bring on a bankruptcy of the policy of inducing the Jewish proletarians of Russia to 
take up agriculture in Palestine. 

Now for the non-agricultural Jewish population in Palestine. This population, on the whole, 
seems hitherto to have lived in wretched conditions, in many cases resorting to actual 
mendicancy. This mendicancy was not a form of street-begging, but a drawing of alms from 
charitable institutions supported by Jews in all countries. Nor was it possible for the non- 
agricultural population to live in any other way: "Industry has as yet attained no importance in 
Palestine." [9[ 

The wages that were paid before the war may be inferred from the fact that Jewish farm hands 
who asked from 1.15 to 2 francs per day were considered too expensive; Arabs could be had for 
1.10 francs. Efforts were made to introduce a lace industry: "A fairly good factory girl gets as 
much as 1 franc per day!" Furthermore, foodstuffs were high. The workers in the colony of 
Rechoboth had to pay about 45 francs per month for food alone in the years 1907 to 1910. 

It should give rise to no surprise to find that the immigration to Palestine was not large and that a 
large percentage of this immigration consisted of aged persons who did not go to Palestine in 



89 



order to work, but in order to live on charity, or on their own incomes, and to end their days in 
the land of their fathers. Most of the younger immigrants again set forth to other parts. Of the 
1,979 Jewish emigrants leaving Odessa for Palestine in 1910, 606, or 30 per cent., were over 50 
years of age. Data gathered in Jaffa show that in 1912 there arrived in that port, in addition to 
350 Yemenites and 950 Bukhara Jews, 2,280 Jews from Eastern Europe (Ashkenazim), of whom 
only 30 per cent, were under the age of thirty. T 1 01 If we calculate the absolute figures on the 
basis of the percentages communicated by Nawratzki - who does not furnish us with the absolute 
figures - we find that 684 young Jews entered Jaffa in 1912, while 790 emigrated in the same 
year. 

In other words, there were more young Jews emigrating than immigrating. In spite of Sombart's 
"theory of the wilderness", the Jew, like any other modern man, is attracted to the large city and 
not to the wilderness, when in search of a livelihood. 



Footnotes 

1. With the gradual abandonment of the sweatshop system in New York, in favour of 
comparatively large factory centres, this condition may now be regarded as a thing of the past. - 
Translator. 

2. Der Judenstaat, Leipzig, 1896, p.23. 

3. Nawratzki, p.495. 

4. Nawratzki, p. 100. 

5. Nawratzki, p. 109. 

6. Nawratzki, p. 849. 

7. Nawratzki, p. 860. 
|L Nawratzki, p.441. 
^Nawratzki, p.403. 
10. Nawratzki, p.444. 



90 



Chapter X 

Zionism After the War 

Since then we have had the World War, which has by no means improved the economic 
conditions for the flourishing of a Jewish community in Palestine. To be sure, the political 
conditions for Jewish emigration to that region have apparently been improved, while the 
consequences of the war have at the same time strengthened anti-Semitism in Eastern Europe 
and thus increased the desire for a secure homeland for the Jewish race. 

In Western Europe and America as well as in the Central Powers, the Jewish population had 
become exceedingly patriotic for the most part; far from standing above the warring factions, as 
an exclusive race or nation might have done, they plunged into the war with the greatest 
enthusiasm. The German Jews felt that they were only German, the French Jews that they were 
only French. They hated each other with all the fury of the war psychosis, and did, not consider 
that they had any interests in common. 

Neither of the two belligerent groups had the upper hand from the outset. Each was obliged to 
utilise every resource at its disposal. On both sides of the trenches, each government sought to 
obtain the full support of its proletarians, and also of its Jews. The cheapest concession that could 
be made to the latter was in the form of promises to support Zionism. For these promises were all 
to be realised at the expense of Turkey. The Central Powers, as well as the Entente, permitted the 
Jews to believe that their victory would result in a Jewish homeland in Palestine. 

Therefore the war stimulated not only the English, French, German or other nationalism of the 
Jewish population, but also its specifically Jewish nationalism: Zionism. Now that the war is 
over, it appears that this aspiration is to be realised through the victors. The victors, in the Peace 
Treaty with Turkey, assigned control over Palestine to the League of Nations. In the name of the 
League, Palestine is to be administered by England, which will encourage the establishment of a 
Jewish home-land in Palestine. Of course, this is by no means equivalent as yet to the 
establishment of an independent Jewish state, but it may give rise to hopes of such a state. 
However, this will be possible only if a steady stream of Jewish emigration turns to Palestine and 
there creates a flourishing community. This stream would have to be a very generous one if it 
should introduce any essential improvement in the lot of the Eastern European Jews. We have 
already seen that in the twenty-seven years between 1881 and 1908, 2,000,000 Jews emigrated 
from Europe, but the number of Jews in Eastern Europe nevertheless increased considerably 
during the same period, while their situation became worse and worse. In Russia, in 1880, there 
were not quite 4,000,000 Jews, while in 1914, there were 6,000,000 or 7,000,000, an increase of 
2,000,000 or 3,000,000. In Austria-Hungary, in 1880, there were 1,646,000 Jews, while in 1914, 
there were 2,260,000, an increase of more than half a million. Of the 2,000,000 Jews who 
emigrated, only 26,000 had turned their steps to Palestine; this means that emigration to Palestine 
would have to increase phenomenally if any alleviation of the condition of the Eastern European 
Jews should be expected from this source. 

The hopes of the Zionists in this field were much raised by a calculation made by Professor 
Ballod in a book entitled: Palastina als judisches Ansiedlungsgebiet 1J, which was written 
during the war. Ballod argues in this work against a calculation set up by the German 



91 



geographer, Professor Philippson, who had maintained in an article contributed to the Berliner 
Tageblatt of February 9, 1916, which is based on the professor's intimate knowledge of the 
countries surrounding the Mediterranean, that the stony soil of Palestine could not support a 
population of more than 1,200,000 persons. 

Ballod also attacks a book written by the agronomist, Jakob Ottinger, entitled Methoden und 
Kapitalbedarf judischer Kolonisation in Palastina [2J, who believed that he was taking a very 
optimistic position in assuming that about 100,000 farming families could be established in 
Palestine, affording a livelihood to 500,000 members of these families. Ballod considers it 
possible to settle six million persons in Palestine not in the Palestine of to-day, but in a Palestine 
to be created on a new foundation. The realisation of Ballod' s proposals would raise Palestine 
from hitherto the most neglected corner of the earth to its most highly developed state. Ballod 
would establish 100,000 petty farms and 1,000 large-scale enterprises, operating with the most 
perfect machines, and the most effective fertilisers, and producing in accordance with the most 
modern methods. An immense irrigation system will transform the arid land into a paradise. 
Ottinger counts on an average wheat crop of 600 kilogrammes per hectare, while Ballod expects 
an average crop of 3,000 kilogrammes; in Germany the average crop is only 2,000 kilogrammes. 
In the case of cotton, Ballod hopes for crops of 600 kilogrammes per hectare, while in the United 
States only 200 or 250 kilogrammes are produced for the same area. 

But Ballod calculates that the entire immense transformation of Palestine which would make it 
possible to achieve such record crops and would make the country a home for 6,000,000 persons, 
would cost only 5,000,000,000 gold marks, while Ottinger had calculated a year before that 
2,000,000,000 francs would be necessary in order to settle half a million persons in Palestine. 

It must be that Ballod expects to pay lower prices than Ottinger. For instance, Ballod says: "The 
erection of ordinary houses, together with wells and cisterns and the necessary irrigation pleats, 
could be carried out for 1,000 marks." Ottinger, on the other hand, declares: "In accordance with 
previous experiences in Palestine, the dwelling of a worker will cost at least 2,000 francs; ... 
connecting up the farm with an irrigation system would probably cost 500 francs more." 3J 

Even Ottinger' s worker's cottage, costing 2,500 francs (including irrigation system), will hardly 
be a palace. Later Zionists prefer, however, to take their material from Ballod. As late as 1919, 
Davis Triesch declares in his little book, Palastina und die Jiiden, Tatsachen und Ziffern: "For 
1,000 marks, a solidly built modest house can be erected. As a matter of fact, houses have 
recently been erected at this price in Germany." [4] Lest the reader imagine that Triesch refers to 
the construction of birdcages, he adds: "Houses of five rooms or more must be erected for 1,000 
marks, depending on the mode of construction." 

"Facts and figures" 5] of this kind must cause us to wonder why not only the entire Jewish race 
but also all of Christendom is not found flocking to this promised land, whose fabulously cheap 
houses have a striking way of reminding us of its fabulously large clusters of grapes, each cluster 
of which must be carried by two men, with the aid of a pole, because of its great size. 6J 

But even if all of Ballod' s calculations should be correct, we are not informed as to the period 
within which they are to be made real. Even the far more sober Ottinger gives us no definite 



92 



suggestions on this point. On page 100 of his book, Ottinger outlines a project for the foundation 
of new colonies: 

"In accordance with this plan, in the course of about 12 years, 30 new Jewish points of support, 
having an initial agricultural population of 3,000 families, or 12,000 to 15,000 persons, would be 
established. In addition, about 30,000 Jews of other occupations would probably be attracted into 
the country by reason of this colonising." These colonies would require a capital of 77,500,000 
gold francs. But the 45,000 new immigrants provided here are quite a different figure from 
Ballod's 6,000,000. 

To be sure, Ottinger later adds that the colonisation of Palestine might, under favourable 
circumstances, proceed at a more rapid rate, in which connection he mentions the possibility of 
housing half a million new settlers in Palestine, but with the cautious interpolation: "Of course, 
this figure should be regarded as entirely hypothetical, and the question as to the time required 
for the colonisation of such a number of colonists should for the present be entirely left out of 
account." 

Yet, this question is by no means of little account to Zionism. Whatever Zionism does not 
accomplish in the immediate future, it will never accomplish, as we shall see later. And it is 
entirely impossible to throw great masses of Jewish colonists into Palestine in the immediate 
future. 

The war did not spare Palestine. The economic situation of the country was, like that of all other 
countries, far worse after the war than before it. 

The situation in Palestine in the year 1919 may be inferred from a private letter which I have 
received from a Zionist whose name I may not divulge, but the name does not matter for the 
present. I have received confirmation of the contents of this letter from many quarters. The letter, 
which was written in Palestine and dated October 30, 1919, says among other things 

"We are no longer of our former opinion as to immigration ... We are coming to the conclusion 
that a mass immigration is not only undesirable at the present time, but that it would be an 
outright cruelty, particularly for two reasons: 

"1. Hygienic reasons. The whole region (cities as well as the country districts) is infected with 
malaria, not to mention a number of other avoidable infectious diseases, such as trachoma (an 
inflammation of the eyes). Palestine is in need of a thorough housecleaning before it will be 
suitable for colonisation. We found many of the Jewish colonies or villages in the most wretched 
condition; every settler in some towns was actually either incapable of work or hopelessly run 
down. The same condition was found in the cities. Although Jerusalem lies above the normal 
mosquito line, great numbers of mosquitoes are found there. A group of heroic young Jews from 
Poland arrived here after incredible adventures at the beginning of this year. We found most of 
them ill. The local medical station of the American Zionists has accomplished much; for 
instance, it annihilated the mosquitoes at Safed in six weeks, by having oil poured on the water 
in the cisterns. As a consequence of the visit paid by Brandeis, this station will achieve even 
greater things. But it will be a long time before the country is healthy enough to receive a mass 



93 



immigration, for the draining of the swamps will involve far more labour than the oiling of the 
tanks. 

"2. Employment. Palestine is full of Jewish beggars today. The Jewish population of Jerusalem 
and other so-called 'holy' places have been accustomed to live on the gifts of their co-religionists 
abroad. These donations were cut off during the war and cannot be renewed now because of the 
present situation of the Jews in Eastern Europe. Much misery is the result. In Safed, the Jewish 
population decreased from 10,000 to 3,000. These persons were not accustomed to work, but 
they have now been converted to the idea and are shouting for work. New industries are urgently 
required, and we have carefully considered the possibility of such industries; for instance, 
printing, the production of articles used in synagogues, of preserved fruit, garments, etc. But you 
may imagine that such industries must be built on a firm foundation if sweatshops and other 
undesirable European (and not only European; the factories of Damascus, for example, are said 
to be frightful) concomitants of industry are to be avoided ... 

"I know very well what this delay will mean for the Jews of Eastern Europe who are ready to 
flock into this country by the millions. Unfortunately, Palestine cannot, even under the most 
favourable circumstances, undertake for many years to absorb in any adequate way all those that 
are prepared to come. The best informed authority on matters of the colonisation of Palestine, 
Artur Ruppin, has calculated - in a book that appeared last April, Der Aufbau des Landes 
Israel - that 20 years will be required under favourable conditions to increase the present Jewish 
population to 1,000,000 or 1,250,000, and that the increase in the number of Jewish workers 
employed in public works cannot be made more than 15,000 per year in the near future. 

"The best authorities do not doubt that the country can be made to support a numerous 
population after the lapse of two generations. But this is but sad consolation for the victims of 
pogroms in our own day. But we cannot have our cake and eat it too. 

"If Palestine is to become an asylum of refuge, it cannot be a truly healthy community. If it is to 
be built up on sound economic foundations, the would-be fugitives will have to bide their time." 

Since this letter was written, the economic conditions of the Jews in Palestine have improved 
considerably. Thanks to the active support of Jews all over the world, and to the energy and 
enthusiasm of the Jewish immigrants, much has been accomplished in the way of road 
construction, irrigation systems, agricultural settlements, and cultural institutions. An absolutely 
new Jewish city, Tel Aviv, has sprung into being, on a site that was a mere sand dune before the 
war; also, a Jewish university has recently been created. 

The character of the Jewish immigration has changed considerably. While before the war it 
consisted chiefly of beggars, who lived in many parts of the world on Jewish charity, it is now 
workers and intellectuals at the prime of life who are coming, able and willing to reconquer the 
land of their fathers in the sweat of their brows, and, if need be, by superhuman exertions. 

Anyone who has doubted the possibility of the Jewish people's showing energy, resolution and 
intelligence in this crisis, must surely have changed his mind by reason of the work of Zionist 
reconstruction in Palestine. 



94 



To be sure, the giving of such an object lesson can hardly have been necessary, for no one really 
doubts that the Jewish race possesses great capabilities. The point at issue is not whether the 
Jews have ability, but whether the accomplishments of the Jewish cultural work in Palestine may 
justify the assumption that this region may become the centre for a great emancipation of the 
entire Jewish people, may put an end to the condition of the Diaspora, and gather the Jews of all 
the world into one great national state. 

Our first question should be: How long will it be possible for the Jewish rehabilitation process in 
Palestine to proceed at a fairly rapid rate? 

In view of the extremely unfavourable natural conditions offered by Palestine in the work of 
creating new arable soil and maintaining the excellence of that already acquired, as well as in the 
work of securing routes of communication, without which agricultural colonies cannot prosper, 
truly superhuman powers will be required, and the exertion of such efforts will deprive the 
workers of every vestige of a higher standard of living. 

Of the Jewish immigrants who have come hitherto, and I do not mean former peasants, or ditch- 
diggers, but in great measure intellectuals, many - impelled by a patriotic enthusiasm - have 
willingly submitted to these labours and privations without a murmur. 

But enthusiasm of this type has always been the special gift of a small group of chosen persons, 
and even in such cases it is not a permanent acquisition. The hard toil of the daily grind usually 
succeeds in soon crushing all heaven storming enthusiasms, and in the long run a new social 
order cannot be built up on overwork and on exertions greater than those formerly borne by the 
individuals in question. 

The accessions of new enthusiasts must ultimately dwindle, and the ranks of those now at work 
will be thinned in the course of time. 

Even in South America, and in present-day Russia or in the United States, where the natural 
conditions are far more favourable, and where political obstacles to the farming activities of the 
Jews are as little present as in Palestine, we have not observed that any isolated attempts to 
transform Jews into peasants have led - by their success - to any widespread emulation on the 
part of most Jews. We have no reason to assume that conditions in Palestine will be any 
different, once the period of the first flash of enthusiasm is past. 

Already we find a predominant tendency on the part of the Jews in Palestine to settle in the 
cities. Tel Aviv is growing far more rapidly than are the agricultural colonies. This city is now 
only six years old, and already it has 40,000 inhabitants. There were 80,000 Jews in Palestine in 
1921, who had increased to 120,000 by the end of 1924. In other words, the entire increase in 
population is accounted for by the existence of the city of Tel Aviv. In addition, there are 40,000 
Jews in Jerusalem and 12,000 in Jaffa. 

Reports from the cities themselves inform us that employment for artisans is increasing very 
slowly and that the number of vagrants (Luftmenschen) and intellectuals constitutes a percentage 
of the population that is rapidly increasing. 



95 



In other words, these cities will soon be facing the same problem that has been encountered by 
the Jews in the cities of Eastern Europe; in fact, the problem will be a more serious one, for the 
European Jews are at least living among a dense population which, though not Jewish, is 
nevertheless agricultural. 

These difficulties will increase as the Jewish population of Palestine begins to live on its own 
work, ceasing to live on foreign philanthropy, as it did before the war. With the rise of a working 
class will come - even in Palestine - an increase in socialistic ideas, which will condition a sharp 
opposition of many Jewish elements to capitalism within Zionism. These contrasts became quite 
apparent even at the last Zionist Congress at Vienna; they will necessarily increase and express 
themselves with more and more definiteness. 

As this condition increases, the interest shown by the Jewish capitalists of the world in Zionism 
will lose its ardour. But without constant accessions of new capital, the Jewish work of 
cultivation in Palestine will not make much progress. 

As yet, there has never been much Jewish immigration. We have seen that the total increase of 
the number of Jews in Palestine was only 40,000 during the four- year period above mentioned; 
in other words, an average increase of 10,000 per year. The rate may since have risen to 20,000 
or 30,000 per year. These figures are large when compared with the small area of the country, 
already holding six hundred thousand inhabitants. 

But how insignificant are these figures when compared with the total growth of Judaism 
throughout the world! Annually this increase amounts to ten times the size of the Jewish 
immigration into Palestine. Under these circumstances, how could this country ever absorb more 
than an imperceptible fraction of the world's Jewish population? 

No doubt the promised land will some day be able to offer work to more inhabitants than at 
present, once all the projected great irrigation plants, highways, railroads, etc., have been 
completed, but the volume of the immigration tending in that direction will never be so great as 
to reduce in any way the number of Jews living in Europe and America, and thus to solve the 
present Jewish question. 

At best, it might bring about the following partial accomplishment: the number of Jews in 
Palestine may increase more rapidly than the number of non-Jews in the country (the Arabs) and 
the new Jewish state, although it will never embrace the great mass of the world's Jewish 
population, may nevertheless be predominantly Jewish in tone. 

But even this prospect is not likely to be fulfilled. 

To be sure, the length of time that would be required by Jewish colonisation in order to impress a 
Jewish stamp upon Palestine would be no argument against such colonisation, provided time 
were working in favour of Zionism as it has worked in favour of socialism; in other words, if the 
conditions for the realisation of Zionism were progressively improving in the course of the 
economic and political evolution. But these conditions do not apply in the case of Zionism, and 
this constitutes its fundamental weakness. Zionism cannot afford to wait, for the political 



96 



conditions for its realisation are rapidly becoming worse. Whatever Zionism does not attain 
within the next few years, it will never attain at all. 

For Zionism is not a progressive movement, but a reactionary movement. Zionism aims not at 
following the line of necessary evolution, but of putting a spoke in the wheel of progress. 

Zionism denies the right of self-determination of nations, instead of which it proclaims the 
doctrine of historical rights, which is breaking down everywhere today, even where it is 
supported by the greatest powers. 

The idea of democracy, of the self-determination of nations, is indissolubly connected with 
modern economic evolution, and is thus made irresistible. [81 This is not only true today for 
Europe, but it is beginning to be true for Asia, also. 

The outcome of the World War might have involved a considerable progress in international 
relations, if the victors had everywhere accepted the democratic doctrine and recognised 
throughout, as a principle, the self-determination of nations. But they permitted themselves to be 
guided only by their love of power; they condescended to apply the notion of the self- 
determination of nations only at such points where it was convenient for them. Wherever an 
application of this doctrine might have strengthened their former opponents, they replaced it 
quite arbitrarily with other guiding notions, such as that of strategic boundaries, of 
monopolisation of the treasures of the soil or of traffic routes, as well as that of historical rights, 
the claim of a nation to the restoration of the boundaries of its state as they existed centuries ago, 
under entirely different circumstances. 

Among the many antiquated legal claims which the little proteges of the great victors filed with 
the latter, the most ancient and moth-eaten is the historical claim of the Jews to Palestine. This 
claim is two thousand years old, and during these two thousand years the Jews have completely 
ceased to be a nation. They have not only lost their common territory, but even their common 
language. The only language that today might be considered a living Jewish language, namely, 
"Yiddish," is a mutilated German. A faint tinge of Jewish nationalism is attained by this 
language only when it is set down in writing, not when it is spoken. It is German written in 
Hebrew characters. 

Palestine does not yet have a Jewish population of any importance as to size. The single city of 
New York contains fourteen times as many Jews as Palestine, where the Jewish population 
amounts to not more than one-eighth of the total population, of which the great majority consists 
of Arabs. There are 620,000 Arabs as compared with 120,000 Jews; as economic conditions 
improve, the number of Arabs will increase as well as the number of Jews. Palestine could not 
very well be isolated from the neighbouring countries, which are entirely Arabic. 

There is hardly any possibility that the Jews in Palestine will become more numerous than the 
Arabs. But every attempt made by the advancing Jewry in that country to displace the Arabs 
cannot fail to arouse the fighting spirit of the latter, in which opposition to the Jews the Arabs of 
Palestine will be more and more assured of the support of the entire Arab population of Asia 
Minor, in whose eyes the Jews appear as foreign rulers or as allies of the English oppressor. 



97 



It is a delusion to imagine that the Jews arriving from Europe and America will ever succeed in 
convincing the Arabs that Jewish rule in this country will ever redound to the advantage of the 
Arabs themselves. 

In the early days of Zionism, people were blind to this difficulty. Little more attention was paid 
to the Arabs than was paid to the Indians in North America. Only occasionally is it remembered 
that Palestine is already an occupied country. It is then simply assumed that its former 
inhabitants will be pushed aside in order to make room for the incoming Jews. Ballod, for 
instance, discusses as follows the question of what is to be done in the way of claiming all of 
Palestine for Jewish colonisation: 

"In the case of a mass colonisation, mere individual purchases of land from the Arab proprietors 
of large holdings would not be sufficient; on the other hand, in order that real-estate prices may 
not rise to fabulous heights, a Jewish chartered company must be given the right to expropriate 
land in return for adequate compensation." [9] Ballod also says that the petty peasants, the 
fellahs, will not provide much trouble. In his opinion, they would "gladly leave Palestine if they 
should be offered opportunities elsewhere, for instance in Northern Syria or Babylonia, if the 
latter is to be reawakened to life by large-scale engineering operations, to obtain better 
conditions". But who is to offer them these "better conditions"? 

Ballod, himself, therefore expects that there will be trouble between Jews and Arabs in Palestine. 
His book was written at a time when Ballod was convinced of the victory of the Central Powers. 
We therefore find him expressing, in a special chapter entitled "The Central Powers and 
Zionism", the advantages offered by Zionism to the Central Powers. He points out "that it is to 
the interest of Germany and Austria to have large masses of Jews settled in Turkey", f 101 in the 
first place, because this would mean an accession of population to their ally, Turkey, which 
would by that time have been somewhat denuded of population and resources, and in the second 
place, because the Eastern European Jews who would furnish this immigration would speak 
German and would thus help advance Turkey's trade with the Central Powers, and, finally, for 
the reason that the Jews in Palestine would furnish a counterweight to the Arabs, who favoured 
England. 

But the fact now is that England has won the war, and the Arabs have become as burdensome to 
England as they, once were to the Turks. The Zionists now present the reverse side of the medal 
and extol the Jewish colonists in Palestine as England's allies against the Arab aspirations for 
independence. 

In spite of all these changes, one condition remains permanent: the dependence of Jewish 
colonisation on the victorious European great powers, and the opposition of the colonists to the 
Arabs. Both are necessary results of the given economic and political conditions, and each of the 
two factors gives strength to the other in rapid alternation. Here we find the profoundest cause 
for the untenability of Zionism. Jewish colonisation in Palestine must collapse as soon as the 
Anglo-French hegemony over Asia Minor (including Egypt) collapses, and this is merely a 
question of time, perhaps of the very near future. 



98 



The war immensely strengthened the nationalism of the Arabs. The English themselves aided 
considerably in this process by appealing to the Arabs as allies against the Turkish regime. Now 
they cannot exorcise the powers which they thus have conjured. |T 11 The spirit of national self- 
determination is irresistible in Western Asia as everywhere today, once it has seized the masses 
of the people, and such is the case now with the Arabs. Arabia is now practically independent. 
Mesopotamia, Egypt, Syria, will become independent in the course of a few decades, and they 
will more and more deprive the European protectorate, which they must accept for the present, of 
all real authority. 

There is no longer any doubt of the final victory of the Arabian people; the question merely is 
whether this victory is to be obtained by the peaceful method of a successive forcing of 
concessions, or by a period of wild guerilla warfare and bloody insurrections. The English mode 
of government points rather to the former, the French rather to the latter methods. In whatever 
way the process of transformation may be realised, the poor, weak Jewish settlers in Palestine 
will be the chief sufferers, during the battle of the Arabs for independence, as well as after their 
victory. Of all the European elements in Asia Minor, the Jews will be least able to defend 
themselves, as well as least capable of escape, and yet they will be treated as the worst enemies, 
because their colonising the country will prove that they intend to remain in it and not only make 
the former inhabitants dependent on them but even drive them out entirely. 

Thus it may be considered truly fortunate for the Jews, who would be the sufferers, that the 
Zionist colonisation policy will very probably have great difficulty in getting started. We may 
therefore hope that the number of victims to the policy of Zionism will not be very great; this 
policy aims at bottom at nothing else than to transplant-at immense cost and with the greatest 
sacrifices of those concerned-enthusiastic Jews from regions in which anti- Jewish pogroms are 
subsiding, into a country where such pogroms are likely to ensue on a larger scale, if the Zionist 
programme should be successful to any extent that is at all perceptible. 

This distortion of the original intentions into their precise opposite is inevitable whenever men 
base their conduct in the present time not on an investigation of the present, but on a submission 
to phantoms conjured up from a hoary antiquity. 

But the dangers to the Jews who are lured to Palestine by a Messianic aspiration do not exhaust 
all the baleful effects of Zionism. It is perhaps far worse that Zionism means a wasting of the 
fortunes and resources of the Jews in a wrong direction, at a moment when their true destinies 
are being decided on an entirely different arena, for which decision it would be necessary for 
them to concentrate all their forces. 

It is not in Palestine, but in Eastern Europe, that the destinies of the suffering and oppressed 
portion of Jewry are being fought out. Not for a few thousand Jews, or at most a few hundred 
thousand, but for a population of between eight and ten million. Emigration abroad cannot help 
them, no matter whither it may be turned. Their destiny is intimately connected with that of the 

revolution, in their own country. 

The methods of the Bolsheviks are not those of the Western European Social-Democracy. The 
Bolsheviks will not be able to found a modern socialist state. What they are really establishing is 



99 



a bourgeois revolution, which will assume forms corresponding to the social condition of 
present-day Russia, resembling in many ways the forms of the great French Revolution toward 
the end of the Eighteenth Century. Among its other effects, the French Revolution liberated the 
Jews in France, giving them full rights of citizenship. The same accomplishment will be included 
among the permanent achievements of the Russian Revolution for all of Eastern Europe, unless 
the Revolution succumbs to the most savage counter-revolution. But the struggle in Eastern 
Europe now is not only a struggle for political freedom and for the rights of the Jews to change 
their domicile. The conditions are also being prepared for an enhancement of their economic 
situation. In addition to the emancipation of the Jews, the emancipation of the peasants also will 
be one of the achievements of the revolution in Eastern Europe. A more prosperous peasantry 
will take the place of the present impoverished peasantry, thus creating a greater internal market 
for urban industry. Once peace has been re-established in Eastern Europe, industry, and with it 
transportation, will necessarily develop with giant strides; the urban population will find 
abundant employment and food, and the great mass of the Jewish population will find it possible 
to rise from conditions of life in which they have hardly emerged from the lumpenproletariat, to 
the conditions of the proletariat in large-scale industry, as a portion of which class they may then 
take part in the upward struggle of the entire class. 

Herein only is there a possibility for the Jewish masses to achieve a truly human status. Zionism 
cannot strengthen them in this effort. Zionism will weaken them at the historically decisive 
moment by promulgating an ambition which amounts practically to a desertion of the colours. 



Footnotes 

L Pro-Palastina, Schriften des deutschen Komitees zur Forderung der jiidischen 
Palastinaansiedlung, Zweites Heft. 

2. Ballod, Palastina, p. 18. 

3. Ottinger, Jtidische Kolonisation, p. 67. 
4 Triesch, op. cit., p. 28. 

5. Tatsachen und Zijfern, an allusion to the subtitle of Triesch' s book. - Translator. 

6_. "And they came unto the brook of Eshcol, and cut down from thence a branch with one cluster 
of grapes, and they bare it between two upon a staff; and they brought of the pomegranates and 
of the figs." - Numbers xiii, 23. 

7. Ottinger, op. cit., p. 104. 

8. 1 have discussed this subject in detail in my book, Die Befreiung der Nationen, Stuttgart, 
1917 



100 

<L Ballod, Palastina, p.30. 

10. Ballod, op. cit, p.27. 

11. "Die ich rief, die Geister, Werd' ich nun nicht los." - Goethe, Der Zauberlerhrling, 1797. 



101 



Chapter XI 

Pure Races and Mixed Races 

WE cannot take leave of Zionism before discussing another one of its arguments, its last 
argument, which will lead us back to the question of race. 

It may appear to be a paradox, but it is a fact, that not a few Jews look with some misgiving on 
the emancipation of the Jews in Eastern Europe. They understand, and rightly so, that this 
emancipation will extend into the east of Europe the assimilation of the Jews that has been going 
on in the west for some time. For when the artificial exclusiveness of the Jews is terminated, 
when the ghetto ceases to exist, their assimilation will become everywhere inevitable. 

Only in those regions of Eastern Europe in which the Jews were settled together in great numbers 
and artificially cut off from their environment, have they been able to preserve their national 
peculiarities. With the emancipation of the Jews in Eastern Europe, the last reservoir still feeding 
the Jewish community of the whole world will disappear, the last obstacle to its gradual 
assimilation. Judaism will then cease to exist as a separate body. 

To be sure, this process will take place under circumstances which lift all the Jews still oppressed 
out of the slough in which they may still be living, into the full status of human beings. But 
Jewish nationalism regards the conservation of traditional Judaism as more important than the 
elevation of the Jewish individual. 

Jews who regard the matter thus are in many cases quite progressive in their other views. As is 
so often the case in modern society, where it is found necessary to render conservative and 
radical thought compatible, the race theory plays a prominent part here also. 

It is declared to be urgently necessary to erect Palestine into a world ghetto, in which a great 
number of Jews are to be confined and cut off from the surrounding world, because in this way 
only can the Jewish race be protected against admixture and preserved as a race. 

For the Jews are a pure race, and it is only the pure races that are called upon to achieve the 
highest performances. Race mixture degrades human types and lowers their cultural capacity. In 
other words, we should be impelled to believe that the cultural capacity of mankind decreases 
with its increase in culture, for an increase in culture is synonymous with an increase in 
international communications and contacts, and therefore in race mixtures also. 

One of the most prominent advocates of the Palestinian world ghetto as a means of preserving 
the race purity of the Jews is Zollschan. Sharp and correct though his criticisms even of 
Chamberlain may be, he nevertheless exploits without question the most untenable of 
Chamberlain's theories, namely, the theory that exalted human qualities may be found only in 
the pure races. Zollschan says: 

"Chamberlain's book, The Foundations of the Nineteenth Century, has been attacked with a 
vehemence that has been directed to but few other works; and in most cases these attacks were 
well founded. But the turning point, the nucleus of Chamberlain's system, namely, his emphasis 



102 



of the ennobling effects of race purity and of the destructive results of race chaos, is 

unquestionably sound Chamberlain properly observes that the normal course of development 

is not from race to racelessness, but from a politically conditioned racelessness to a sharper and 
sharper definition of race, the quintessence of the race being expressed in the genius, the hero ... 

"Chamberlain says he cares very little for anthropological subdivisions; 'by race I mean that 
emphasis of specific essential characteristics and of the universal power of performance; that 
exaltation of the entire being, which is attained under very specific conditions of selection, 
mingling, in-breeding - but only under these very specific conditions, in which case it results, 
however, invariably; in other words, with the certainty of a natural law 

"In the case of the bastard, the individual abilities may increase, while the general, 'instinctive' 
abilities (characteristics) disappear; precisely the latter constitute the potential factor giving rise 
to all real greatness. 

"In the case of crossing between members of widely separate races, the constitutional type is lost 
in their posterity, although the latter may quite frequently be well equipped as far as individual 
aptitudes are concerned ... 

"Doubtless the force of heredity is far more significant in the case of the pure races. It is certain 
that in favourably bastardised races the kinetic cultural energy will constantly prevail, while in 
the pure inbred races the potential cultural energy will always prevail; but that only the latter is 
the fruitful soil from which the ingenious power of creation as well as the artistic and moral 
genius may grow forth. 

"This distinction between inbred and mongrel races makes clear to us the value of race purity." 
11 

It is only with ill-concealed astonishment that we can receive this anti-Semitic-Zionist- 
bastardisation of Chamberlain's pure race vagaries at the hands of Zollschan - otherwise an 
intelligent man. The race, defining itself with increasing sharpness, and whose quintessence is 
the genius, the hero, the race which represents nothing short of an exaltation of the entire being, 
in which the potential cultural energy will always be predominant - this is in truth a "race chaos" 
which is based on nothing but the energetic use of the words "doubtless", "without doubt", "with 
certainty", which are applied the more emphatically, the less definite the conceptions associated 
with them. 

The most amusing point about the whole matter is the fact that Zollschan, at the beginning of his 
book, himself rejects the "nobility of race of the modern Teutons as advanced by Gobineau, 
Richard Wagner, and Houston Stewart Chamberlain", 21 and with reason, for: 

"Chamberlain ascertained that the Jews owe their origin to the crossing of three races entirely 
different from each other: the Semites, the Hittites, the Amorites ... The crossing between the 
Semites, Hittites and Amorites, is designated by Chamberlain as outright 'incest'; in the destinies 
of the Jewish nation resulting from this mingling, as well as in its mental unfruitfulness, 



103 



Chamberlain beholds an inevitable fate which necessarily intervened with the certainty of a 
natural law, and from which the race will never be able to escape." [3J 

Yet this same Chamberlain is accepted as a cast-iron basis by the Zionist race theoreticians ! 

This seems absurd; yet it is quite simple; Zollschan has only to prove that the Jews give evidence 
of great mental achievement, of much genius, such as only a pure race can develop, according to 
Chamberlain. It will follow as a self-evident consequence that they must be a pure race, and it 
would be equivalent to committing a sin against the holy spirit of history, if one should sully 
their purity with a mingling with other races, by bastardising them! Therefore the Zionist world- 
ghetto becomes the necessary goal for all Jews! 

Unfortunately, this subtle reasoning is not a sufficient refutation of the fact that the Jews are a 
mixed race and not the Jews alone, for every cultural race is a mined race. If only "pure races" 
are the native soil from which the "ingenious power of creation and artistic and moral genius 
may grow forth", if the bastard races show no such qualities, we shall probably have to retrace 
our steps almost to the purity of the ape-man before we encounter the last remnants of these 
"generic" capacities. In the case of the cultural races, they must have long since expired, for the 
"bastardisation" of these races is true "beyond a doubt". 

The view is no doubt very widespread that "mixed races for the most part emphasise only the 
defects and vices of their progenitors, not their favourable points", and Zollschan presents this 
view as "established today". [41 But, as a matter of fact, this principle is as little accepted as the 
other "undoubted" truths on which Zollschan bases his argument in this case. 

We have already seen that the concept of the "pure" race is borrowed from the realm of domestic 
animals. It loses its point altogether when applied to the varieties, to the geographical races of 
wild animals, and even to the races of humans, in so far as they are geographical in character. All 
the learning of our race theoreticians and the "sharpened glance of our day for that which is in 
the blood" are based in the last analysis merely on a constant confusion of the most varied 
conceptions of race. To Chamberlain's honour be it said that he makes this idiocy quite clear to 
us. Again and again he places the experiences of history on a par with the experiences gathered 
in artificial selection: 

"The history of our own race teaches us with an eloquent tongue what we are also taught by 
every race horse, every pure-bred fox terrier, every Cochin-China hen!" [51 

Chamberlain alleges that the Hellenic people are an example of this process. 

In an earlier passage [61 Chamberlain observes that perhaps no "other question encounters such 
black ignorance even among highly educated, even learned, men, as the question concerning the 
essence and significance of the conception of 'race'". Chamberlain then turns against Virchow, 
who had demanded equality before the law for the various races and had advocated a cult of 
personality as opposed to the cult of race. 



104 



"As if the whole course of history did not prove to us the close connection between personality 
and race, the conditioning of the nature of personality by the nature of its race, and the 
connection of the power of personality with certain conditions of its blood! And as if the 
scientific breeding of plants and animals did not afford us an immensely varied and reliable 
material, with the aid of which we may learn both the conditions as well as the significance of 
'race' . Do the (rightly) so-called 'noble' races of animals, the Limousin draught-horses, the 
American trotters, the Irish race-horses, the absolutely dependable hunting dogs - do these arise 
by accident and promiscuity? Are they the result of granting the animals equality before the law, 
of feeding them all on the same fodder and subjecting them all to the same rod? No, they arise by 
sexual (sic!) selection and by strict preservation of the purity of the race ... A continuous 
condition of promiscuity between two prominent animal races will invariably lead to a 
destruction of the most outstanding characteristics of both. Why should mankind be an 
exception?" 

This question can embarrass only such persons whose "black ignorance" is so great as to prevent 
them from distinguishing between the races of domestic animals and other races, and who may 
believe that the laws of the stud-farm are the universal laws of nature and of human history, 
persons who imagine that the "race" of the Hellenes and the race of Cochin-China hens were 
produced in exactly the same way. 

In the case of the latter, there is no doubt that "a permanent condition of promiscuity" with 
another race will "degrade" both races. The organism of the domestic animal is not an end in 
itself, but a means to an end. Its efficiency and excellence are not estimated by its power of 
performance to the advantage of its own preservation and procreation, but by its utility for the 
specific human purpose for which the animal has been bred. Its efficiency in this connection will 
increase with its specialization, with the increasing one-sidedness of specific organs. This one- 
sidedness is decreased by crossing a highly bred race with another race, presenting peculiarities 
of an entirely different type. In this way the special value inherent in each of the two races from 
the standpoint of the purposes of man, may easily be decreased, and the pure race to this extent - 
"degraded". 

But in the case of animals who are not domestic animals, efficiency must be measured by a 
different standard. The standard now becomes, not their efficiency in subserving the purposes of 
others, but their efficiency in answering the requirements of the preservation of their own 
organism and its own posterity. In the case of pure races, in other words, such races whose 
efficiency for a certain end proposed by man has been enhanced by a one-sided development, the 
efficiency for the purposes of their own organism may indeed increase by crossing the race with 
another and thus reducing its one-sided qualities. 

As a matter of fact, breeders rather frequently resort to a crossing of pure races, either in order to 
attain new race characteristics, or in order to infuse increased energy and power of resistance into 
an over-refined, enervated race, by means of crossing. 

Even Chamberlain admits the possibility of improving the race in this manner, by crossing. But 
"only very specific and limited blood-minglings are favourable to an ennobling of a race or to the 
establishment of a new race. Here again the clearest and most unambiguous evidence is 



105 



furnished by the breeding of animals. The blood-mingling must be for a limited time only, it 
must furthermore be adapted to the purpose; not all minglings, but only certain minglings may 
serve as a basis for race improvement. In limiting the time, I mean that the supply of new blood 
must be introduced very swiftly, after which it must cease at once." [7] 

Continuous blood-mingling is tantamount to a "baleful, destructive condition, a sin against 
nature", nature meaning - in Chamberlain's eyes - fox-terriers and Cochin-China hens. But in 
the natural state there is no breeder to choose the breeding couples and to regulate the supply of 
new blood in such manner as to limit it to a swift introduction, after which the supply is cut off. 
Nor is man today - as yet - bred artificially. Humans never mated under Chamberlain's 
conditions. 

To be sure, man resembles the domestic animals in his tendency to a one-sided development 
owing to the division of labor and to specialisation. This one-sidedness is easily overcome in 
cases where callings vary from generation to generation. But such one-sidedness may be 
developed to a high point where occupations are hereditary. This condition will be naturally 
attained in cases where the one-sidedness of the vocation is not an adaptation to social 
peculiarities, but to peculiarities of nature, to a specific natural environment, resulting in a 
specific mode of production. Particularly the mental characteristics (the nervous system), which 
are of course more variable and more capable of accommodation than the somatic elements 
(skeleton, muscles, etc.), may here attain the most extreme forms; a race of horsemen may 
develop into a state of bloodthirsty savagery; a race of farmers into a condition of cowardly 
enervation; isolated in the mists of a lonely mountain range, a race may develop a gloomy and 
fretful mysticism, while an active condition of social contact may produce - under a cloudless 
sky - the most frivolous and arrogant joy of life. A mingling of such elements may, under such 
circumstances, produce very desirable consequences. 

But such minglings may particularly be of great advantage in cases where a continuous process 
of in-breeding has imparted a pathological character to certain one-sided peculiarities. There is 
hardly any doubt that in-breeding will not be injurious under all circumstances. But it has been 
recognised that in-breeding leads to swift degeneration where pathological predispositions are 
involved. Even Zollschan admits this, although he is quite enthusiastically in favour of in- 
breeding: 

"In-breeding - unless certain vicious conditions such as tuberculosis, lues, alcoholism, 
psychoses, have gained a foothold in a family - is by no means so pernicious as is generally 
assumed, even in the case of very close alliances within the same family. If constitutional 
pathogenic germs are present, these will, to be sure, attain enormous proportions; but healthy 
constitutions are by no means ruined in this process." 81 

The more civilisation develops, the more artificial and unnatural becomes the environment in 
which the majority live. The number of persons obliged to live in cities, to work indoors, 
increases; the nervous system is forced to develop along narrower and narrower channels. These 
conditions make the organism far more receptive to germs of disease. At the same time, an 
extending of the artificial environment tends to limit the effects of the struggle for existence with 
surrounding nature, to prolong the life of diseased organisms, to render propagation possible to 



106 



such organisms. Under these circumstances, in-breeding must be particularly injurious, and a 
mingling of varied elements must be of exceptional advantage. The increasing mingling of races 
by reason of the increase in world traffic may probably be considered as one of the most 
powerful factors opposing the tendency to a debasing of "race" by civilisation. The more we turn 
our backs on nature, the more necessary becomes a mingling of races. 

Our anthropologists, accordingly, are by no means inclined to regard race mixture as a 
misfortune - at least not those anthropologists who study the question of interest to the human 
race by studying man himself and not the processes of the chicken-coop or the florist's hothouse. 

In the lecture delivered by Luschan at the Racial Congress, which we have already quoted 
several times, this scholar also has the following to say on the question of mixed races: 

"We all know that a certain admixture of blood has always been of great advantage to a nation. 
England, France and Germany are equally distinguished for the variety of their racial elements. 
In the case of Italy we know that in ancient times and at the Renaissance, Northern "Barbarians" 
were the leaven in the great advance of art and civilisation; and even Slavonic immigration has 
not been without effect on this movement. The marvellous ancient civilisation of Crete, again, 
seems to have been not quite autochthonous. We know also that the ancient Babylonian 
civilisation sprang from a mixture of two quite different national and racial elements, and we 
find a nearly homogeneous population in most parts of Russia and in the interior of China 
associated with a somewhat low stage of evolution." 

Luschan does indeed seem inclined to regard mixtures between whites and blacks with disfavour. 
But he states his case cautiously in the paragraph immediately following the above quotation: 

"On the other hand, we are all more or less disposed to dislike and despise a mixture of 
Europeans with the greater part of foreign races. 'God created the white man and God created the 
black man, but the  created the mulatto', is a very well-known proverb. As a matter of fact, we 
are absolutely ignorant as to the moral and intellectual qualities of half-castes. It would be absurd 
to expect from the union of a good-for-nothing European with an equally good-for-nothing black 
woman, children that march on the heights of humanity, and we know of many half-castes that 
are absolutely sans reproche; but we have no good statistics of the qualities of half-castes in 
comparison with those of their parents." [9] 

It is apparent that Luschan is very far removed from any acceptance of the popular conception - 
so carelessly proclaimed by Zollschan as a demonstrated truth namely, that mongrels reproduce 
only the defects and vices of their progenitors and not also their virtues. 

In the case of mongrels between white races, he maintains the precise opposite. As for the 
products of unions between whites and coloured people he considers the matter as not 
sufficiently proved. No writer assigns any reason for a worsening of character by reason of such 
mixture. Zollschan, like Chamberlain himself, admits that the halfcastes may often excel their 
parents in physical strength, in beauty, and in natural intelligence. But both declare that the 
character suffers by reason of the mixture. Why this degrading of race should be expressed 



107 



precisely in the character and not in any other trait appears to be a decision of fate, and one 
requiring no explanation. 

It is interesting to note that the defects due to a mingling of races express themselves only in the 
domain in which they are least likely to be checked up. Nothing is more subjective by nature 
than our judgment of the character of another individual. His external traits, his strength, his 
talent, are subject to objective measurement, but the impression made upon me by his character 
depends in large measure on whether my intercourse with him is of friendly or hostile nature. 
Any man whose reputation has been subjected to distortion by party hatred and party favour will 
present an uncertain image in the records of history, f 1 01 The same individual will present quite 
different traits in the eyes of his friends from those seen by his enemies. One may be the 
tenderest and kindliest father to one's children and yet be a most ruthless usurer or slave-driver. 
On the other hand, any specific expression of another's character will produce quite a different 
impression on the onlooker, depending on whether the latter is fighting by his side or constitutes 
a menace to his life. Character may express itself only in one's relation with others; 
manifestations of character depend entirely on one's relations with others; likewise, the 
evaluation of these manifestations by third persons will depend on such relations also. In a word, 
far more than in bodily stature, or in the strength or ability of the individual, the social factor, the 
influence of the environment, will assume the foreground in the impression made by his 
character. The factor of heredity appears here to be most variable and most difficult to be 
isolated and recognised as such. 

But if we make an effort to ascertain the social factors producing the result that half-castes 
between whites and blacks appear for the most part to be of bad character, we shall not have far 
to seek. We need only to refer to the "bastards" produced in Europe by parents of the same race, 
who are distinguished from the other children in the same country merely by the fact that they 
have been so unfortunate as to lack all the economic and social support which society and the 
law grant to legitimate children. 

Nor do we find that the half-castes in the colonies have been subjected to worse judgements than 
the illegitimate children of European parents of "pure" race. 

"In every respect, physically, mentally and morally, they constitute on the whole a debilitated, 
more or less degraded group. The mere fact that they were produced in extra-conjugal, 
illegitimate relations, becomes in their case a powerful cause of disease and death, both before 
and after birth, and throughout their entire lives. In the total statistics of disease, as well as in the 
mortality statistics of any country, they furnish, year in and year out, a very considerable and-we 
might add-constantly increasing contingent, both in physical as well as in mental disease, mental 
debility, suicide, not to mention crimes of all kinds. Far more frequently than other groups, as 
compared with their number, they fill our public institutions, beginning with the lying-in hospital 
and the orphan asylum, and ending with the hospitals, the prisons, and the morgue." [1 11 

Why should we not expect to find that the facts obtaining of these unhappy pariahs in our society 
are also applicable to the half-castes in the colonies, almost all of whom are illegitimate children 
- frequently as a result of the laws, for Christian governments, which know no closer concern 
than the protection of marriage and the family, do indeed permit white men to take coloured 



108 



women as concubines, but not to marry them, and to permit their children to enjoy a father's 
care? 

It should not surprise us to find that the coloured bastards lead just as sorry a life as the white 
bastards, and this fact would by no means prove that their general backwardness was due to their 
being of mixed extraction and not to their social position. But we find as a rule that bastards of 
barbarous tribes have far more chances of success than the illegitimate children of civilisation, 
which again does not of course prove that half-castes between Europeans and coloured races are 
of better endowment than children produced by two European parents. But their inferiority has 
not at all been proved. Under favourable circumstances, such half-castes may even give evidence 
of considerable ability. 

Thus, Ratzel, in his Volkerkunde, speaks with great respect of the bastaards, the offspring of a 
mixture of white and Hottentot blood, who - it is claimed - have raised the Hottentots to a higher 
level. Ratzel has the following to say on this subject: 

"It is claimed, concerning the European half-castes, in South Africa as well as in India and in 
South America, that they possess the defects of both their parents, but none of their virtues. In all 
these regions so much of this statement is true, that the half-castes to be sure rarely unite all the 
favourable traits of the European father with all the virtues of the coloured mother. But this is 
due less to the mixture of blood than to the peculiar and hardly favourable breeding which these 
persons receive and must receive by reason of their situation between two widely separated 
races. It is self-evident that the care of their education falls to the mother, and that therefore the 
first impressions received by the young half-caste are obtained in the environment of the lower 
race. As he grows up, he may become conscious of the superiority inherent in him as a rule as far 
as his mentality is concerned, and often even physically - as a result of his share of the lighter 
blood; but the race to which his father belongs will not accept him; it will regard him as a 
coloured man, in spite of the better qualities he may have inherited as a half-caste. He will 
therefore grow up, usually, to receive less education and culture than his capacities would 
require, and it is quite natural that he should not be able - under these circumstances - to make 
the best use of his gifts in every case. Superior to the coloured community in mental endowment, 
in energy, and often even in physical strength, or at least in the spirit and love of putting his 
strength to the test, he lacks the gift of contentedness with his lowly and oppressed situation and 
with the phlegmatic insensibility to privations of every kind which are characteristic of his 
coloured brothers." \12] 

In other words, the "worsening" of the character of the half-castes consists in their furnishing 
less convenient objects of exploitation, and in their being more inclined to rebel against their 
subjection than the "pure" coloured race. Quite worthy of note is the judgement formed by 
Sidney Olivier, who, for a number of years, was governor of Jamaica, where there exists a 
considerable population of half-castes. In 1891, this island had only 15,000 whites, 122,000 half- 
castes, and about 500,000 Negroes. Olivier has a very high opinion of the latter and expects 
much from their future development. But of course the whites are at present far superior to them. 
In this connection, the half-castes may be considered socially an element of great value: 



109 



"The offspring of such breeding, whether legitimate or illegitimate, is, from the point of view of 
efficiency, an acquisition to the community, and, under favourable conditions, an advance on the 
pure bred African. For, notwithstanding all that it may be possible to adduce in favour of that 
prejudice against the mixed race, of which I have spoken, and which I have myself fully shared, I 
am convinced that this class as it at present exists, is a valuable and indispensable part of any 
West Indian community, and that a colony of black, coloured, and whites has far more organic 
efficiency and far more promise in it than a colony of black and white alone. A community of 
white and black alone is in far greater danger of remaining, so far as the unofficial classes are 
concerned, a community of emplovers and serfs, concessionaires and tributaries, with, at best, a 
bureaucracy to keep the peace between them. The graded mixed class in Jamaica helps to make 
an organic whole of the community and saves it from this distinct cleavage. 

"A very significant light is thrown on the psychology of colour prejudice in mixed communities 
by the fact that, in the whites, it is stronger against the coloured than against the blacks. I believe 
this is chiefly because the coloured intermediate class do form such a bridge as I have described, 
and undermine, or threaten to undermine, the economic and social ascendancy of the white, 
hitherto the dominant aristocracy of these communities. This jealousy or indignation is much 
more pungent than the alleged natural instinct of race-aversion." r 1 31 

In spite of the favourable results of many a mixture of Negroes and whites, it is nevertheless easy 
to understand why investigators who are favourably disposed to the coloured race may condemn 
a mingling between white and coloured. But this may hardly be considered as due to the laws of 
heredity, but rather to considerations of ethical and aesthetic nature. 

The aversion to such mixtures is an aversion to the relations between the sexes found in regions 
where an unmarried white master class has unlimited control, in the colonies, over disfranchised 
natives. Such unions in these countries will not partake of the character of a free love- selection, 
but rather of that of prostitution or even violation of the women involved. Such violent forms of 
race mixture should surely be condemned, but they have nothing to do with the question of 
heredity. 

And surely they cannot be invoked in a consideration of the question as to whether the Jews 
should be preserved as a pure race by artificial segregation and by an avoidance of all mixed 
marriages. 

We have seen that the Jews are in no sense a pure race; we have seen that even mixtures between 
widely separated races may be of advantage; and finally we have seen that mixtures between 
related races are as a rule of great value. Why should it be precisely the Jewish half-castes that 
have so disastrous an effect? On the contrary, it might be maintained that no mixture between 
European populations is likely to produce better results than that between Jews and non-Jews. 
No stratum of the population has become more one-sidedly urban in character than the Jews, and 
in no other stratum has in-breeding under unfavourable hygienic conditions produced more 
unhappy results than among the Jews. 

It is Zollschan's opinion that "in-breeding within a human community of ten or eleven million" 
has "no longer the slightest similarity with in-breeding within the limits of a small group of 



110 



relatives." But it is not true that the entire Jewish community lives in a single segregated region 
and that marriages take place only within this region. Jews in Vilna hardly regard Jewesses in 
Morocco or Yemen as possible mates. It is quite possible that the result of such matings might be 
a desirable one. But in many regions the Jews constitute a very small community, and the result 
very frequently is marriages between relatives, where the situation is such as to render 
impossible marriages outside of this community. 

It might be possible to speak, however, of another form of in-breeding besides that within the 
family. Blood-relationship alone appears to be not a dangerous factor in marriage. It becomes 
dangerous only by reason of the probability that the same pathological predispositions have been 
inherited by both husband and wife and may therefore be transmitted to their children in an 
exaggerated form: But acquired defects may have just as much influence on posterity as those 
that are inherited, if present in both parents. This identity of acquired defects will most likely be 
present in those cases in which both husband and wife, as well as their ancestors for several 
generations, have been living and working under the same conditions. In this connection, it 
would be necessary to call attention not only to in -breeding within the family, but also to a 
vocational or social in-breeding. The more pernicious and one-sided the common conditions of 
labour and life of the two groups of ancestors, the more dangerous will be in-breeding within the 
vocation, as far as posterity is concerned; the more necessary a mingling with members of other 
vocations or classes; the greater the necessity, therefore - of course - of technical and social 
reforms for eliminating noxious and one-sided tendencies. 

Darwin also believed that alterations in the conditions of life, as well as the crossing of 
individuals who have been subject to different conditions of life, are of advantage, unless the 
alteration to which the individuals are subjected be too great. 

"Hence it seems that, on the one hand, slight changes in the conditions of life benefit all organic 
beings, and on the other hand, that slight crosses, that is, crosses between the males and females 
of the same species, which have been subjected to slightly different conditions, or which have 
slightly varied, give vigour and fertility to the offspring." [141 

The Jews have suffered most from a uniformity of their conditions of life, since they have in 
their ranks but a modicum of variety in vocation, and since they lack particularly the invigorating 
influence of new accessions of peasant blood. And precisely in those regions in which they live 
together in great numbers, and where -therefore - the danger of in-breeding between blood- 
relations is smaller, their conditions of life are the most monotonous and unfavourable, and the 
dangers of vocational and social in-breeding become greatest for them. No stratum of the 
population has more to gain by an admixture of non- Jewish - more or less peasant-blood, than 
the Jews. 

The Jews have therefore not the slightest reason to avoid, because of fear of their assimilation, 
the only path to salvation that is available to them: an energetic participation in the class 
struggle of the proletariat. 



Ill 

Footnotes 

L Das Rassenproblem, pp. 264-270. 

2. Zollschan, op. cit., p. 82. 

3. Zollschan, ibid., pp.152, 143. 

4. Zollschan, ibid., p.264. 

5. Foundations of the Nineteenth Century, vol.i, p. 272. German edition: Die Grundlagen des 
XIX. Jahrhunderts. 

6. Chamberlain, op. cit., p.264 et seq. 

7. Chamberlain, op. cit., p. 284. 

8. Das Rassenproblem, p. 266. 

9. Anthropological View of Race (see footnote, pp.22, 23). 

10. "Von der Parteien Gunst und Hass verzerrt, Schwankt sein Charakterbild in der Geschichte." 

11. Friedrich Schiller, Prologue to Wallensteins Lager. Osterlen, Medizinische Statistik, p. 200. 
231 

12. Ratzel, Volkerkunde, pp. 1 15, 1 16. 

13. Sidney Olivier, White Capital and Coloured Labour, London 1906, pp. 87-39 

14. Charles Darwin, The Origin of Species, The Harvard Classics, New York 1909, chap.ix, 
p.318. 



112 



Chapter XI 

The Last Stages of Judaism 

ZIONISM is an untenable Utopia. On the other hand, liberalism is no longer capable - and 
perhaps not even desirous - of carrying out what it has neglected hitherto. Besides, its resources 
and its backing in the population are weakening. Wherever the liberals have not succeeded in 
bringing about a complete emancipation of the Jews - not merely a legal emancipation, but a real 
social equality of the Jews - it is certain that they will not be able to do so in the future. 

The capitalist Jews are in all countries content with what has been attained. Though they may not 
have gotten as much as they wished, they at least have power enough, by reason of their wealth, 
to overcome slight inconveniences. This was true even in Czarist Russia, and in places where it 
is not the case these disabilities do not appear important enough, in their eyes, to justify a risk of 
revolution in order to overcome them. The capitalist Jews themselves are becoming conservative 
and are accepting conditions as they are. 

The only force capable of a thorough overturning of the present order and of a complete 
destruction of all oppression, of all legal and social inequality, now remains the proletariat, 
which must achieve this end in order to achieve its own liberation. Only a victorious proletariat 
can bring complete emancipation for the Jews; all of Jewry, except in so far as it is already 
fettered to capitalism, is interested in a proletarian victory. 

There is no doubt that the liberation of the Jews will be equivalent to their absorption to the 
extent to which this liberation is achieved. 

The centre of gravity of the Jewish question now lies in the great areas of former Russia. If 
Russia achieves full civil equality for the Jews, and if the country becomes economically 
prosperous and develops growing industries, we shall not again encounter a Jewish migration to 
the west. But this will mean that the process of Jewish assimilation, already so far advanced in 
the past, but somewhat retarded within the last decades, will again set in. Even in England and 
America, the assimilation of the new strata of Russian Jews will proceed at a rapid pace. If the 
accessions from Russia cease to arrive, probably the second generation and surely the third 
generation of the Jews in the London East End and on the East Side of New York, will no longer 
understand Yiddish but will all speak English; they will no longer live in a single section of the 
city, closely congested in a few sweated industries that yield but slight opportunity to live, but 
will spread throughout the country and find the same opportunities as the rest of the population 
for earning a living in the most varied occupations. And religion will probably have become a 
matter of indifference to these Jews; thus the last barrier to their assimilation will be removed. 

This prophecy, which I already made before the war, is also confirmed by the observation of 
Zollschan as contained in his book printed in 1919: 

"The second generation of the inhabitants in this country speak Yiddish only in their parental 
environment, and later generations speak it only in unusual cases ... The Yiddish theatre has 
already passed beyond its culmination. My questions as to the basic reasons for this condition 



113 



always brought the answer that the second generation has entirely lost interest in it as well as ' 
the language itself." lj 

In the Chinese quarter Zollschan even found two Russian Jewesses who had married Chinese! 

The process of the disintegration of Judaism will proceed more slowly in Eastern Europe than in 
America. But even in Eastern Europe, the process must go on, in spite of the fact that the 
struggle for the emancipation of the Jews has at this moment led to the laying of greater 
emphasis on their Jewish traits. 

Like other nations who have been ruled by a master class which prevented them from securing 
contact with modern civilisation, the Jews of Russia have also created a literature in their own 
language, which hitherto had had no literature, as soon as they began to develop an aspiration 
towards independence. There resulted the growth of a Yiddish literature, a Yiddish theatre, a 
Yiddish press, which in America includes great daily newspapers and periodicals, and had 
already attained large dimensions even in Russia when the war opened. 

"The 'Yiddish' daily press, after having been in existence for ten years, exceeds the Polish press 
in circulation and in Russia is second in this respect only to the Russian press proper." [2] 

The productions and resources of an active national life on the part of the Russian Jews will 
become progressively greater and stronger as long as the struggle for Jewish freedom advances. 
But that which we call the Jewish nation can achieve the victory only in order then to disappear. 

The Jewish nation could maintain itself only by means of a living together of all the Jews in 
close contact with each other. But the callings to which the great mass of the Jews in Eastern 
Europe chiefly flock are not compatible in great measure with such a congestion of population. 
Persons engaged in these callings can prosper only when they are living among great numbers of 
persons engaged in other occupations, in which the non- Jewish population predominates. 
Precisely the compulsory congestion of population in a small space-which today still gives 
plausibility to the conception of a Jewish nationality has also created the specific Jewish misery. 
With the disappearance of the latter will come also the disappearance of the conditions for a 
Jewish nationality. The Jewish misery can disappear only under a political and social condition 
of Eastern Europe which will impel the Jews in those regions to speak the language of their 
environment, which means the beginning of this assimilation. The latter will be further 
stimulated by the fact that in an Eastern Europe which is politically free, the intellectual 
advancement of the entire population will become one of the most important tasks of the state. 
Judaism draws its strength - as a specific group, segregated from its environment - from anti- 
Semitism alone, from persecution. In the absence of the latter, it would have been absorbed long 
ago. Counter-revolution might imbue Judaism with a new lease of life; but counter-revolution 
can be nothing more than a temporary phenomenon. When the Jews shall have ceased to be 
persecuted and outlawed, the Jews themselves will cease to exist. 

Have we any reason to deplore this prospect? 



114 



Our answer will of course depend on the point of view from which we judge the matter. But it 
seems to me that for the Jew himself the ghetto - which is the specific Jewish form of life - is 
not a phenomenon calculated to give rise to melancholy longings. And the friends of human 
progress have far less cause than the conservative Jew to shed a tear over the disappearance of 
Judaism. 

We have seen that Judaism developed to the highest point the properties of the city-dweller. 
These are precisely the mental properties at present most required for the progress of humanity. 
We find accordingly that the comparatively insignificant number of Jews in Western Europe has 
produced an astonishingly long list of epoch-making minds, the proud enumeration of which 
would extend from Baruch Spinoza to Heinrich Heine, Ferdinand Lassalle, and Karl Marx. 

But although the Jews developed as their culminating properties such immense mental abilities, 
they became more and more unfitted to apply the abilities they had developed. Until late in the 
Middle Ages, the Jews, like the Catholic Church, had constituted an element of progress; but - 
again like the Catholic Church - they have since cut themselves off from progress; even more 
than the Catholic Church, owing to the narrow limits of Judaism and its strict segregation from 
the non- Jewish world, which had begun to widen its horizon immensely after the Fifteenth 
Century, and to pass through an era of continuous mental revolutions, the Jewish community 
ceased to participate in the work of progress. The Jews, restricted to the ghetto by their 
orthodoxy, remained totally untouched by this great transformation of the human mind; they 
assumed a hostile position to the new philosophy. The spiritual giants produced by modern 
Judaism could bring their forces into action only after they had burst the fetters of Judaism. Their 
activities were carried on, without exception, out side of the bounds of Judaism, and within the 
realm of modern culture, which is as little Jewish as it is Christian, and often their activities were 
in complete conscious opposition to Judaism-by which we mean, as it may be necessary to point 
out again, not the total number of Jews, but those Jews who are comprised in a specific group 
and as such are cut off from the rest of mankind. Even the pioneers of Zionism, such men as 
Herzl, Nordau, Zangwill, make use of the so-called world languages and not of "Yiddish". The 
Jews have become an eminently revolutionary factor, while Judaism has become a reactionary 
factor. It is like a weight of lead attached to the feet of the Jews who eagerly seek to progress, 
one of the last remnants of the feudal Middle Ages, a social ghetto still maintaining its existence 
in the consciousness, after the tangible, physical ghetto has disappeared. We cannot say we have 
completely emerged from the Middle Ages as long as Judaism still exists among us. The sooner 
it disappears, the better it will be, not only for society, but also for the Jews themselves. 

The disappearance of the Jews will not involve a tragic process like the disappearance of the 
American Indians or the Tasmanians. It will not be equivalent to a declining into stupidity and 
degradation, but to a rising to greater strength, to prosperity and well-being, to the opening up of 
an immense field of activity. It will not mean a mere shifting of domicile from one mediaeval 
ruin to another, not a transition from orthodox Judaism to ecclesiastical Christianity, but the 
creation of a new and higher type of man. 

Ahasuerus, the Wandering Jew, will at last have found a haven of rest. He will continue to live in 
the memory of man as man's greatest sufferer, as he who has been dealt with most severely by 
mankind, to whom he has given most. 



115 



Footnotes 

L Zollschan, Revision des jiidischen Nationalismus, p. 14. 
2. Hersch, Le Juif, p. 9. 



